Nevada, session 83, SB460.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 385 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this act.
Sec. 1.3. 1. Each public elementary school shall prepare a
plan to improve the academic achievement of pupils enrolled in
the public elementary school and submit the plan to the
Department and the board of trustees of the school district in
which the public elementary school is located or, if the public
elementary school is a charter school, the sponsor of the charter
school. The plan must comply with the requirements of the Every
Student Succeeds Act of 2015, 20 U.S.C. §§ 6301 et seq., and
include:
(a) A 3-year strategic plan to advance the academic
achievement of pupils;
(b) Intermediary goals to be met after each school year for the
period set forth in paragraph (a);
(c) A plan that can be implemented by the public elementary
school to hire teachers who provide direct instructional services;
and
(d) A plan to provide programs of remedial study in the subject
areas of English language arts, mathematics and science to pupils
in grades 1 to 5, inclusive, based upon the results of the
examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 and any
examinations or assessments offered for the purpose of measuring
the academic progress of pupils.
2. Any goals developed pursuant to subsection 1 must
include:
(a) Goals for pupil growth and improvement in pupil
achievement and proficiency in the academic subjects of English
language arts, mathematics and science; and
(b) A measurement of the number of pupils who have, for the
subject areas described in paragraph (a):
(1) Demonstrated progress towards proficiency; and
(2) Achieved proficiency.
3. The superintendent of schools of a school district and the
sponsor of a charter school shall, for each public elementary
school within the school district or sponsored by the sponsor, as
applicable, that does not meet the goals set forth pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 in 3 consecutive school years:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
(a) Provide additional support for the administration of the
school, including, without limitation:
(1) Increased assistance and monitoring of school progress;
(2) Instructional or academic support; and
(3) Requesting guidance from the Education Service Center
created by section 56.5 of this act, which shall provide
recommendations on strategies and interventions for school
improvement.
(b) Assess the performance of the principal of the public
school and his or her responsibility for the failure of the school to
meet the goals set forth pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1.
The superintendent of schools of the school district or the
executive director of the charter school may, to assess the
performance of the principal pursuant to this paragraph, consider
the rate of chronic absenteeism, as defined by the Department
pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 392.150, at the public school. If
the superintendent or executive director of the charter school
determines that the principal is ineffective and responsible for the
failure, the board of trustees must, except as otherwise provided in
paragraph (c), remove the principal from his or her position. A
principal who is removed from his or her position pursuant to this
paragraph may apply for another position within the school
district or charter school, as applicable.
(c) If the principal of the school is not removed from his or her
position pursuant to paragraph (b), the principal must reapply to
the board of trustees of the school district for his or her current
position.
4. A principal who is the subject of a performance assessment
conducted pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3 and is not
removed from his or her position must:
(a) Every 2 years after receiving the performance assessment,
reapply for his or her current position. The principal must reapply
for his or her current position pursuant to this paragraph for the
duration of his or her employment as principal of the school that
did not meet the goals set forth pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1.
(b) Prepare and submit a report to the Department containing
a plan for annual growth that describes any additional supports
provided by the school district. The report must be submitted each
school year in which the principal remains in his or her current
position, unless the school to which the principal is assigned meets
the goals in the plan prepared pursuant to subsection 1. The
Department shall examine the plan submitted pursuant to this
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
paragraph and determine any adjustments necessary for the
school to meet the goals in the plan prepared pursuant to
subsection 1.
5. If the performance of the principal is assessed pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 3 as minimally effective or ineffective,
the superintendent of schools of the school district or the executive
director of the sponsor of the charter school, as applicable, shall
prepare and submit a report to the Department containing a plan
for annual growth that describes any additional supports provided
by the school district or sponsor of the charter school and any
recommendations from the Education Service Center created by
section 56.5 of this act. The report must be submitted each school
year in which the principal remains in his or her position unless
the school to which the principal is assigned meets the goals in the
plan prepared pursuant to subsection 1. The Department shall
examine the plan submitted pursuant to this subparagraph and
determine whether any adjustments are necessary for the school to
meet the goals set forth in the plan prepared pursuant to
subsection 1.
Sec. 1.7. 1. It is the intent of the Legislature to:
(a) Enhance the efficiency of education reporting
requirements by eliminating the reporting of redundant
information and data, reducing administrative burdens and
ensuring that all reports serve a meaningful purpose in supporting
educational outcomes.
(b) Ensure that teachers and school administrators, who are
directly impacted by reporting requirements, have agency in
recommending modifications to reporting requirements.
(c) Preserve transparency, the accountability of public schools
and school districts for the quality of schools and the educational
achievement of pupils, and the accessibility of information and
data concerning the educational achievement of pupils.
2. A teacher or school administrator employed at a public
school, a charter management organization that operates a
charter school or an educational management organization that
provides support or operations to a charter school may submit a
petition to modify, suspend or eliminate a requirement for a public
school or school district to report information or data to another
person or entity. Such a petition must be submitted to the
superintendent of schools of the school district in which the public
school is located or, if the public school is a charter school, the
governing body of the charter school. The petition must:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
(a) Clearly identify the requirement to report information or
data that the petitioner is seeking to modify, suspend or eliminate;
(b) Contain a detailed explanation of the reason that the
requirement to report information or data is duplicative or
redundant or does not provide information or data that is used by
the Department, the State Board or any other person or entity to
support educational outcomes; and
(c) Propose an alternative report of information or data, if any,
that would ensure that information and data to support
educational outcomes remains accessible.
3. Upon receipt of a petition submitted pursuant to subsection
2, the superintendent of schools of the school district or governing
body of the charter school, as applicable, shall:
(a) Review the petition to determine whether the requirement
to report data or information that is proposed for modification,
suspension or elimination is duplicative or redundant or does not
provide data or information that is used by the Department, the
State Board or any other person or entity to support educational
outcomes.
(b) If the petition requests to modify, suspend or eliminate a
requirement for a public school to report data or information to
the school district and the superintendent of schools of the school
district finds that the requirement to report data or information
proposed for modification, suspension or elimination is duplicative
or redundant or does not provide data that is used by the school
district to support educational outcomes, approve the petition and
issue a decision modifying, eliminating or suspending the
requirement. If the superintendent of schools of the school district
issues such a decision, the superintendent shall provide notice of
the approval of the petition to the petitioner, each public school
within the school district and any other person or entity affected
by the modification, suspension or elimination of the reporting
requirement. If the superintendent of public schools of the school
district denies a petition to modify, suspend or eliminate a
requirement for a public school to report data or information to
the school district, the superintendent shall provide a written
explanation of the reasons for the denial to the petitioner. A
petitioner whose petition is denied pursuant to this paragraph may
submit a request for reconsideration of the denial to the
superintendent of schools of the school district or resubmit the
petition with additional information.
(c) If the petition requests to modify, suspend or eliminate a
requirement for a public school or the school district to report data
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
or information to any person or entity other than the school
district and the superintendent of schools of the school district
finds that the requirement to report data or information proposed
for modification, suspension or elimination is duplicative or
redundant or does not provide data that is used by the school
district to support educational outcomes, approve the petition and
forward the petition to the Department for consideration pursuant
to subsection 4 or deny the petition and provide a written
explanation to the petitioner of the reasons for the denial of the
petition. A petitioner whose petition is denied pursuant to this
paragraph may submit a request for reconsideration of the denial
to the superintendent of schools or governing body of the charter
school, as applicable, or resubmit the petition with additional
information.
4. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall evaluate
each petition forwarded to the Department pursuant to subsection
3 and, as part of such an evaluation, consider:
(a) Any information provided by the petitioner, including,
without limitation, any statements of support from school
leadership, governing bodies, teachers or other educational
personnel;
(b) The necessity of the reporting requirement for compliance
with federal or state law;
(c) Whether the information or data that is reported is
available through other means or reporting mechanisms;
(d) The administrative burden imposed by the reporting
requirement, with a focus on enabling teachers and administrators
to allocate their time efficiently to activities that support pupil
learning; and
(e) The potential impact of the modification, suspension or
elimination of the reporting requirement on transparency, the
accountability of public schools and school districts for the quality
of schools and the educational achievement of pupils, and the
accessibility of information and data concerning the educational
achievement of pupils.
5. Not later than 180 days after receiving a petition for
evaluation pursuant to subsection 4, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall approve the petition, deny the petition or request
additional information or revisions to the petition. If the
Superintendent requests additional information or revisions to the
petition, the Superintendent shall, not later than 90 days after
receiving such additional information or revisions, approve or
deny the petition.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
6. If, after conducting an evaluation of a petition pursuant to
subsection 4, the Superintendent of Public Instruction finds that
the requirement to report data or information proposed for
modification, suspension or elimination is duplicative or
redundant or does not provide data or information that is used by
the Department, the State Board or any other person or entity to
support educational outcomes, the Superintendent may issue an
order modifying, suspending or eliminating the requirement. If the
Superintendent of Public Instruction denies the petition, the
Superintendent shall provide notice of the denial and a written
explanation of the reasons for the denial to the petitioner and the
superintendent of schools of the school district or governing body
of the charter school, as applicable, that forwarded the petition to
the Department pursuant to subsection 3. If the Superintendent of
Public Instruction issues an order modifying, suspending or
eliminating a reporting requirement pursuant to this subsection,
the Superintendent shall:
(a) Provide notice of the order to the petitioner, the
superintendent of schools of the school district or the governing
body of the charter school that forwarded the petition to the
Department pursuant to subsection 3 and any other person or
entity affected by the modification, suspension or elimination of
the reporting requirement.
(b) Submit a report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Education or, if the Legislature is in session at the time notice
is provided pursuant to paragraph (a), to the Senate and Assembly
Standing Committees on Education, which describes the reporting
requirement modified, suspended or eliminated and any
recommendations for legislation to continue the modification,
suspension or elimination of the reporting requirement after the
expiration of the order.
7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if, pursuant to
this section, the superintendent of schools of a school district or
the Superintendent of Public Instruction issues a decision or order
modifying, suspending or eliminating a requirement to report data
or information, each person or entity to whom the requirement
applies shall comply with the decision of the superintendent of
schools of the school district or the order of the Superintendent of
Public Instruction, as applicable, until the expiration of the
decision or order. Any decision or order issued pursuant to this
section expires on July 1 of the next odd-numbered year following
its issuance.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
8. The superintendent of schools of each school district and
the governing body of each charter school shall report to the
Department in a standardized format prescribed by the
Department any information required by the Department to
complete the reporting of information required by subsection 9
concerning petitions submitted by teachers and school
administrators pursuant to subsection 2.
9. The Department shall include in a report submitted on or
before February 1 of each odd-numbered year to the Director of
the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Legislature:
(a) Information concerning the participation of teachers and
school administrators in the process to request the modification,
suspension or elimination of requirements for the reporting of
information or data, including, without limitation, data relating to
petitions submitted by teachers and administrators pursuant to
subsection 2;
(b) A summary of each petition received by the Department
pursuant to this section and the decision of the Superintendent of
Public Instruction on each such petition;
(c) The rationale of the Superintendent for the approval of
each petition that was approved by the Superintendent; and
(d) Any trends or systemic issues identified by the
Superintendent which are related to requirements for a public
school or school district to report information or data to another
person or entity.
10. The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section. The State Board may adopt regulations
to establish:
(a) A format for a petition submitted pursuant to this section
and procedures for the submission of such a petition;
(b) Criteria for evaluating such a petition;
(c) Procedures to ensure that teachers and school
administrators have input on decisions regarding requirements for
a public school or school district to report information or data to
another person or entity; and
(d) Any other requirements necessary to implement the
provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. NRS 385.111 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.111 1. The [State Board] Department shall prepare a
plan to improve the achievement of pupils enrolled in the public
schools in this State. The plan:
(a) Must be prepared in consultation with:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
(1) Employees of the Department [;] and members of the
State Board;
(2) At least one employee of a school district in a county
whose population is 100,000 or more, appointed by the Nevada
Association of School Boards;
(3) At least one employee of a school district in a county
whose population is less than 100,000, appointed by the Nevada
Association of School Boards; and
(4) At least one representative of the Statewide Council for
the Coordination of the Regional Training Programs created by NRS
391A.130, appointed by the Council; and
(b) May be prepared in consultation with:
(1) Representatives of institutions of higher education;
(2) Representatives of regional educational laboratories;
(3) Representatives of outside consultant groups;
(4) Representatives of the regional training programs for the
professional development of teachers and administrators created by
NRS 391A.120; and
(5) The Legislative Bureau of Educational Accountability
and Program Evaluation . [; and
(6) Other persons who the State Board determines are
appropriate.]
2. On or before March 31 of each year, the [State Board]
Department shall submit the plan or the revised plan, as applicable,
to the:
(a) Governor;
(b) Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education;
(c) [Legislative Bureau of Educational Accountability and
Program Evaluation;] State Board;
(d) Board of Regents of the University of Nevada;
(e) Board of trustees of each school district; and
(f) Governing body of each charter school.
Sec. 3. NRS 385.112 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.112 A plan to improve the achievement of pupils enrolled
in public schools in this State prepared pursuant to NRS 385.111
must include:
1. A review and analysis of the data upon which the report
required pursuant to NRS 385A.400 is based and a review and
analysis of any data that is more recent than the data upon which the
report is based.
2. The identification of any problems or factors common
among the school districts or charter schools in this State, as
revealed by the review and analysis.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
3. Strategies based upon evidence-based research, as defined in
20 U.S.C. § 7801(21), that will strengthen the core academic
subjects, as set forth in NRS 389.018.
4. Strategies to improve the academic achievement of pupils
enrolled in public schools in this State, including, without limitation,
strategies to:
(a) Instruct pupils who are not achieving to their fullest
potential, including, without limitation:
(1) The curriculum appropriate to improve achievement;
(2) The manner by which the instruction will improve the
achievement and proficiency of pupils on the examinations
administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 and the college and career
readiness assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610,
including, without limitation, the manner in which remediation will
be provided to pupils who require remediation based on the results
of an examination administered pursuant to NRS 390.610; and
(3) An identification of the instruction and curriculum that is
specifically designed to improve the achievement and proficiency of
pupils in each group identified in the statewide system of
accountability for public schools;
(b) Improve the literacy skills of pupils;
(c) Improve the development of English language skills and
academic achievement of pupils who are English learners;
(d) Increase the rate of attendance of pupils and reduce the
number of pupils who drop out of school;
(e) Integrate technology into the instructional and administrative
programs of the school districts;
(f) Manage effectively the discipline of pupils; and
(g) Enhance the professional development offered for the
teachers and administrators employed at public schools in this State
to include the activities set forth in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(42) and to
address the specific needs of the pupils enrolled in public schools in
this State, as deemed appropriate by the State Board.
5. Strategies designed to provide to the pupils enrolled in
middle school, junior high school and high school, the teachers and
counselors who provide instruction to those pupils, and the parents
and guardians of those pupils information concerning:
(a) The requirements for admission to an institution of higher
education and the opportunities for financial aid;
(b) The availability of Governor Guinn Millennium
Scholarships pursuant to NRS 396.911 to 396.945, inclusive, and
Nevada Promise Scholarships pursuant to NRS 396.961 to
396.9685, inclusive; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
(c) The need for a pupil to make informed decisions about his or
her curriculum in middle school, junior high school and high school
in preparation for success after graduation.
6. An identification, by category, of the employees of the
Department who are responsible for ensuring that each provision of
the plan is carried out effectively.
7. A timeline for carrying out the plan, including, without
limitation:
(a) The rate of improvement and progress which must be
attained annually in meeting the goals and benchmarks established
by the [State Board] Department pursuant to NRS 385.113; and
(b) For each provision of the plan, a timeline for carrying out
that provision, including, without limitation, a timeline for
monitoring whether the provision is carried out effectively.
8. For each provision of the plan, measurable criteria for
determining whether the provision has contributed toward
improving the academic achievement of pupils, increasing the rate
of attendance of pupils and reducing the number of pupils who drop
out of school.
9. Strategies to improve the allocation of resources from this
State, by program and by school district, in a manner that will
improve the academic achievement of pupils. If this State has a
financial analysis program that is designed to track educational
expenditures and revenues to individual schools, the State Board
shall use that statewide program in complying with this subsection.
If a statewide program is not available, the State Board shall use the
Department’s own financial analysis program in complying with
this subsection.
10. Based upon the reallocation of resources set forth in
subsection 9, the resources available to the State Board and the
Department to carry out the plan, including, without limitation, a
budget for the overall cost of carrying out the plan.
11. A summary of the effectiveness of appropriations made by
the Legislature to improve the academic achievement of pupils and
programs approved by the Legislature to improve the academic
achievement of pupils.
12. A 5-year strategic plan which identifies the recurring issues
in improving the achievement and proficiency of pupils in this State
and which establishes strategic goals to address those issues. The
5-year strategic plan must be:
(a) Based upon the data from previous years which is collected
by the Department for the plan developed pursuant to NRS 385.111;
and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
(b) Designed to track the progress made in achieving the
strategic goals established by the Department.
13. Any additional plans addressing the achievement and
proficiency of pupils adopted by the Department.
Sec. 4. NRS 385.113 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.113 The [State Board] Department shall:
1. In developing the plan to improve the achievement of pupils
enrolled in public schools pursuant to NRS 385.111, establish
clearly defined goals and benchmarks for improving the
achievement of pupils, including, without limitation, goals for:
(a) Improving proficiency results in core academic subjects;
(b) Increasing the number of pupils enrolled in public middle
schools and junior high schools, including, without limitation,
charter schools, who enter public high schools with the skills
necessary to succeed in high school;
(c) Improving the percentage of pupils who enroll in grade 9 and
who graduate from a public high school, including, without
limitation, a charter school, with a standard or higher diploma upon
completion;
(d) Improving the performance of pupils on standardized college
entrance examinations;
(e) Increasing the percentage of pupils enrolled in high schools
who enter postsecondary educational institutions or who are career
and workforce ready; and
(f) Reengaging disengaged youth who have dropped out of high
school or who are at risk of dropping out of high school, including,
without limitation, a mechanism for tracking and maintaining
communication with those youth who have dropped out of school or
who are at risk of doing so;
2. Review the plan annually to evaluate the effectiveness of the
plan;
3. Examine the timeline for implementing the plan and each
provision of the plan to determine whether the annual goals and
benchmarks have been attained;
4. Based upon the evaluation of the plan, make revisions, as
necessary, to ensure that:
(a) The goals and benchmarks set forth in the plan are being
attained in a timely manner; and
(b) The plan is designed to improve the academic achievement
of pupils enrolled in public schools in this State; and
5. Review the plans submitted pursuant to subsection 4 of NRS
385A.650 to:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
(a) Determine common problems identified by the principal of
each school; and
(b) Make recommendations to the Department concerning how
the Department can best support the needs of schools.
Sec. 5. NRS 385.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.230 1. The Department shall, in [conjunction]
collaboration with the State Board, prepare an annual report of the
state of public education in this State. The report must include,
without limitation:
(a) An analysis of each annual report of accountability prepared
by the State Board pursuant to NRS 385A.400;
(b) An update on the status of K-12 public education in this
State;
(c) A description of the most recent vision and mission
statements of the State Board and the Department, including,
without limitation, the progress made by the State Board and
Department in achieving those visions and missions;
(d) A description of the goals and benchmarks for improving the
academic achievement of pupils which are included in the plan to
improve the achievement of pupils required by NRS 385.111;
(e) A description of any policies, plans and programs for
promoting, extending and improving career and technical education
for pupils;
(f) A description of any significant changes made to the
collection, maintenance or transfer of data concerning pupils by the
Department, a school district, a sponsor of a charter school or a
university school for profoundly gifted pupils;
(g) Any new data elements, including, without limitation, data
about individual pupils and aggregated data about pupils within a
defined group, proposed for inclusion in the automated system of
accountability information for Nevada established pursuant to
NRS 385A.800;
(h) An analysis of the progress the public schools have made in
the previous year toward achieving the goals and benchmarks for
improving the academic achievement of pupils;
(i) An analysis of whether the standards and examinations
adopted by the State Board adequately prepare pupils for success in
postsecondary educational institutions and in career and workforce
readiness;
(j) An analysis of the extent to which school districts and charter
schools recruit and retain effective teachers and principals;
(k) An analysis of the ability of the automated system of
accountability information for Nevada established pursuant to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
NRS 385A.800 to link the achievement of pupils to the performance
of the individual teachers assigned to those pupils and to the
principals of the schools in which the pupils are enrolled;
(l) An analysis of the extent to which the lowest performing
public schools have improved the academic achievement of pupils
enrolled in those schools;
(m) A summary of the innovative educational programs
implemented by public schools which have demonstrated the ability
to improve the academic achievement of pupils, including, without
limitation:
(1) Pupils who are economically disadvantaged, as defined
by the State Board;
(2) Pupils from major racial and ethnic groups, as defined by
the State Board;
(3) Pupils with disabilities;
(4) Pupils who are English learners; and
(5) Pupils who are migratory children, as defined by the State
Board;
(n) A description of any plan of corrective action requested by
the Superintendent of Public Instruction from the board of trustees
of a school district or the governing body of a charter school and the
status of that plan;
(o) A summary of any measures taken by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction pursuant to NRS 388.4354 to ensure compliance
with a plan of corrective action or the order of a hearing officer; and
(p) An analysis of data on the discipline of pupils collected
pursuant to NRS 385A.840, including, without limitation:
(1) Trends in the data measuring changes in the discipline of
pupils; and
(2) Areas identified by the Department where the
Department will provide support to a public school to address trends
in the data on the discipline of pupils.
2. In odd-numbered years, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall present the report prepared pursuant to subsection 1
in person to the Governor and each standing committee of the
Legislature with primary jurisdiction over matters relating to K-12
public education at the beginning of each regular session of the
Legislature.
3. In even-numbered years, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall, on or before January 31, submit a written copy of
the report prepared pursuant to subsection 1 to the Governor and to
the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
Sec. 5.5. NRS 385.920 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.920 1. The Commission shall develop a statewide vision
and implementation plan to improve the public education system in
this State. The Commission shall:
(a) Conduct a benchmarking or gap analysis study comparing
the education policies of this State to the education policies of high-
performing international and domestic education systems.
(b) Make recommendations on how to adapt the appropriate
education policies of high-performing international and domestic
education systems into the public education system in this State.
(c) Identify objectives to put the education performance of
pupils in this State in parity with that of pupils in high-performing
international and domestic education systems and make
recommendations on how to meet the identified objectives.
(d) [Review the findings of any previous or ongoing studies
related to the funding of education and incorporate any relevant
findings.
(e) Develop an implementation plan for the recommendations
made pursuant to this section which includes an analysis of the costs
of the plan.] Review the academic progress made by pupils in each
public school. In performing such a review, the Commission shall:
(1) Use metrics to measure the academic achievement of
pupils which include, without limitation:
(I) The rate of graduation of pupils from high school by
type of diploma;
(II) The performance of pupils on standardized
examinations in math, reading and science;
(III) The number of credentials or other certifications in
fields of career and technical education earned by pupils;
(IV) The number of pupils who earn a passing score on
an advanced placement examination;
(V) The number of pupils who earn a passing score on
an international baccalaureate examination;
(VI) The percentage of pupils in each school who lack a
sufficient number of credits to graduate by the end of their 12th
grade year;
(VII) The percentage of pupils in each school who drop
out;
(VIII) The number of pupils who enroll in higher
education upon graduation;
(IX) The number of pupils who enroll in a vocational or
technical school or apprenticeship training program;
(X) The attendance rate for pupils;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
(XI) The number of violent acts by pupils and
disciplinary actions against pupils; and
(XII) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(2) Use metrics to measure the improvement of pupils
enrolled in elementary school in literacy which include, without
limitation:
(I) The literacy rate for pupils in the first, third and fifth
grades;
(II) The number of pupils in elementary school who
were promoted to the next grade after testing below proficient in
reading in the immediately preceding school year, separated by
grade level and by level of performance on the relevant test;
(III) The number of schools that employ a licensed
teacher designated to serve as a literacy specialist pursuant to NRS
388.159 and the number of schools that fail to employ and
designate such a licensed teacher; and
(IV) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(3) Use metrics to measure the ability of public schools to
hire and retain sufficient staff to meet the needs of the public
schools which include, without limitation:
(I) The rate of vacancies in positions for teachers,
support staff and administrators;
(II) The attendance rate for teachers;
(III) The retention rate for teachers;
(IV) The number of schools and classrooms within each
school in which the number of pupils in attendance exceeds the
designed capacity for the school or classroom;
(V) The number of classes taught by a substitute teacher
for more than 25 percent of the school year; and
(VI) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(4) Use metrics to measure the extent to which schools meet
the needs and expectations of pupils, parents or legal guardians of
pupils, teachers, administrators and other school employees which
include, without limitation:
(I) The results of an annual survey of satisfaction of
school employees;
(II) The results of an annual survey of satisfaction of
pupils, parents or legal guardians of pupils and graduates; and
(III) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(5) Identify the progress made by each school, school
district and charter school on improving the literacy of pupils
enrolled in elementary school;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
(6) Make recommendations for strategies to increase the
efficacy, efficiency, transparency and accountability of public
schools; and
(7) Make recommendations to the Department, school
districts and charter schools to improve the reporting, tracking,
monitoring, analyzing and dissemination of data relating to pupil
achievement and financial accountability, including, without
limitation, revisions to the metrics identified in subparagraphs (1)
to (4), inclusive.
(e) Review the reporting, tracking, monitoring, analyzing and
dissemination of data relating to pupil achievement and financial
accountability for the purpose of identifying and recommending
the elimination of any reporting that is redundant or does not
effectively provide measurable and informative data with which to
assess and improve the educational programs and priorities of this
State.
(f) Collaborate with the Department and the Commission on
School Funding to:
(1) Gather input relating to paragraph (g) from all
interested persons and entities;
(2) Establish a centralized repository of all reports of data
relating to pupil achievement and financial accountability and
make the centralized repository easily accessible on the Internet
website of the Department; and
(3) Develop a framework for the reporting of data relating
to pupil achievement and financial accountability that ensures
that data reported to the Department:
(I) Identifies areas of proficiency and growth of pupils
in this State;
(II) Identifies gaps in achievement among groups of
pupils;
(III) Identifies resource and funding allocations at the
school, program and pupil level;
(IV) Provides clear, actionable data to enable the
development of policies and practices to improve educational
outcomes in this State; and
(V) Is incorporated into the centralized repository
established pursuant to subparagraph (2) and is organized into
portals or tabs that feature information of interest and value to
interested parties, including, without limitation, the Department,
school districts, schools, administrators, teachers and support
staff, elected officials and parents.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
2. The Commission may employ and contract with the National
Center on Education and the Economy or an organization with
similar expertise and qualifications to carry out any of its functions
pursuant to this section.
3. The Commission may coordinate with educational entities
and business entities for information and expertise as necessary to
carry out any of its functions pursuant to this section.
4. On or before June 30 of each year, the Commission shall
submit a written report of its findings and any recommendations
for eliminating or amending reporting requirements for public
schools to the Governor, the Superintendent of Public Instruction,
the Legislative Commission and the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education. The Commission shall:
(a) Present any recommendations developed pursuant to this
subsection at a meeting of the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Education; and
(b) After consideration of the recommendations of the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Education, transmit the
recommendations or a revised version of the recommendations to
the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
for distribution to the Legislature.
Sec. 6. Chapter 385A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 6.1 to 6.6, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 6.1. The annual report of accountability prepared
pursuant to NRS 385A.070 must include information on progress
made toward meeting the goals set forth in the plans prepared
pursuant to NRS 385.111 and section 1.3 of this act.
Sec. 6.2. 1. The Department shall make every effort to
ensure that the statewide system of accountability for public
schools applies uniformly to all school districts and charter
schools in this State and complies with all requirements for the
accountability of public schools, including, without limitation,
requirements for the receipt of federal money under the
Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§
6301 et seq., as amended.
2. The statewide system of accountability for public schools
applies to all school districts and charter schools in this State,
regardless of size or demographics, and must, except as otherwise
provided in subsection 3 of section 6.4 of this act:
(a) Include a method to, on an annual basis, rate each school
district and sponsor of a charter school based upon the collective
performance of the public schools within the school district or the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
charter schools sponsored by the sponsor, as applicable, and the
achievement of district-wide or sponsor-wide performance targets,
as applicable, established pursuant to the statewide system of
accountability for public schools;
(b) Include a method to implement consequences, rewards,
supports and interventions for school districts and sponsors of
charter schools based upon such ratings, with a focus on
addressing disparities and improving outcomes for historically
underserved populations;
(c) Include a method to provide grants, financial support or
other resources, to the extent that money is available for that
purpose, to school districts or sponsors of charter schools
receiving one of the two lowest ratings of performance pursuant to
the statewide system of accountability for public schools; and
(d) Establish district-wide and sponsor-wide achievement
targets and performance targets for specific groups of pupils,
including, without limitation, pupils who are economically
disadvantaged, pupils from major racial and ethnic groups, pupils
with disabilities and pupils who are English learners. The district-
wide and sponsor-wide achievement targets and performance
targets must be based on aggregated metrics from the public
schools within the school district or the charter schools sponsored
by the sponsor, including, without limitation, measurements of the
progress and proficiency of pupils on the examinations
administered pursuant to NRS 390.105.
3. The statewide system of accountability for public schools
must:
(a) Ensure that data collected under the system is used to
promote transparency, equity and measurable progress in pupil
achievement in school districts throughout this State;
(b) Provide for the monitoring and oversight of the operations
of, and allocation of resources by, school districts and sponsors of
charter schools for the purpose of improving pupil outcomes; and
(c) Establish mechanisms for public reporting on the
performance of each school district and sponsor of a charter
school, including, without limitation, accountability metrics and a
detailed analysis of the progress of each school district and
sponsor of a charter school toward its district-wide or sponsor-
wide achievement targets, as applicable.
4. In administering the statewide system of accountability for
public schools as required by this section, including, without
limitation, the achievement and performance targets for school
districts and sponsors of charter schools and the criteria used to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
rate each school district and sponsor of a charter school, the
Department shall meaningfully consult with the parents and
guardians of pupils enrolled in public schools in this State.
5. The Department shall provide technical assistance and
guidance to school districts and sponsors of charter schools to
support compliance with the statewide system of accountability for
public schools and to address deficiencies identified through the
rating process.
6. Any consequences, rewards, supports or interventions
implemented pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 that
involve significant changes for the school district, sponsor of the
charter school or public school must, before implementation, be
proposed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction and
approved by the Public Education Oversight Board impaneled
pursuant to section 9.1 of this act.
Sec. 6.3. 1. On or before a date determined by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction, but not later than the third
Friday in August of each year, the Department shall determine
whether each school district and each sponsor of a charter school
is meeting the district-wide or sponsor-wide achievement targets
and performance targets, as applicable, established pursuant to
the statewide system of accountability for public schools.
2. The determination for a school district and a sponsor of a
charter school must be made pursuant to subsection 1 in
consultation with the board of trustees of the school district or the
sponsor of the charter school, as applicable, and must be based
only upon the information and data for those pupils who are
enrolled in the public schools within the school district or
sponsored by the sponsor of a charter school for a full academic
year. On or before a date determined by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction, but not later than the third Friday in August of
each year, the Department shall:
(a) Transmit the determination made for each school district
and each sponsor of a charter school to the board of trustees of
that school district or sponsor of that charter school, as
applicable;
(b) Transmit the determination made for each school district
and sponsor of a charter school to the State Board and the
Governor; and
(c) Post on the Internet website maintained by the Department
a report summarizing the determination made for each school
district and each sponsor of a charter school, including, without
limitation, the metrics for measuring the achievement and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
performance for each school district and each sponsor of a charter
school.
3. If the number of pupils in a particular group who are
enrolled in a public school in a school district or a charter school
is insufficient to yield statistically reliable information:
(a) The Department shall not determine that the school district
or sponsor of the charter school has failed to meet the
performance targets established pursuant to the statewide system
of accountability for public schools based solely upon that
particular group.
(b) The pupils in such a group must be included in the overall
count of pupils enrolled in the public schools in the school district
or charter schools sponsored by the sponsor of charter schools and
who took the examinations administered pursuant to
NRS 390.105.
 The Department shall use the mechanism approved by the
United States Department of Education for the statewide system of
accountability for public schools for determining the number of
pupils that must be in a group for that group to yield statistically
reliable information.
4. If an irregularity in testing administration or an
irregularity in testing security occurs at one or more public
schools in a school district or charter schools sponsored by a
sponsor of charter schools and the irregularity invalidates the test
scores of pupils, such test scores must be included in the aggregate
of scores reported for the school district or sponsor of charter
schools, the attendance of those pupils must be counted toward the
total number of pupils who took the examinations administered
pursuant to NRS 390.105 and the pupils must be included in the
total number of pupils who were required to take the
examinations. The determination made pursuant to subsection 1
for a school district or sponsor of charter schools must reflect any
such irregularity and describe the impact of any such irregularity
on the determination.
5. If the determination made pursuant to subsection 1
indicates that a school district or sponsor of a charter school is not
meeting district-wide or sponsor-wide achievement targets or
performance targets, the Superintendent of Public Instruction
must prepare recommendations for tiered interventions consistent
with the statewide system of accountability for public schools.
Such recommendations must be submitted to the Public Education
Oversight Board impaneled pursuant to section 9.1 of this act for
approval before implementation.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Irregularity in testing administration” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 390.255.
(b) “Irregularity in testing security” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 390.260.
Sec. 6.4. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
based upon the determinations made by the Department pursuant
to section 6.3 of this act, the Department shall, on or before a date
determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction but not
later than the third Friday in August of each year, issue a
preliminary rating for each school district or sponsor of a charter
school in accordance with the statewide system of accountability
for public schools.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3:
(a) Before making a final rating for a school district or
sponsor of a charter school, the Department shall provide the
school district or sponsor of a charter school an opportunity to
review the data upon which the preliminary rating is based and to
present evidence or corrections. The Department shall notify the
board of trustees of the school district or the sponsor of the charter
school of the opportunities provided pursuant to this paragraph
and provide a reasonable period within which to present evidence
or corrections pursuant to this paragraph.
(b) After considering any evidence or corrections submitted by
a school district or sponsor of a charter school within the
reasonable period prescribed by the Department pursuant to
paragraph (a), the Department shall, on or before a date
determined by the Superintendent of Public Instruction but not
later than the third Friday in September of each year, make a final
determination concerning the rating for the school district.
3. The Department may temporarily waive or otherwise pause
the requirement to make ratings for school districts or sponsors of
charter schools that comply with 20 U.S.C. § 6311(c) pursuant to
this section if the United States Department of Education grants a
waiver from or otherwise pauses the requirements of 20 U.S.C. §
6311(c).
4. On or before a date determined by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction but not later than the third Friday in September
of each year, the Department shall:
(a) Post on the Internet website maintained by the Department
the determinations and final ratings made for all school districts
and sponsors of charter schools in this State, which must be
presented in a clear and understandable format; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
(b) Submit a report summarizing the determinations and final
ratings made for all school districts and sponsors of charter
schools in this State, including, without limitation, detailed data
and information on the district-wide performance of each school
district and sponsor-wide performance of each sponsor of a
charter school and compliance with state accountability standards,
to:
(1) The Governor;
(2) The State Board; and
(3) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education
and the next regular session of the Legislature.
5. If the final determination made pursuant to subsection 2
indicates that a school district or sponsor of a charter school has
received one of the two lowest performance ratings, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction shall propose specified tiered
interventions consistent with the statewide system of accountability
for public schools. Such proposed interventions must be approved
by the Public Education Oversight Board impaneled pursuant to
section 9.1 of this act before implementation.
Sec. 6.5. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction:
(a) Shall designate a school district or sponsor of a charter
school as a low-performing school district or sponsor of a charter
school if:
(1) The Department has determined that the school district
or sponsor of the charter school has failed to meet the district-wide
or sponsor-wide achievement targets and performance targets, as
applicable, established pursuant to the statewide system of
accountability for public schools; or
(2) The school district or sponsor of the charter school
receives one of the two lowest ratings of performance pursuant to
the statewide system of accountability for public schools.
(b) May designate a school district or sponsor of a charter
school as a low-performing school district or sponsor of a charter
school if:
(1) The administration of the school district or the sponsor
of the charter school is characterized by instability or
unsatisfactory performance in leadership, including, without
limitation, a dismissal, resignation or removal of the
superintendent of schools of the school district, that has a
significant impact on the operations of the school district or the
sponsor of the charter school and the educational outcomes for
pupils;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
(2) The resignation or removal of members of the board of
trustees of the school district or the sponsor of the charter school
results in multiple vacancies that disrupt the continuity of
leadership of the school district or the sponsor of the charter
school and impacts the ability of the board of trustees to effectively
govern the school district or charter school;
(3) The school district or sponsor of the charter school
experiences an unexpected and severe financial hardship,
including, without limitation, a financial hardship resulting from
financial malfeasance, financial mismanagement or any other
condition, that threatens the fiscal stability and operational
capacity of the school district or sponsor of the charter school; or
(4) Based on data and information concerning the
achievement and performance of pupils enrolled in public schools
in the school district or sponsored by the sponsor of charter
schools, the allocation of resources by the school district or the
sponsor of the charter school or the availability of educational
programs among public schools in the school district or sponsored
by the sponsor of charter schools and specific groups of pupils
enrolled in those schools, the school district or sponsor of the
charter school is characterized by systemic inequity in educational
access, resources or outcomes among specific groups of pupils,
including, without limitation, among pupils who are economically
disadvantaged, pupils from major racial and ethnic groups, pupils
with disabilities and pupils who are English learners.
(c) May designate a school district or sponsor of a charter
school as a low-performing school district or sponsor of a charter
school if a state of emergency for the school district or sponsor of
the charter school is declared. Such a state of emergency may be
declared if:
(1) The Governor, the State Board or the Chair of the
Legislative Commission issues a written complaint to the board of
trustees of a school district or the sponsor of a charter school that
identifies a material noncompliance with any state law by the
board of trustees of the school district or the sponsor of the charter
school;
(2) The board of trustees of the school district or the
sponsor of the charter school does not provide a satisfactory plan
of correction within 60 days after receiving the written complaint;
(3) After the time to provide a plan of correction has
elapsed, the State Board finds the school district or sponsor of the
charter school has engaged in a material noncompliance with
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
state law and votes to recommend impaneling the Public
Education Oversight Board pursuant to section 9.1 of this act; and
(4) The Superintendent of Public Instruction formally
declares a state of emergency, specifying:
(I) The actions that failed to comply with state law;
(II) The date of the first meeting of the Public
Education Oversight Board, which must occur not later than 30
days after the declaration of a state of emergency;
(III) The date on which the state of emergency
terminates, which must occur not later than 90 days after the state
of emergency is declared; and
(IV) That the state of emergency may be extended for an
additional 90 days if a majority of members of the Public
Education Oversight Board vote to do so.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall designate a
school district or sponsor of a charter school as an
underperforming school district or sponsor of a charter school if:
(a) For at least 2 consecutive school years, the Superintendent
has designated the school district or sponsor of the charter school
as a low-performing school district of sponsor of a charter school
pursuant to subsection 1; or
(b) The Superintendent:
(1) Designated the school district or sponsor of the charter
school as a low-performing school district or sponsor of a charter
school pursuant to subsection 1 in the current or the immediately
preceding school year; and
(2) Determines that one or more of the conditions set forth
in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 exist for the school district or
sponsor of the charter school.
3. Upon designating a school district or sponsor of a charter
school as low-performing or underperforming pursuant to this
section, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall propose
specific tiered interventions consistent with the statewide system of
accountability for public schools. Such interventions must be
approved by the Public Education Oversight Board impaneled
pursuant to section 9.1 of this act before implementation.
Sec. 6.6. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
designate a public school, other than a public school approved by
the State Board to be rated using the alternative performance
framework prescribed by the State Board pursuant to NRS
385A.730, as a low-performing school if, in at least 2 of the
immediately preceding 3 school years, at least one of the following
criteria apply to the public school:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
(a) The public school receives one of the two lowest ratings of
performance pursuant to the statewide system of accountability for
public schools.
(b) The pupils enrolled in the public school demonstrate
proficiency in English language arts and mathematics in the
bottom 20th percentile of statewide performance metrics, as
determined by the Department.
(c) For high schools, the average graduation rate is less than
60 percent for the immediately preceding 3 school years or less
than 70 percent for the immediately preceding 5 school years.
(d) For elementary schools, more than 50 percent of the pupils
enrolled in the elementary school do not achieve adequate
proficiency in the subject area of reading before the completion of
grade 3.
2. On the day that the Department posts on the Internet
website maintained by the Department the determinations and
final ratings made for all public schools in this State pursuant to
NRS 385A.720:
(a) The Department shall post on the Internet website
maintained by the Department a list of public schools that are
designated as low-performing schools pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Each school district or sponsor of a charter school with at
least one public school in the school district or charter school on
the list of public schools that are designated as low-performing
schools pursuant to subsection 1 shall post the list on the Internet
website maintained by the school district or sponsor of the charter
school, as applicable; and
(c) The Department shall provide the list of public schools that
are designated as low-performing schools pursuant to subsection 1
to the State Board as part of the report of data provided to the
State Board pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 385A.080.
3. The principal of each public school designated as a low-
performing school shall notify the parents and legal guardians of
pupils enrolled in the public school of the designation of the
public school as a low-performing school and the actions that will
be taken to address the areas of deficiency that caused the
designation. The notice must:
(a) Contain a summary of the data and information
concerning the performance of pupils enrolled in the public
school and the specific areas identified for improvement;
(b) Provide information on any available support or resources
for pupils and their families, including, without limitation,
academic and social-emotional resources;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 36 –
(c) Contain a detailed improvement plan outlining the
measures the public school intends to implement, with clearly
defined goals and timelines for achieving those goals; and
(d) Provide information on alternative educational options
available to pupils residing in the zone of attendance of the public
school, including, without limitation, policies regarding a transfer
to another public school, if applicable.
4. Upon designating a public school as a low-performing
school pursuant to subsection 1, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall propose specific school-level tiered interventions
consistent with the statewide system of accountability for public
schools. Such proposed interventions must be submitted to the
Public Education Oversight Board impaneled pursuant to section
9.1 of this act for approval before implementation.
Sec. 7. NRS 385A.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.070 1. The board of trustees of each school district in
this State, in cooperation with associations recognized by the State
Board as representing licensed educational personnel in the district,
shall adopt a program providing for the accountability of the school
district to the residents of the district and to the State Board for the
quality of the schools and the educational achievement of the pupils
in the district, including, without limitation, pupils enrolled in
charter schools sponsored by the school district. The board of
trustees of each school district shall report the information required
by NRS 385A.070 to 385A.320, inclusive, and section 6.1 of this
act for each charter school sponsored by the school district. The
information for charter schools must be reported separately.
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall, on or
before December 31 of each year, prepare for the immediately
preceding school year a single annual report of accountability
concerning the educational goals and objectives of the school
district, the information prescribed by NRS 385A.070 to 385A.320,
inclusive, and section 6.1 of this act and such other information as
is directed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. A separate
reporting for a group of pupils must not be made pursuant to NRS
385A.070 to 385A.320, inclusive, and section 6.1 of this act if the
number of pupils in that group is insufficient to yield statistically
reliable information or the results would reveal personally
identifiable information about an individual pupil. The Department
shall use the mechanism approved by the United States Department
of Education for the statewide system of accountability for public
schools for determining the minimum number of pupils that must be
in a group for that group to yield statistically reliable information.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 37 –
3. The State Public Charter School Authority, each college or
university within the Nevada System of Higher Education and each
city or county that sponsors a charter school shall, on or before
December 31 of each year, prepare for the immediately preceding
school year an annual report of accountability of the charter schools
sponsored by the State Public Charter School Authority or
institution, as applicable, concerning the accountability information
prescribed by the Department pursuant to this section. The
Department, in consultation with the State Public Charter School
Authority, each college or university within the Nevada System of
Higher Education and each city or county that sponsors a charter
school, shall prescribe by regulation the information that must be
prepared by the State Public Charter School Authority and
institution, as applicable, which must include, without limitation, the
information contained in subsection 2 and NRS 385A.070 to
385A.320, inclusive, and section 6.1 of this act, as applicable to
charter schools. The Department shall provide for public
dissemination of the annual report of accountability prepared
pursuant to this section by posting a copy of the report on the
Internet website maintained by the Department.
4. The annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to this
section must be presented in an understandable and uniform format
and, to the extent practicable, provided in a language that parents
can understand.
Sec. 7.3. NRS 385A.080 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
385A.080 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall:
(a) Prescribe forms for the reports required pursuant to NRS
385A.070 and provide the forms to the respective school districts,
the State Public Charter School Authority, each college or university
within the Nevada System of Higher Education and each city or
county that sponsors a charter school.
(b) Provide statistical information and technical assistance to the
school districts, the State Public Charter School Authority, each
college or university within the Nevada System of Higher Education
and each city or county that sponsors a charter school to ensure that
the reports provide comparable information with respect to each
school in each district, each charter school and among the districts
and charter schools throughout this State.
(c) Consult with a representative of the:
(1) Nevada State Education Association;
(2) Nevada Association of School Boards;
(3) Nevada Association of School Administrators;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 38 –
(4) Nevada Parent Teacher Association;
(5) Budget Division of the Office of Finance;
(6) Legislative Counsel Bureau; and
(7) Charter School Association of Nevada,
 concerning the program adopted pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
385A.070 and consider any advice or recommendations submitted
by the representatives with respect to the program.
(d) Establish metrics of performance for public schools for each
grade which include, without limitation, metrics for:
(1) The growth and proficiency of pupils in literacy,
mathematics and science;
(2) The engagement and proficiency of pupils in courses for
college and career readiness; and
(3) The retention and recruitment of teachers and education
support professionals.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may consult with
representatives of parent groups other than the Nevada Parent
Teacher Association concerning the program adopted pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 385A.070 and consider any advice or
recommendations submitted by the representatives with respect to
the program.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction and each school
district and charter school shall:
(a) Publish the metrics established pursuant to paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 on their respective Internet websites; and
(b) On or before October 1 of each year, report data relating to
each metric established pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 to
the Governor, the State Board and the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmission to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education.
4. To the greatest extent possible, the Superintendent of
Public Instruction shall, when obtaining data relating to each
metric established pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1:
(a) Use information that has previously been submitted to the
Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Department; and
(b) Avoid duplicative requests for information.
Sec. 7.4. NRS 385A.090 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
385A.090 1. [On or before September 30] Not later than 10
days after the date determined by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction, but not later than the third Friday in August of each
year:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 39 –
(a) The board of trustees of each school district, the State Public
Charter School Authority, each college or university within the
Nevada System of Higher Education and each city or county that
sponsors a charter school shall provide written notice that the report
required pursuant to NRS 385A.070 is available on the Internet
website maintained by the school district, State Public Charter
School Authority, institution or city or county, if any, or otherwise
provide written notice of the availability of the report. The written
notice must be provided to the:
(1) Governor;
(2) State Board;
(3) Department;
(4) Committee;
(5) Bureau; and
(6) Attorney General, with a specific reference to the
information that is reported pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection
1 of NRS 385A.250.
(b) The board of trustees of each school district, the State Public
Charter School Authority, each college or university within the
Nevada System of Higher Education and each city or county that
sponsors a charter school shall provide for public dissemination of
the annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to NRS
385A.070 by posting a copy of the report on the Internet website
maintained by the school district, the State Public Charter School
Authority, the institution or the city or county, if any. If a school
district does not maintain a website, the district shall otherwise
provide for public dissemination of the annual report by providing a
copy of the report to the schools in the school district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district, the
residents of the district, and the parents and guardians of pupils
enrolled in schools in the district, including, without limitation, each
charter school sponsored by the district. If the State Public Charter
School Authority, the institution, the city or the county does not
maintain a website, the State Public Charter School Authority, the
institution, the city or the county, as applicable, shall otherwise
provide for public dissemination of the annual report by providing a
copy of the report to each charter school it sponsors and the parents
and guardians of pupils enrolled in each charter school it sponsors.
2. Upon the request of the Governor, the Attorney General, an
entity described in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or a member of the
general public, the board of trustees of a school district, the State
Public Charter School Authority, a college or university within the
Nevada System of Higher Education or a city or county that
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 40 –
sponsors a charter school, as applicable, shall provide a portion or
portions of the report required pursuant to NRS 385A.070.
Sec. 7.5. NRS 385A.200 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
385A.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to NRS
385A.070 must include information on pupil achievement and
school performance, including, without limitation, pupil
achievement for each school in the district and the district as a
whole, including, without limitation, each charter school sponsored
by the district. The board of trustees of the district shall base its
report on the results of the examinations administered pursuant to
NRS 390.105 and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610 and shall compare the results
of those examinations for the school year for which the annual
report is being prepared with those of previous school years. The
report must include, for each school in the district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district, and
each grade in which the examinations and assessments were
administered:
(a) The number of pupils who took the examinations and a
record of attendance for the period in which the examinations were
administered, including an explanation of any difference in the
number of pupils who took the examinations and the number of
pupils who are enrolled in the school.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.070, pupil achievement, reported separately by gender and
reported separately for the groups of pupils identified in the
statewide system of accountability for public schools.
(c) A comparison of the achievement of pupils in each group
identified in the statewide system of accountability for public
schools with the performance targets established for that group.
(d) The percentage of pupils who were not tested.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.070, the percentage of pupils who were not tested, reported
separately by gender and reported separately for the groups
identified in the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
(f) The most recent 3-year trend in pupil achievement in each
subject area tested and each grade level tested pursuant to NRS
390.105 and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610, which may include
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 41 –
information regarding the trend in the achievement of pupils for
more than 3 years, if such information is available.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of NRS
385A.720, the rating of each public school in the district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district,
pursuant to the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
(h) Information on whether each school in the district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district, has
made progress based upon the model adopted by the Department
pursuant to NRS 390.125.
(i) Information that compares the results of pupils in the school
district, including, without limitation, pupils enrolled in charter
schools sponsored by the district, with the results of pupils
throughout this State [.] and, where applicable, with the results of
pupils in comparable school districts in other states. The
information required by this paragraph must be provided in
consultation with the Department to ensure the accuracy of the
comparison.
(j) For each school in the district, including, without limitation,
each charter school sponsored by the district, information that
compares the results of pupils in the school with the results of pupils
throughout the school district and throughout this State [.] and,
where applicable, with the results of pupils in schools in
comparable school districts in other states. The information
required by this paragraph must be provided in consultation with the
Department to ensure the accuracy of the comparison.
2. If the Department temporarily waives or otherwise pauses
the requirement to administer examinations that comply with 20
U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2) pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS 390.105, the
requirement of subsection 1 to include certain information in the
annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to NRS 385A.070
does not apply for the period of time that such a waiver or pause is
effective.
Sec. 8. NRS 385A.230 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.230 1. The annual report of accountability prepared
pursuant to NRS 385A.070 must include information on teachers,
other licensed educational personnel and paraprofessionals,
including, without limitation:
(a) Information on the professional qualifications of teachers
and other licensed educational personnel employed by each school
in the district and the district as a whole, including, without
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 42 –
limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district. The
information must include, without limitation:
(1) The total number of:
(I) Teachers and other licensed educational personnel
employed at each school;
(II) Vacancies at each school ; [which are not filled by a
teacher who has a contract to teach at the school on a full-time basis,
as determined by the Commission on Professional Standards in
Education;]
(III) Teachers and other licensed educational personnel
employed at each school who provide instruction in a grade level or
subject area for which they do not meet the requirements for
licensure or do not hold a required endorsement;
(IV) Teachers and other licensed educational personnel
employed at each school who are inexperienced, as defined by the
Commission on Professional Standards in Education; and
(V) Employees at each school whose overall performance
was determined to be highly effective, effective, developing or
ineffective under the statewide performance evaluation system.
(2) The percentage of:
(I) Teachers and other licensed educational personnel
employed by the school district who are employed at each school;
(II) Vacancies at each school ; [which are not filled by a
teacher who has a contract to teach at the school on a full-time basis,
as determined by the Commission on Professional Standards in
Education;]
(III) Teachers and other licensed educational personnel
employed at each school who provide instruction in a grade level or
subject area for which they do not meet the requirements for
licensure or do not hold a required endorsement;
(IV) Teachers and other licensed educational personnel
employed at each school who are inexperienced, as defined by the
Commission on Professional Standards in Education; and
(V) Employees at each school whose overall performance
was determined to be highly effective, effective, developing or
ineffective under the statewide performance evaluation system.
(3) For each middle school, junior high school and high
school:
(I) The number of persons employed as substitute
teachers for 20 consecutive days or more in the same classroom or
assignment, designated as long-term substitute teachers, including
the total number of days long-term substitute teachers were
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 43 –
employed at each school, identified by grade level and subject area;
and
(II) The number of persons employed as substitute
teachers for less than 20 consecutive days, designated as short-term
substitute teachers, including the total number of days short-term
substitute teachers were employed at each school, identified by
grade level and subject area.
(4) For each elementary school:
(I) The number of persons employed as substitute
teachers for 20 consecutive days or more in the same classroom or
assignment, designated as long-term substitute teachers, including
the total number of days long-term substitute teachers were
employed at each school, identified by grade level; and
(II) The number of persons employed as substitute
teachers for less than 20 consecutive days, designated as short-term
substitute teachers, including the total number of days short-term
substitute teachers were employed at each school, identified by
grade level.
(b) Records of attendance of teachers who provide instruction,
for each school in the district and the district as a whole, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district. The
records of attendance maintained by a school for purposes of this
paragraph must include the number of teachers who are in
attendance at school and the number of teachers who are absent
from school. A teacher shall be deemed in attendance if the teacher
is excused from being present in the classroom by the school in
which the teacher is employed for one of the following reasons:
(1) Acquisition of knowledge or skills relating to the
professional development of the teacher; or
(2) Assignment of the teacher to perform duties for
cocurricular or extracurricular activities of pupils.
(c) Information on the paraprofessionals employed by each
public school in the district, including, without limitation, each
charter school sponsored by the district. The information must
include:
(1) The number of paraprofessionals employed at the school;
(2) The number of paraprofessionals employed at the school
who do not satisfy the requirements prescribed by the Department to
comply with 20 U.S.C. § 6311(g)(2)(M);
(3) The percentage of paraprofessionals employed by the
school district who do not satisfy the requirements prescribed by the
Department to comply with 20 U.S.C. § 6311(g)(2)(M) who are
employed at the school; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 44 –
(4) Any other information required by regulation of the State
Board.
2. As used in this section [, “paraprofessional”] :
(a) “Paraprofessional” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 391.008.
(b) “Vacancy” means an unfilled position, including, without
limitation, any positions that are filled by a substitute teacher or
external contractor.
Sec. 8.3. NRS 385A.600 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
385A.600 1. The Department shall make every effort to
obtain the approval necessary from the United States Department of
Education to ensure that the statewide system of accountability for
public schools complies with all requirements for the receipt of
federal money under the Elementary and Secondary Education Act
of 1965, 20 U.S.C. §§ 6301 et seq., as amended.
2. The statewide system of accountability applies to all public
schools, regardless of Title I status, and must, except as otherwise
provided in subsection 3 of NRS 385A.720:
(a) Include a method to, on an annual basis, rate each public
school based upon the performance of the school and based upon
whether each public school meets the school achievement targets
and performance targets established pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability;
(b) Include a method to implement consequences, rewards and
supports for public schools based upon the ratings;
(c) Include a method to provide grants and other financial
support, to the extent that money is available from legislative
appropriation, to public schools receiving one of the two lowest
ratings of performance pursuant to the statewide system of
accountability for public schools; and
(d) Establish school achievement targets and performance
targets for public schools and performance targets for specific
groups of pupils, including, without limitation, pupils who are
economically disadvantaged, pupils from major racial and ethnic
groups, pupils with disabilities and pupils who are English learners.
The school achievement targets and performance targets must:
(1) Be based primarily upon the measurement of the progress
and proficiency of pupils on the examinations administered pursuant
to NRS 390.105; [and]
(2) For elementary schools, include the proportion of pupils
demonstrating adequate proficiency in the subject area of reading
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 45 –
in accordance with NRS 392.748 to 392.785, inclusive, and
adequate progress toward achieving such proficiency; and
(3) For high schools, include the rate of graduation and the
rate of attendance.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of NRS
385A.720, the statewide system of accountability for public schools
may include a method to:
(a) On an annual basis, rate school districts based upon the
performance of the public schools within the school district and
whether those public schools meet the school achievement targets
and performance targets established pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability; and
(b) Implement consequences, rewards and supports for school
districts based upon the ratings.
Sec. 8.5. NRS 385A.750 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
385A.750 The Department shall prescribe a form for notice to
parents and guardians concerning the rating of a public school
designated by the Superintendent of Public Instruction as a low-
performing school pursuant to section 6.6 of this act or the
designation of a school district as a low-performing or
underperforming [.] school district pursuant to section 6.5 of this
act. Such notice must include information regarding any tiered
interventions approved by the Public Education Oversight Board
pursuant to section 6.5 or 6.6 of this act.
Sec. 8.7. NRS 385A.810 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
385A.810 The board of trustees of each school district shall:
1. Adopt and maintain the program prescribed by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to NRS 385A.820 for
the collection, validation and maintenance of electronic records of
individual pupils and the transfer of data from [the] such electronic
records [of individual pupils] by the school district, the sponsor of
each charter school and each university school for profoundly
gifted pupils to the automated system of information [, including,
without limitation, the development of plans for the educational
technology which is necessary to adopt and maintain the program;]
established by the Department pursuant to NRS 385A.800;
2. Provide to the Department electronic data concerning pupils
[as required] in accordance with the program prescribed by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to NRS 385A.820 [;] ,
including, without limitation, the data required to be reported
pursuant to NRS 385A.840 and any other data requested by the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 46 –
Department to carry out its functions or required to be reported to
the Department by state or federal law or regulations; and
3. Ensure that an electronic record is maintained in accordance
with subsection 3 of NRS 385A.830.
Sec. 8.8. NRS 385A.820 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
385A.820 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall:
[1.] (a) Prescribe a uniform program throughout this State for
the collection, validation and maintenance of electronic records of
individual pupils and the transfer of data [that] from such records,
which each school district must adopt [,] and which must include
standardized software;
[2.] (b) Prescribe the data to be collected and reported to the
Department by each school district and each sponsor of a charter
school pursuant to NRS 385A.810 and by each university school for
profoundly gifted pupils;
[3.] (c) Prescribe the format for the data;
[4.] (d) Prescribe the date by which each school district shall
report the data to the Department;
[5.] (e) Prescribe the date by which each charter school shall
report the data to the sponsor of the charter school;
[6.] (f) Prescribe the date by which each university school for
profoundly gifted pupils shall report the data to the Department;
[7.] (g) Prescribe standardized codes for all data elements used
within the automated system and all exchanges of data within the
automated system, including, without limitation, data concerning:
[(a)] (1) Individual pupils;
[(b)] (2) Individual teachers;
[(c)] (3) Individual schools and school districts; and
[(d)] (4) Programs and financial information;
[8.] (h) Provide technical assistance to each school district to
ensure that the data from each public school in the school district,
including, without limitation, each charter school and university
school for profoundly gifted pupils located within the school
district, is compatible with the automated system of information and
comparable to the data reported by other school districts; and
[9.] (i) Provide for the analysis and reporting of the data in the
automated system of information.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may deduct
money from the apportionment otherwise due to a school district,
charter school or university school for profoundly gifted pupils
pursuant to NRS 387.124 to compensate the Department for costs
to collect, validate and maintain electronic records of individual
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 47 –
pupils and financial accountability information as necessary to
report on pupil achievement and financial accountability on
behalf of the school district, charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils, including, without limitation, costs to
purchase licenses for software to collect, validate and maintain
such electronic records and financial accountability information.
Sec. 9. Chapter 386 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 9.1 to 9.7, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 9.1. 1. A Public Education Oversight Board,
consisting of five members, may be impaneled pursuant to this
section.
2. A Public Education Oversight Board impaneled pursuant
to this section must consist of the following members:
(a) The Governor, who serves as Chair;
(b) A member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, who
must not be a legislator and must have experience as an educator
or administrator;
(c) A member appointed by the Majority Leader of the Senate,
who must not be a legislator and must have experience as an
educator or administrator;
(d) The Superintendent of Public Instruction; and
(e) One member who holds a license to teach issued pursuant
to chapter 391 of NRS, is employed at a public school in the school
district for which the Board is impaneled and is not a legislator,
appointed by the Legislative Commission.
3. The Board may meet or exercise authority granted
pursuant to this section to review and act upon recommendations
for tiered interventions at a school district, charter school or
public school, as applicable, that are proposed by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to sections 6.2, 6.3,
6.4, 6.5 and 6.6 of this act.
4. The Public Education Oversight Board possesses any
authority granted to the board of trustees of the school district or
the governing body of the charter school pursuant to this title,
including, without limitation, access to all school property,
buildings and facilities within the school district that is necessary
to exercise the authority granted pursuant to subsection 3.
5. The board of trustees of the school district or the governing
body of the charter school must not conduct any meetings or take
any actions that interfere with the scope of the authority granted
to the Public Education Oversight Board pursuant to subsection 4.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 48 –
6. A meeting held by the Public Education Oversight Board
must be located in the county in which the school district or
charter school for which the Board has been impaneled is located.
A member of the Board may attend such a meeting by audiovisual
means or other electronic means. Such a meeting must provide for
participation by audiovisual means or other electronic means.
7. As used in this section, “Board” means a Public Education
Oversight Board impaneled pursuant to this section.
Sec. 9.3. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
place on probation a school district or sponsor of a charter school
that the Superintendent has designated as an underperforming
school district or sponsor of a charter school if the designation is
made pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of section 6.5 of
this act. A period of probation imposed pursuant to this section
must not exceed 2 school years.
2. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall notify the
board of trustees of a school district or sponsor of a charter school
that has been designated as an underperforming school district or
sponsor of a charter school and that the Superintendent is placing
the school district or sponsor of the charter school on probation
pursuant to this section. Upon receipt of such a notice, the board
of trustees of the school district or sponsor of the charter school
shall:
(a) Direct the superintendent of schools of the school district
or the executive director of the sponsor of the charter school to
prepare and submit to the Department a school district or sponsor
of a charter school performance improvement plan, as applicable,
that satisfies the requirements of subsection 2 of section 9.7 of this
act; and
(b) Prepare and, not later than 90 days after the date of the
notice received pursuant to this subsection, submit to the
Department a school board or sponsor of a charter school
improvement plan to address deficiencies in the governance of the
school district or sponsor of the charter school, as applicable, and
support the implementation of the school district or sponsor of the
charter school performance improvement plan, as applicable,
prepared pursuant to paragraph (a).
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall:
(a) Review and approve or deny approval of the school board
or sponsor of a charter school improvement plan. If the
Superintendent denies approval of the school board or sponsor of
a charter school improvement plan, the Superintendent shall
notify the board of trustees of the school district or the sponsor of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 49 –
the charter school of the reasons for denying approval of the plan.
Not later than 30 days after receiving such notice, the board of
trustees or sponsor of the charter school shall prepare and submit
to the Superintendent revisions to the school board or sponsor of a
charter school improvement plan, as applicable. The board of
trustees of the school district or the sponsor of the charter school
shall implement a school board or sponsor of a charter school
improvement plan approved by the Superintendent.
(b) Monitor the implementation of the school board or sponsor
of a charter school improvement plan and the school district or
sponsor of a charter school performance improvement plan during
the period of probation imposed pursuant to this section.
(c) Provide technical guidance and support to the board of
trustees or sponsor of the charter school to support the
implementation of the school board or sponsor of a charter school
improvement plan and the school district or sponsor of a charter
school performance improvement plan.
(d) Notify the Public Education Oversight Board impaneled
pursuant to section 9.1 of this act of the designation of the school
district or sponsor of the charter school as underperforming and
the probationary status of the school district or sponsor of the
charter school and provide updates in regular intervals to the
Public Education Oversight Board concerning the progress made
in implementing plans as monitored pursuant to paragraph (b).
(e) Post on the Internet website maintained by the Department,
in the five most common languages other than English primarily
spoken in the households within the school district or charter
schools operating under the school board or sponsor of a charter
school improvement plan:
(1) The school board or sponsor of a charter school
improvement plan approved by the Superintendent pursuant to
this subsection;
(2) Quarterly reports summarizing the progress of the
board of trustees or sponsor of the charter school in implementing
the school board or sponsor of a charter school improvement plan,
as applicable, including, without limitation, milestones that have
been achieved and areas requiring improvement; and
(3) An annual performance review of the board of trustees
or sponsor of the charter school that identifies improvements in
the governance of the school district by the board of trustees or of
the sponsor of the charter school, deficiencies in such governance
and any recommendations for additional action by the board of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 50 –
trustees or sponsor of the charter school to improve governance of
the school district or the sponsor of the charter school.
4. The board of trustees of a school district or sponsor of a
charter school operating under a school board or sponsor of a
charter school improvement plan shall:
(a) Post on the Internet website of the school district or
sponsor of the charter school, in the five most common languages
other than English primarily spoken in the households within the
school district or charter schools sponsored by the sponsor of
charter schools:
(1) The approved school board or sponsor of a charter
school improvement plan, not later than 10 business days after the
board of trustees or sponsor of the charter school has received
notice from the Superintendent of Public Instruction of the
approval of the plan; and
(2) Quarterly reports summarizing the progress of the
board of trustees or sponsor of the charter school in implementing
the school board or sponsor of a charter school improvement plan,
including, without limitation, actions taken to improve governance
of the school district or sponsor of the charter school, milestones
that have been achieved and actions remaining to be taken under
the school board or sponsor of a charter school improvement plan;
and
(b) Conduct regular public meetings during the period of
probation imposed pursuant to this section at which the board of
trustees or sponsor of the charter school:
(1) Provides updates on the implementation of the school
board or sponsor of a charter school improvement plan;
(2) Solicits input from parents and legal guardians of
pupils, teachers, school employees and community stakeholders
concerning efforts to improve the governance of the school district
or sponsor of the charter school; and
(3) Presents a summary of challenges experienced in
addressing deficiencies in the governance of the school district or
sponsor of the charter school and actions planned to address those
deficiencies.
Sec. 9.5. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may
terminate a period of probation imposed on a school district or
sponsor of a charter school pursuant to section 9.3 of this act if,
not later than 2 school years after the commencement of the
period of probation, the Superintendent finds that:
(a) The school district or sponsor of the charter school has
made adequate progress, as defined in the regulations adopted by
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 51 –
the Superintendent pursuant to subsection 13, toward meeting the
goals and benchmarks necessary for the school district or sponsor
of the charter school to no longer be designated as an
underperforming school district or sponsor of a charter school
pursuant to section 6.5 of this act; and
(b) The board of trustees of the school district or the sponsor
of the charter school has made adequate progress, as defined in
the regulations adopted by the Superintendent pursuant to
subsection 13, in implementing the school board or sponsor of a
charter school improvement plan such that the school district or
sponsor of the charter school is not likely to experience a
condition described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section 6.5
of this act.
2. If, after implementing a school board or sponsor of a
charter school improvement plan for 2 school years, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction finds that:
(a) The school district or sponsor of the charter school has
failed to make adequate progress, as defined in the regulations
adopted by the Superintendent pursuant to subsection 13, toward
meeting the goals and benchmarks necessary for the school
district or sponsor of the charter school to no longer be designated
as an underperforming school district or sponsor of a charter
school pursuant to subsection 2 of section 6.5 of this act; or
(b) The board of trustees of the school district or the sponsor
of the charter school has failed to make adequate progress, as
defined in the regulations adopted by the Superintendent pursuant
to subsection 13, in implementing the school board or sponsor of a
charter school improvement plan such that the school district or
sponsor of the charter school is not likely to experience a
condition described in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of section 6.5
of this act,
 the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall notify the Public
Education Oversight Board impaneled pursuant to section 9.1 of
this act and propose specific targeted oversight measures pursuant
to subsection 3 or state oversight of the governance and operations
of the board of trustees of the school district or the charter school
sponsored by the sponsor of the charter school pursuant to
subsection 4. The Public Education Oversight Board must approve
any oversight measures proposed pursuant to this subsection
before implementation of such measures.
3. If, pursuant to subsection 2, the Public Education
Oversight Board approves the implementation of targeted
oversight measures, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 52 –
(a) Have direct involvement in the processes of decision
making by the board of trustees or sponsor of the charter school
on matters of governance;
(b) Establish specific governance and operational mandates
for the board of trustees or sponsor of the charter school that are
designed to improve school district or sponsor performance and
accountability;
(c) Evaluate and monitor, on an ongoing basis, the
performance of the school district and sponsor of the charter
school and its adherence to improvement requirements;
(d) Appoint a state monitor to oversee the activities of the
board of trustees or sponsor of the charter school to ensure
compliance with state education laws and regulations; or
(e) Engage in any combination of the actions described in
paragraphs (a) to (d), inclusive.
4. If, pursuant to subsection 2, the Public Education
Oversight Board approves the initiation of state oversight proposed
by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to this
section, the Governor, not later than 30 days after receiving
notification that the Public Education Oversight Board has
approved the initiation of state oversight, may appoint a state
monitor. The state monitor must:
(a) Be a person with expertise in governance, leadership and
management, with a record of improving the outcomes of an
underperforming organization;
(b) Undergo a review by the Department to ensure there are no
conflicts of interest with the school district or board of trustees of
the school district or the sponsor of the charter school; and
(c) Be compensated by the board of trustees of the school
district or sponsor of the charter school at a rate determined by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction. Such compensation must be
paid from the budget of the school district or sponsor of the
charter school, with any necessary budget adjustments or
augmentations made to accommodate the expenditure in the
current fiscal year or any future fiscal year.
5. If a school district or sponsor of a charter school is
designated as an underperforming school district or sponsor of a
charter school for 5 consecutive school years and the board of
trustees of the school district or sponsor of the charter school has
failed to make adequate progress, as defined in the regulations
adopted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to
subsection 13, in executing the school board or sponsor of a
charter school improvement plan, the Superintendent may propose
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 53 –
additional measures to the Public Education Oversight Board to
ensure that the educational needs of pupils are met. Such
additional measures must be approved by the Oversight Board
before implementation and may include, without limitation:
(a) The reassignment of some or all of the powers, roles and
responsibilities of the board of trustees of a school district or the
sponsor of a charter school pursuant to this chapter or chapter
388A, as applicable, to the Superintendent, or his or her designee,
to address chronic underperformance. The specific powers, roles
and responsibilities reassigned must be specified by the Governor
in the executive order, upon consultation with the Superintendent
to ensure the reassignment is in alignment with the school board
or sponsor of a charter school improvement plan, and may
include, without limitation:
(1) Oversight of financial management and resource
allocation;
(2) Governance and any operational decision-making
authority defined within current policies; and
(3) Implementation of policies and programs to address
identified deficiencies.
(b) The appointment of additional members to the board of
trustees of the school district, as needed, to stabilize the
governance structure and ensure proper expertise is available to
address chronic underperformance. Members appointed pursuant
to this paragraph must:
(1) Possess expertise in governance, education, financial
management or organizational leadership;
(2) Serve for a term specified by the Superintendent, not
exceeding 3 years, with an option for reappointment based on
demonstrated progress; and
(3) Be voting members of the board of trustees.
(c) The establishment of a state management team to assume
governance authority over the operations of the board of trustees
of the school district or the sponsor of the charter school.
6. Any action taken pursuant to subsection 5 remains in
effect until the Department determines that the board of trustees
or the sponsor of the charter school has made adequate progress,
as defined in the regulations adopted by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction pursuant to subsection 13, that is sufficient to
warrant the termination of state oversight as specified in
subsection 10. Upon the expiration of any action taken pursuant
to subsection 5, any reassigned powers, roles or responsibilities
revert to the elected board of trustees or the sponsor of the charter
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 54 –
school, any additional members of the board of trustees appointed
pursuant to subsection 5 no longer serve as members of the board
of trustees and the state management team is dissolved.
7. During the period additional measures initiated pursuant
to paragraph (c) of subsection 5 are in effect, the state
management team, under the direction of the Superintendent of
Public Instruction, shall assume the governance responsibilities of
the board of trustees of the school district or sponsor of the charter
school, including oversight of:
(a) Financial management and resource allocation;
(b) Governance and any operational decision-making;
(c) Implementation of policies and programs; and
(d) Community engagement.
8. The Department shall conduct annual evaluations of the
progress of a school district or sponsor of a charter school placed
under a state management team pursuant to subsection 5. If the
school district or sponsor of the charter school demonstrates
substantial improvement, the Superintendent of Public Instruction
may initiate a phased return to local governance.
9. If the school district or sponsor of the charter school fails
to make adequate progress, as defined in the regulations adopted
by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to subsection
13, the Superintendent may propose an extension of state
intervention for up to 3 additional years. This extension must be
approved by the Public Education Oversight Board.
10. State oversight initiated pursuant to this section must be
terminated when the Superintendent of Public Instruction
determines that the board of trustees of the school district or
sponsor of the charter school have achieved measurable and
sustained progress.
11. For a period of 3 years following the return to local
governance, the Department shall monitor the board of trustees of
the school district or the sponsor of the charter school concerning
compliance with its school board or sponsor of a charter school
improvement plan.
12. The Department shall post on the Internet website
maintained by the Department all reports and evaluations related
to oversight measures implemented pursuant to this section in a
manner that ensures transparency and accountability.
13. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall adopt
regulations for determining adequate progress based on criteria
which may include, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 55 –
(a) Implementation of governance strategies and actions
outlined in the approved school board or sponsor of a charter
school improvement plan;
(b) Measurable progress toward benchmarks established in the
school district or sponsor of a charter school performance
improvement plan submitted pursuant to section 9.3 of this act;
(c) Sustained improvements verified by the Department; and
(d) Compliance with state laws and regulations relating to
education.
Sec. 9.7. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
place on probation a school district or sponsor of a charter school
that the Superintendent has designated as an underperforming
school district or sponsor of a charter school pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of section 6.5 of this act and notify
the board of trustees of the school district or sponsor of the charter
school of such placement. A period of probation imposed pursuant
to this section must not exceed 2 school years.
2. Not later than 90 days after being designated as an
underperforming school district or sponsor of a charter school, the
school district or sponsor shall prepare and submit a school
district or sponsor of a charter school performance improvement
plan. The plan must:
(a) Identify specific areas of academic, operational and
systemic deficiency that contributed to the designation of
underperformance, including, without limitation:
(1) Pupil achievement outcomes in core academic subjects,
including, without limitation, reading, mathematics and science;
(2) Disparities in access to educational resources, programs
and opportunities; and
(3) Inefficiencies in school district or sponsor of a charter
school operations, leadership and financial management;
(b) Establish measurable benchmarks for improvement that
are applicable to all grade levels, including, without limitation:
(1) Increased pupil proficiency rates in core academic
subjects, with defined goals for each grade level;
(2) Enhanced attendance and pupil promotion rates at
elementary, middle and high school levels;
(3) Improved high school graduation rates and college and
career readiness indicators, where applicable; and
(4) Strengthened operational efficiency and equitable
resource allocation across all schools within the school district or
charter schools sponsored by the sponsor of charter schools;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 56 –
(c) Outline targeted strategies to achieve the benchmarks
established pursuant to paragraph (b), addressing both academic
and operational challenges, including, without limitation:
(1) Strategies to narrow achievement gaps for identified
underserved groups, including, without limitation, pupils with
special needs, low-income pupils, English language learners and
pupils from diverse racial or ethnic backgrounds;
(2) Comprehensive plans to improve curriculum delivery,
including, without limitation, review and selection of new
curricula, teacher effectiveness, instructional quality and
professional development for teachers;
(3) Initiatives to enhance the leadership, governance
practices, financial oversight and resource allocation of the school
district or sponsor of the charter school to ensure alignment with
the performance goals of the school district or sponsor of the
charter school;
(4) Implementation of evidence-based interventions tailored
to the specific needs of underperforming schools and pupil
populations; and
(5) Programs to increase family and community
engagement in support of pupil learning and school district or
sponsor of charter school improvement efforts;
(d) Include clear timelines, resource requirements and interim
milestones to monitor progress throughout the probationary
period, with regular benchmarks to measure improvement; and
(e) Establish a system for ongoing evaluation and adjustments
to ensure continuous progress, with mechanisms for reporting
progress to the Department and communicating updates to
stakeholders, including, without limitation, families and teachers.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall review and
approve or deny approval of a school district or sponsor of a
charter school performance improvement plan submitted pursuant
to subsection 2 within 30 days after receipt. If revisions are
required, the school district or sponsor shall have 30 days to
submit a revised plan for approval. Once approved, the school
district or sponsor shall immediately commence implementation of
the plan.
4. Each school district or sponsor of the charter school shall
publish its approved school district or sponsor of a charter school
performance improvement plan on its official Internet website
within 10 business days after receiving approval from the
Superintendent of Public Instruction. The school district or
sponsor of the charter school shall publish quarterly progress
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 57 –
updates on its implementation of the plan, including, without
limitation, milestones achieved and areas requiring additional
focus. All published materials must be posted on the Internet
website maintained by the school district or sponsor and translated
into the five most common languages spoken by families within
the school district or charter schools sponsored by the sponsor.
5. The board of trustees of the school district or sponsor of
the charter school shall hold regular public meetings during the
probationary period to:
(a) Provide updates on the progress of the school district or
sponsor under the school district or sponsor of a charter school
performance improvement plan;
(b) Solicit input from parents, teachers and community
stakeholders; and
(c) Present a summary of challenges faced and actions
planned to address deficiencies.
6. During the probationary period, the Department shall
monitor the progress of the school district or sponsor of the
charter school through:
(a) Quarterly progress reports submitted by the school district
or sponsor;
(b) On-site assessments of the operations, instructional quality
and financial management of the school district or sponsor; and
(c) Providing technical assistance to address challenges and
support implementation.
7. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may appoint a
state monitor to oversee the adherence of the school district or
sponsor of the charter school to the school district or sponsor of a
charter school performance improvement plan.
8. A state monitor appointed pursuant to subsection 7 shall:
(a) Review quarterly progress reports;
(b) Conduct audits and site visits to evaluate progress in the
implementation of the school district or sponsor of a charter
school performance improvement plan;
(c) Provide feedback and recommendations for adjustments to
the school district or sponsor of a charter school performance
improvement plan; and
(d) Ensure alignment with state educational goals and
expectations.
9. At the conclusion of each school year during the
probationary period, the Department shall evaluate the progress of
the school district or the sponsor of the charter school based on
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 58 –
the benchmarks established in the approved school district or
sponsor of a charter school performance improvement plan.
10. If, after 2 school years, the school district or sponsor of
the charter school fails to demonstrate adequate progress, as
defined in the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 15, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction may:
(a) Replace school district or charter school leadership,
including, without limitation, the superintendent of schools of the
school district;
(b) Reallocate resources to prioritize support for schools
designated as low-performing schools pursuant to section 6.6 of
this act; and
(c) Assume state control over specific school district or sponsor
of a charter school functions until the school district or sponsor
demonstrates adequate progress, as defined in the regulations
adopted pursuant to subsection 15.
11. If state control is assumed pursuant to subsection 10, the
Department shall develop, in collaboration with the school district
or sponsor of the charter school, a school district or sponsor of a
charter school recovery plan. The school district or sponsor of a
charter school recovery plan must contain:
(a) Strategies to address deficiencies and improve academic
outcomes, financial management and operational efficiency;
(b) Measurable benchmarks and timelines for recovery; and
(c) Clear accountability measures for monitoring progress.
12. If the school district or sponsor of the charter school:
(a) Demonstrates sustained progress and meets the
benchmarks established in the school district or sponsor of a
charter school recovery plan developed pursuant to subsection 11:
(1) The school district or sponsor must be removed from
probationary status;
(2) Full governance responsibilities must be restored to the
leadership of the school district or sponsor; and
(3) The school district or sponsor shall submit annual
progress reports to the Department.
(b) Fails to demonstrate sustained progress or meet the
benchmarks established in the school district or sponsor of a
charter school recovery plan within the specified timeframe, the
Department shall conduct a comprehensive review and report any
findings to the Public Education Oversight Board. Based on the
findings of the review, the Superintendent of Public Instruction
may, subject to the approval of the Oversight Board, take
additional actions, including, without limitation:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 59 –
(1) Extending state oversight for up to 3 additional years;
(2) Replacing key administrative personnel responsible for
the areas of persistent deficiency;
(3) Implementing targeted operational interventions;
(4) Appointing additional state personnel or external
consultants; and
(5) Evaluating the feasibility of school district or sponsor
restructuring.
13. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction takes any
action pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 12, the Department
shall regularly engage with community stakeholders and prepare
and submit a report of intervention efforts to the:
(a) Governor;
(b) Public Education Oversight Board; and
(c) Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal
to:
(1) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, if
the report is received during the interim period between legislative
sessions.
(2) The Senate and Assembly Standing Committees on
Education, if the report is received during a legislative session.
14. The Department shall post on the Internet website
maintained by the Department all reports and evaluations related
to the intervention measures taken pursuant to this section and
include such measures in an annual report to the:
(a) Governor;
(b) Public Education Oversight Board; and
(c) Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal
to:
(1) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, if
the report is received during the interim period between legislative
sessions.
(2) The Senate and Assembly Standing Committees on
Education, if the report is received during a legislative session.
15. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall adopt
regulations for determining adequate progress based on criteria
which may include, without limitation:
(a) Measurable improvements in academic achievement
metrics, including, without limitation:
(1) Increased proficiency rates in core academic subjects;
(2) Improved high school graduation rates, where
applicable;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 60 –
(3) College and career readiness indicators, where
applicable; and
(4) Enhanced attendance, promotion and retention rates
across all grade levels; and
(b) Enhanced operational efficiency and equitable resource
allocation, demonstrated by:
(1) The effective and efficient allocation of resources;
(2) Strengthened financial management practices; and
(3) Evidence of improved instructional quality and program
delivery throughout the school district.
Sec. 10. NRS 386.165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.165 1. In each county school district in which more than
75,000 pupils are enrolled, the board of trustees shall establish seven
election districts for school trustees. The districts must be:
(a) As nearly equal in population as practicable; and
(b) Composed of contiguous territory.
2. The board of trustees in each county school district in which
more than 75,000 pupils are enrolled is composed of 11 members, of
whom:
(a) Seven voting members must be elected in election districts
established pursuant to subsection 1 by the board of trustees.
(b) One [nonvoting] voting member must be appointed by the
board of county commissioners of the county in which the school
district is located. The member appointed pursuant to this paragraph
must reside in the county in which the school district is located.
(c) Three [nonvoting] voting members must be appointed by the
governing bodies of the three most populous incorporated cities in
the county in which the school district is located, with each
governing body appointing one member. Each member appointed
pursuant to this paragraph must reside in the city in which the
governing body is required to make the appointment.
3. In each county school district in which more than 25,000
pupils but not more than 75,000 pupils are enrolled, the board of
trustees shall establish seven election districts for school trustees, as
follows:
(a) Five districts which are as nearly equal in population as
practicable, each of which includes approximately one-fifth of the
population of the county; and
(b) Two districts which are as nearly equal in population as
practicable, each of which includes approximately one-half of the
population of the county.
 The districts must be composed of contiguous territory.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 61 –
4. Each elected trustee of a school district to which this section
applies must reside in the election district which the trustee
represents and be elected by the voters of that election district.
5. In each school district in which more than 25,000 pupils but
not more than 75,000 pupils are enrolled, the board of trustees is
composed of seven members who must be elected in an election
district established pursuant to subsection 3 by the board of trustees.
6. The appointing authority shall make an appointment
pursuant to subsection 2 at least 30 days but not more than 90 days
before the expiration of the term of office of the incumbent member.
7. The term of office of a school trustee is 4 years,
commencing on the first Monday of January thereafter next
following the election of the trustee.
8. Each trustee shall hold office until his or her successor is
appointed or elected and qualified.
9. The [nonvoting] voting members of the board of trustees
appointed pursuant to paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 2 [:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), shall] have
the same rights and responsibilities as voting members of the board
of trustees [,] elected pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2,
including, without limitation, being involved in any briefings,
interviews, evaluations, closed-door sessions and policy and
operational discussions [;] and
[(b) Do not have voting rights for the election of officers or the
authority to serve] serving as an officer of the board of trustees.
10. The board of trustees of a school district may not adopt
any requirements, statutes, regulations, rules, policies or bylaws or
take any other action to restrict or curtail the duties, rights or
responsibilities of a member of the board of trustees of the school
district based on whether the member was elected or appointed to
his or her position.
Sec. 11. NRS 386.310 is hereby amended to read as follows:
386.310 1. The board of trustees shall meet and organize by:
(a) Electing one of its [elected] members as president.
(b) Electing one of its [elected] members as clerk, or by
selecting some other qualified person as clerk.
(c) Electing additional officers from its [elected] members as
may be deemed necessary.
(d) Fixing the term of office for each of its officers.
2. A record of the organization of the board of trustees must be
entered in the minutes, together with the amount of salary to be paid
to the clerk.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 62 –
3. Immediately after the organization of the board of trustees,
the clerk shall file the names of the president, the clerk and the
members of the board of trustees with the Department and the
county auditor of the county whose boundaries are conterminous
with the boundaries of the county school district.
Sec. 11.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11.7. NRS 387.1213 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
387.1213 1. The Education Stabilization Account is hereby
created in the State Education Fund. Except as otherwise provided
in this section, each year after the close of the previous fiscal year
and before the issuance of the State Controller’s annual report, each
county school district shall transfer from the county school district
fund to the Education Stabilization Account any amount by which
the actual ending fund balance of the county school district fund
exceeds 16.6 percent of the total actual expenditures for the fund.
The interest and income earned on the money in the Account, after
deducting any applicable charges, must be credited to the Account.
2. Money transferred pursuant to subsection 1 to the Education
Stabilization Account is a continuing appropriation solely for the
purpose of authorizing the expenditure of the transferred money for
the purposes set forth in this section.
3. The balance in the Education Stabilization Account must not
exceed 20 percent of the total of all appropriations and
authorizations from the State Education Fund, excluding the
Education Stabilization Account, for the immediately preceding
fiscal year. Any money transferred to the Education Stabilization
Account which exceeds this amount must instead be transferred to
the State Education Fund.
4. If the Interim Finance Committee finds that:
(a) Upon submission of a request from the Department, the
actual enrollment growth for a fiscal year exceeds the projected
enrollment growth by an amount that the Interim Finance
Committee determines would make a transfer of money to the State
Education Fund necessary to fund the excess enrollment;
(b) The collection of revenue in any fiscal year will result in the
State Education Fund receiving less money than authorized for
expenditure from the State Education Fund;
(c) Upon submission of a request from the Department, any
amount of money which was deposited in the State Education Fund
is found by an audit to have been deposited in error; [or]
(d) Upon submission of a request from the Department, any
error in the application of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan by the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 63 –
Department has created a shortfall in the State Education Fund [,] ;
or
(e) Upon submission of a request from the Department, the
Department is required to undertake extraordinary measures to
oversee or allocate resources to a school district or sponsor of a
charter school that is designated as a low-performing school
district or sponsor of a charter school or underperforming school
district or sponsor of a charter school pursuant to section 6.5 of
this act or a public school that is designated as a low-performing
school pursuant to section 6.6 of this act or as persistently
underperforming pursuant to subsection 6 of section 14.25 of this
act,
 the Committee shall by resolution establish an amount of money
to transfer from the Education Stabilization Account to the State
Education Fund and direct the State Controller to transfer that
amount to the State Education Fund. The State Controller shall
thereupon make the transfer.
5. When determining the actual ending fund balance for the
purposes of subsection 1, each county school district shall exclude:
(a) Any money deposited in the county school district fund on or
before June 30, 2020;
(b) Any money apportioned to the county school district for
capital projects or debt service pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS
362.170 and deposited in the county school district fund when
authorized by law; and
(c) Any money transferred to the county school district and
authorized for expenditure as a continuing appropriation pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 6 of NRS 387.1214.
6. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that
the money due from the State Education Fund to a county school
district, charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
pupils pursuant to NRS 387.185 exceeds the amount of money
available in the State Education Fund because of a delay in expected
receipts, he or she may request from the Director of the Office of
Finance a temporary advance from the Education Stabilization
Account for the payment of such money due. Upon receipt of such a
request, the Director of the Office of Finance shall make a
recommendation to the Interim Finance Committee to approve the
temporary advance in whole or in part or to deny the request. If the
Interim Finance Committee approves the request in whole or in part,
the Director of the Office of Finance shall notify the State Controller
and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
of the amount approved by the Interim Finance Committee, and the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 64 –
State Controller shall draw his or her warrant upon receipt of such a
notice of approval. Any money which is temporarily advanced from
the Education Stabilization Account pursuant to this subsection
must be repaid by August 31 following the end of the fiscal year in
which the temporary advance is made.
7. The balance remaining in the State Education Fund,
excluding the balance remaining in the Education Stabilization
Account, that has not been committed for expenditure on or before
June 30 of an odd-numbered fiscal year must be transferred to the
Education Stabilization Account to the extent that such a transfer
would not cause the balance in the Education Stabilization Account
to exceed the limit established in subsection 3.
Sec. 12. NRS 387.12463 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
387.12463 1. The Commission shall:
(a) Provide guidance to school districts and the Department on
the implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan.
(b) Monitor the implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding
Plan and make any recommendations to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education that the Commission determines would,
within the limits of appropriated funding, improve the
implementation of the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan or correct any
deficiencies of the Department or any school district or public
school in carrying out the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan.
(c) Review the statewide base per pupil funding amount, the
adjusted base per pupil funding for each school district and the
multiplier for weighted funding for each category of pupils
appropriated by law pursuant to NRS 387.1214 for each biennium
and recommend any revisions the Commission determines to be
appropriate to create an optimal level of funding for the public
schools in this State, including, without limitation, by
recommending the creation or elimination of one or more categories
of pupils to receive additional weighted funding. If the Commission
makes a recommendation pursuant to this paragraph which would
require more money to implement than was appropriated from the
State Education Fund in the immediately preceding biennium,
the Commission shall also identify a method to fully fund the
recommendation within 10 years after the date of the
recommendation.
(d) Review the laws and regulations of this State relating to
education, make recommendations to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education for any revision of such laws and
regulations that the Commission determines would improve the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 65 –
efficiency or effectiveness of public education in this State and
notify each school district of each such recommendation.
(e) Review and recommend to the Department revisions of the
cost adjustment factors for each county established pursuant to NRS
387.1215 and the method for calculating the attendance area
adjustment established pursuant to NRS 387.1218.
(f) [Review the academic progress made by pupils in each
public school since the implementation of the Pupil-Centered
Funding Plan, including, without limitation, any changes to the
academic progress of such pupils as the result of any additional
money provided to each such school by the Pupil-Centered Funding
Plan. In performing such a review, the Commission shall:
(1) Use metrics to measure the academic achievement of
pupils which include, without limitation:
(I) The rate of graduation of pupils from high school by
type of diploma;
(II) The performance of pupils on standardized
examinations in math, reading and science;
(III) The number of credentials or other certifications in
fields of career and technical education earned by pupils;
(IV) The number of pupils who earn a passing score on an
advanced placement examination;
(V) The number of pupils who earn a passing score on an
international baccalaureate examination;
(VI) The percentage of pupils in each school who lack a
sufficient number of credits to graduate by the end of their 12th
grade year;
(VII) The percentage of pupils in each school who drop
out;
(VIII) The number of pupils who enroll in higher
education upon graduation;
(IX) The number of pupils who enroll in a vocational or
technical school or apprenticeship training program;
(X) The attendance rate for pupils;
(XI) The number of violent acts by pupils and
disciplinary actions against pupils; and
(XII) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(2) Use metrics to measure the improvement of pupils
enrolled in elementary school in literacy which include, without
limitation:
(I) The literacy rate for pupils in the first, third and fifth
grades;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 66 –
(II) The number of pupils in elementary school who were
promoted to the next grade after testing below proficient in reading
in the immediately preceding school year, separated by grade level
and by level of performance on the relevant test;
(III) The number of schools that employ a licensed
teacher designated to serve as a literacy specialist pursuant to NRS
388.159 and the number of schools that fail to employ and designate
such a licensed teacher; and
(IV) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(3) Use metrics to measure the ability of public schools to
hire and retain sufficient staff to meet the needs of the public
schools which include, without limitation:
(I) The rate of vacancies in positions for teachers, support
staff and administrators;
(II) The attendance rate for teachers;
(III) The retention rate for teachers;
(IV) The number of schools and classrooms within each
school in which the number of pupils in attendance exceeds the
designed capacity for the school or classroom;
(V) The number of classes taught by a substitute teacher
for more than 25 percent of the school year; and
(VI) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(4) Use metrics to measure the extent to which schools meet
the needs and expectations of pupils, parents or legal guardians of
pupils, teachers and administrators which include, without
limitation:
(I) The results of an annual survey of satisfaction of
school employees;
(II) The results of an annual survey of satisfaction of
pupils, parents or legal guardians of pupils and graduates; and
(III) Any other metric prescribed by the Commission;
(5) Identify the progress made by each school, school district
and charter school on improving the literacy of pupils enrolled in
elementary school;
(6) Make recommendations for strategies to increase the
efficacy, efficiency, transparency and accountability of public
schools; and
(7) Make recommendations to the Department, school
districts and charter schools to improve the reporting, tracking,
monitoring, analyzing and dissemination of data relating to pupil
achievement and financial accountability, including, without
limitation, revisions to the metrics identified in subparagraphs (1) to
(4), inclusive.] Work with the Department, any relevant boards and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 67 –
committees, school districts and charter schools to develop and
recommend an analysis of the return on investment of using the
funding provided by the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan and
allocated by local educational agencies to obtain certain pupil
outcomes.
(g) Review and consider the implications on funding of
strategies to improve the accessibility and ensure the equitability of
existing and new programs for pupils within and between public
schools, including, without limitation, open zoning.
(h) In each even-numbered year, review and propose any
recommended revisions to the method of calculating the
percentage of pupils determined to be most in need of additional
services and assistance to graduate pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 387.1211. In conducting such a review, the Commission shall
select a third party to verify that any calculation or algorithm used
to make such determination accurately identifies the percentage of
at-risk pupils enrolled in public schools in this State and
determine whether any more accurate or effective method of
calculating the percentage of such pupils exists. A third party
selected by the Commission pursuant to this paragraph shall, on
or before September 1 of each even-numbered year, submit a
report of its findings concerning methods of calculating the
percentage of at-risk pupils enrolled in public schools in this State,
and any recommendations for alternative methods, to the
Department, the State Board and the Commission.
(i) Review the process and evaluate alternatives for adjusting
funding allocations on weighted counts of categories of pupils
identified in paragraph (e) of subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214 to
determine the most effective method for ensuring funding that is
stable and equitable. The review must include, without limitation:
(1) An evaluation of quarterly, annual and multi-year
methods for averaging counts of pupil enrollment;
(2) An analysis of the impact of such averaging methods on
funding stability, program implementation and equity across
school districts, charter schools and university schools for
profoundly gifted pupils;
(3) Consolidation of stakeholder feedback regarding
funding predictability and administrative efficiency; and
(4) Exploration of alternative approaches, including,
without limitation, the use of a 3-year average or high count for 3
years, to balance accuracy and stability in funding streams.
(j) Review and recommend whether other pupils, in addition to
those identified in the percentage of at-risk pupils determined to be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 68 –
the most in need of additional services and assistance to graduate
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 387.1211, should also be
identified as at-risk pupils for such purposes.
(k) At least once each year, meet with the Commission on
Innovation and Excellence in Education created by NRS 385.910
to discuss and review progress on any studies, research and
recommendations developed by each group that concern shared
domains of focus.
2. Each school district and each charter school shall submit [a
quarterly] an annual report to the Commission that identifies how
funding from the Pupil-Centered Funding Plan is being [used]
allocated to improve the academic performance and progress of
pupils . [and includes, without limitation, all data or metrics
collected by the school district or charter school to demonstrate such
improvement.] The Commission shall review the reports submitted
pursuant to this subsection and transmit the reports, along with any
commentary or recommendations relating to the reports, to the
Governor, the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau, the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Education and the Interim Finance
Committee.
3. After receiving the reports submitted to the Commission
pursuant to subsection 2, the Governor may, with the approval of the
Legislature or Interim Finance Committee if the Legislature is not in
session, direct a school district or charter school to take such
remedial actions as the Governor determines to be necessary and
appropriate to address any deficiency identified in the reports
submitted pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The Commission shall:
(a) Present any recommendations pursuant to paragraphs (a) to
[(g),] (j), inclusive, of subsection 1 at a meeting of the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education for consideration and
recommendations by the Committee; and
(b) After consideration of the recommendations of the Joint
Interim Standing Committee on Education, transmit the
recommendations or a revised version of the recommendations to
the Governor and the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
distribution to the Legislature.
Sec. 13. NRS 387.1275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.1275 1. The Department shall, to the extent money is
available, award grants of money to school districts, sponsors of
charter schools [and] , institutions within the Nevada System of
Higher Education and nonprofit organizations to support early
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 69 –
childhood literacy and readiness programs. Each program supported
by a grant awarded pursuant to this section must:
(a) Serve children who are less than 6 years of age;
(b) Be evidence-based;
(c) Provide for appropriate individualized accommodations and
supports for children with disabilities; and
(d) Include a plan of reporting and accountability for the
performance of the program.
2. A school district, sponsor of a charter school [or] ,
institution within the Nevada System of Higher Education or
nonprofit organization that wishes to receive a grant pursuant to this
section must submit an application to the Department. The
Department may approve such an application if the Department
determines that the application:
(a) Includes an implementation plan which is financially sound;
and
(b) Proposes to use all money available from the grant within 2
years or such shorter period of time as the Department determines
appropriate.
3. The Department shall prioritize the award of grants pursuant
to this section to a school district, sponsor of a charter school [or] ,
institution within the Nevada System of Higher Education or
nonprofit organization to support an early childhood literacy and
readiness program that:
(a) Receives money from a private source;
(b) Receives money from a federal grant;
(c) Has demonstrated sustained success in improving the literacy
and readiness for elementary school of children less than 6 years of
age; [or]
(d) Provides services to geographical areas with a higher
proportion of children entering kindergarten who have demonstrated
a deficit across early learning domains during the immediately
preceding 2 years [.] ; or
(e) Serves children who are the most in need of services,
including, without limitation, children:
(1) From families whose household income is not more
than 250 percent of the federally designated level signifying
poverty;
(2) With an individualized educational plan;
(3) With a documented need for behavioral, social or
emotional supports;
(4) Who are members of vulnerable and historically
underserved populations; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 70 –
(5) Who are members of a household in which a language
other than English is primarily spoken.
4. The Department may set aside a portion of funding
received to support the purposes of this section for the purpose of
administering systems, assessments, projects and programs to
serve children pursuant to this section. Such a portion of funding
must be not more than 5 percent of the total amount of funding
received.
Sec. 13.5. NRS 387.652 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.652 1. The Department shall, to the extent money is
available, award grants of money to school districts, sponsors of
charter schools [and] , institutions within the Nevada System of
Higher Education and nonprofit organizations to support
prekindergarten programs. Each prekindergarten program supported
by a grant awarded pursuant to this section must:
(a) Employ at least one teacher per classroom who has a
bachelor’s degree or higher in early childhood education and
compensate those teachers with pay and benefits similar to those
provided to licensed teachers by the school district in which the
prekindergarten program is located;
(b) [Serve] To the extent practicable to ensure that the
prekindergarten program serves as many children as possible,
serve children who are 4 years of age [at the beginning] on or
before August 1 of the school year and [whose] :
(1) Whose household has a household income which is not
more than [200] 250 percent of the federally designated level
signifying poverty;
(2) Who have an individualized educational program;
(3) Whose primary language is not English; or
(4) Who are members of vulnerable and historically
underserved populations;
(c) Provide instruction in prekindergarten for at least 25 hours
each week for the entire school year;
(d) Utilize a comprehensive curriculum for prekindergarten that
is aligned to any standards of content and performance established
for prekindergarten pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(e) Maintain the size of each class at not more than 20 pupils
and a ratio of not more than 10 pupils for each adult with
supervision in the classroom;
(f) Participate in any evaluation of the program or the pupils
who participate in the program that is prescribed by the regulations
adopted pursuant to NRS 387.656;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 71 –
(g) Effectively engage the parents or guardians of pupils and
participate in any evaluation of such engagement that is required by
the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 387.656;
(h) Serve pupils with disabilities at a rate that is not less than the
percentage of pupils in this State or in the United States, whichever
is greater, who are 4 years of age at the beginning of the school year
who receive services funded pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1419;
(i) Ensure that the percentage of pupils with disabilities in each
class is less than 49 percent of the total number of pupils;
(j) Provide appropriate individualized accommodations and
supports for pupils with disabilities;
(k) Provide the comprehensive services prescribed pursuant to
NRS 387.656; and
(l) Meet the minimum standards of performance prescribed
pursuant to NRS 387.656.
2. The board of trustees of a school district, the sponsor of a
charter school [or] , an institution within the Nevada System of
Higher Education or a nonprofit organization that wishes to receive
a grant of money pursuant to this section must submit an application
to the Department. The application must include, without limitation:
(a) A detailed description of the manner in which the board of
trustees, sponsor of a charter school [or] , institution or nonprofit
organization proposes to:
(1) Ensure that the prekindergarten program supported by the
grant meets the requirements of subsection 1; and
(2) Use the grant of money; and
(b) Any other information required by the Department.
Sec. 14. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 14.1 to 14.65, inclusive,
of this act.
Secs. 14.1 and 14.2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14.25. 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction
shall place on probation each public school that has been
designated as a low-performing school pursuant to subsection 1 of
section 6.6 of this act. A period of probation imposed pursuant to
this section:
(a) Begins on the first day of the first school year following the
date of the designation of the public school as a low-performing
school; and
(b) Must end on the date on which the Department posts a
final rating of the public school made pursuant to NRS 385A.720
that the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines to
indicate that the public school no longer qualifies for designation
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 72 –
as a low-performing school pursuant to subsection 1 of section 6.6
of this act.
2. Not later than 60 days after the beginning of a period of
probation imposed pursuant to subsection 1, the principal of the
public school shall prepare and submit to the Department a school
improvement plan that is based on the plan to improve the
academic achievement of pupils prepared pursuant to section 1.3
of this act. The school improvement plan must include, without
limitation:
(a) Specific achievement targets and performance targets to
address the reason that the public school was designated as a low-
performing school;
(b) A clear timeline for implementing any changes to address
the reason that the public school was designated as a low-
performing school; and
(c) A strategic plan for improving pupil outcomes.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, not later
than 30 days after receiving a school improvement plan submitted
to the Department pursuant to subsection 2, review and approve or
deny approval of the school improvement plan. If the
Superintendent of Public Instruction denies approval of the school
improvement plan, the Superintendent shall notify the principal of
the public school of the reasons for denying approval of the plan.
Not later than 30 days after receiving such notice, the principal
shall prepare and submit to the Department revisions to the school
improvement plan. The public school shall implement a school
improvement plan approved by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction and post the approved school improvement plan on the
Internet website maintained by the public school.
4. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may appoint an
independent school improvement official to oversee the progress of
a public school during a period of probation imposed pursuant to
this section. An independent school improvement official:
(a) Must not have any conflict of interest that may affect his or
her ability to monitor objectively the school improvement plan of
the public school;
(b) Must possess a background in evaluating school
improvement practices, assessing effective school strategies and
supporting the development of school improvement plans; and
(c) Must be compensated by the public school that was placed
in a period of probation or the school district or sponsor of the
charter school in which that public school is located or by which
that public school is sponsored, as applicable, at a rate established
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 73 –
by the Superintendent before the appointment of the independent
school improvement official.
5. An independent school improvement official appointed for
a public school pursuant to subsection 4 shall:
(a) Monitor the implementation by the public school of the
school improvement plan and the adherence of the public school
to the plan;
(b) Conduct quarterly assessments to evaluate the performance
of pupils and the progress of the public school in achieving the
performance targets established for the public school;
(c) Provide guidance and resources, including, without
limitation, professional development and support for teachers and
leadership training; and
(d) Submit annual progress reports to the Superintendent of
Public Instruction that provide detailed information on the
improvements in the public school and any challenges
encountered.
6. Upon the conclusion of a period of probation for a public
school imposed pursuant to this section or 2 years after a public
school is placed on probation pursuant to this section, whichever
is earlier, the Department shall evaluate the progress of the public
school in meeting the achievement targets and performance
targets that address the reason that the public school was
designated as a low-performing school, as specified in the school
improvement plan for the public school. If the Department
determines that the public school has not met such achievement
targets and performance targets, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction shall:
(a) Designate the public school as persistently
underperforming; and
(b) Notify the principal of the public school and the school
district or sponsor of the charter school of the designation of the
public school as persistently underperforming and include in such
notice a summary of the deficiencies causing the designation and
any required actions.
7. If, pursuant to subsection 6, the Superintendent of Public
Instruction designates a school as persistently underperforming,
the Superintendent shall recommend intervention measures to the
Public Education Oversight Board impaneled pursuant to section
9.1 of this act. Subject to the approval of the Oversight Board, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction may:
(a) Extend the period of probation of the public school for 1
additional school year, including, without limitation, extending all
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 74 –
requirements and oversight imposed during a period of probation
imposed pursuant to this section;
(b) Implement any or all of the corrective measures described
in sections 14.3 to 14.6, inclusive, of this act; or
(c) Require additional state-directed interventions tailored to
address the specific deficiencies preventing the public school from
meeting its achievement targets and performance targets.
8. The Department shall regularly prepare and submit a
report of intervention efforts and progress of a public school in
meeting achievement targets and performance targets to the:
(a) Governor;
(b) Public Education Oversight Board; and
(c) Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal
to:
(1) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, if
the report is received during the interim period between legislative
sessions.
(2) The Senate and Assembly Standing Committees on
Education, if the report is received during a legislative session.
9. Any report or evaluation related to intervention measures
for a public school approved by the Public Education Oversight
Board must be posted on the Internet website of the Department
and submitted to the entities described in paragraphs (a), (b) and
(c) of subsection 8.
Sec. 14.3. 1. If, pursuant to subsection 6 of section 14.25 of
this act, the Superintendent of Public Instruction designates a
public school as a persistently underperforming school, the
Superintendent shall, not later than 60 days after the designation
is made, submit to the Public Education Oversight Board
impaneled pursuant to section 9.1 of this act a proposal to
implement one of the following corrective measures:
(a) Replacement of the principal of the public school and other
key personnel of the public school as necessary to support
substantial improvements in leadership and instructional quality;
or
(b) Direct management of the public school by the Department
to ensure accountability and the implementation of effective
school practices.
2. Not later than 45 days after receiving a proposal for a
corrective measure submitted pursuant to subsection 1, the Public
Education Oversight Board shall review the proposal and take one
of the following actions:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 75 –
(a) Approve the proposal, in which case the Superintendent of
Public Instruction shall proceed to implement the approved
corrective measure as provided in sections 14.3 to 14.6, inclusive,
of this act; or
(b) Deny the proposal, in which case the Superintendent shall:
(1) Address the reasons for the denial of the proposal; and
(2) Not later than 30 days after the denial of the proposal,
submit to the Oversight Board a revised proposal for the corrective
measure or a proposal for a different corrective measure.
3. A corrective measure must be selected, approved and
implemented not later than December 31 of the year in which the
public school is designated as a persistently underperforming
school.
4. Each corrective measure must be established with an
initial term of 6 years. During the initial term of the corrective
measure, the Department shall:
(a) Monitor the progress of the school through the program of
accountability and statewide system of accountability for public
schools as set forth in chapter 385A of NRS; and
(b) Provide technical assistance, professional development and
resources as necessary to support the successful implementation of
the corrective measure.
5. At least 1 year before the end of the initial 6-year term of a
corrective measure, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
conduct a comprehensive review of the performance of the public
school for which the corrective measure was implemented to
determine the appropriate next steps. Based on this review, the
Superintendent shall recommend to the Public Education
Oversight Board one of the following actions:
(a) Renew the corrective measure for an additional term of not
more than 10 years, if the public school has demonstrated
sustained progress but has not met or exceeded its achievement
targets and performance targets;
(b) Extend the corrective measure indefinitely, if the public
school has met or exceeded its achievement targets and
performance targets or the Superintendent determines that such
action is in the best interest of the pupils and community served by
the public school;
(c) Initiate an alternative or modified corrective measure set
forth in subsection 1; or
(d) Transition the public school back to its original
governance structure if the school has achieved sustained
improvement and demonstrates capacity to maintain progress.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 76 –
6. In cases where a corrective measure is extended
indefinitely pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 5:
(a) The Department shall conduct periodic evaluations, not
less often than every 5 years, to assess the performance and
operational effectiveness of the public school and the alignment of
the public school with state educational goals; and
(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction retains the
authority to modify or terminate the corrective measure if
subsequent evaluations reveal significant deficiencies or if the
Superintendent determines that an alternative governance
structure would better serve the pupils enrolled in the public
school.
7. The Department shall prepare a report of the findings and
determinations resulting from the comprehensive review
conducted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to
subsection 5. The report must be posted on the Internet website
maintained by the Department and must include, without
limitation:
(a) A summary of the progress of the public school during the
initial term of the corrective measure;
(b) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the corrective
measure in addressing the deficiencies in the performance of the
public school; and
(c) A detailed rationale for the recommended next steps,
including, without limitation, any proposed changes to the
governance, operations or accountability structure of the public
school.
8. The provisions of this section must not be construed to
prohibit or supersede a sponsor of a charter school from taking
any action to enforce a charter contract or any provision of
chapter 388A of NRS.
Sec. 14.35. 1. If, pursuant to section 14.3 of this act, the
corrective measure of replacing the principal of a public school
and other key personnel of the public school is approved by the
Public Education Oversight Board impaneled pursuant to section
9.1 of this act, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
direct the superintendent of schools of the school district in which
the school is located or, if the public school is a charter school, the
governing body of the charter school, to initiate the process to
replace the principal and other key personnel.
2. Upon receipt of such direction from the Superintendent of
Public Instruction pursuant to subsection 1, the superintendent of
schools of the school district or governing body of the charter
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 77 –
school, as applicable, shall immediately begin a process to select a
new principal for the public school. The superintendent of schools
of the school district or governing body of the charter school, as
applicable, shall:
(a) If the public school is a local school precinct, as defined in
NRS 388G.535:
(1) Ensure that the selection process complies with the
applicable provisions of chapter 388G of NRS, including, without
limitation, meaningful participation by the organizational team, as
defined in NRS 388G.540; and
(2) Have the organizational team, as defined in NRS
388G.540, participate in the selection process for the new
principal by:
(I) Defining the desired qualifications and
characteristics of the new principal;
(II) Participating in interviews, evaluations and
deliberations for all candidates to be hired as the new principal;
and
(III) Providing formal recommendations for a candidate
to be hired as the new principal;
(b) Submit the name and qualifications of the final candidate
selected by the superintendent of schools of the school district or
governing body of the charter school, as applicable, for review and
approval by the Superintendent of Public Instruction to ensure
alignment with the improvement goals for the public school; and
(c) Appoint the new principal to assume full administrative
responsibilities by the start of the next school year.
3. Upon appointment, the new principal, in collaboration
with the administration of the school district or, if the new
principal is the principal of a charter school, the governing body
of the charter school shall review and, if necessary, replace or
reassign any teacher or other staff member assigned to the school,
subject to the following conditions:
(a) The replacement or reassignment process must comply
with all applicable state and federal laws, including, without
limitation, those related to:
(1) Collective bargaining agreements; and
(2) Employment protections under state and federal law,
including, without limitation, the Americans with Disabilities Act
of 1990, 42 U.S.C. §§ 12101 et seq., and Title VII of the Civil
Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. §§ 2000e et seq.;
(b) Teachers identified for replacement or reassignment must
receive:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 78 –
(1) Written notification specifying the reasons for the
decision, consistent with performance or other relevant criteria;
and
(2) Support for reassignment to another public school
within the school district or another charter school, as provided in
subsection 7;
(c) All decisions to replace or reassign a teacher must be
documented and reviewed by the administration of the school
district or the governing body of the charter school, as applicable,
and the Department to ensure compliance with legal and policy
standards; and
(d) Any principal, administrator, teacher or other staff of the
public school who is replaced must:
(1) Be reassigned within the school district or to another
charter school to a suitable role in accordance with chapter 391 of
NRS and the policies of the school district or charter school;
(2) Follow the procedures of the school district or charter
school, as applicable, for reassignment or other duties as
appropriate; and
(3) Abide by any other requirements imposed by law or
policy relating to reassignment.
4. If an administrator or teacher is removed from his or her
position pursuant to this section and holds an “effective” or
“highly effective” rating pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2
of NRS 391.465, the administrator or teacher must be reassigned
to another open position of equal responsibility and compensation
within the school district or charter school. If no such position is
available, the administrator or teacher must be assigned to his or
her previous role.
5. If administrators, teachers or other staff of a public school
are replaced or reassigned pursuant to a corrective measure
implemented pursuant to this section, the superintendent of
schools of the school district or the governing body of the charter
school, as applicable, in coordination with the Department, may
establish financial and other incentives, which are subject to any
collective bargaining agreement, to attract and retain high-quality
teachers, administrators and other staff for the public school.
Such incentives may include, without limitation:
(a) Salary increases, performance-based bonuses and
retention stipends;
(b) Flexible scheduling options to support continuing
education and other professional assignments;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 79 –
(c) Specialized training programs and career advancement
opportunities; and
(d) Additional supports tailored to address the specific
challenges of the public school.
6. Each allocation of money for an incentive described in
subsection 5 must be:
(a) Approved by the Department;
(b) Limited to the duration of the period for which the
corrective measure is effective pursuant to this section; and
(c) Documented to ensure alignment with the performance and
improvement goals of the public school.
7. A teacher reassigned to another public school within the
school district or to another charter school pursuant to this section
must receive support to meet performance standards, including,
without limitation:
(a) Peer mentoring and coaching;
(b) Enrollment in professional development programs; and
(c) Additional resources or training as necessary.
8. If a new principal appointed pursuant to this section
determines that additional operational costs are required to
support the improvement goals of the public school, the
superintendent of schools of the school district in which the public
school is located or the governing body of the charter school shall:
(a) Evaluate and approve the request if resources are available
or can be made available through reasonable budget
augmentation;
(b) Identify and allocate appropriate sources of funding for the
request; and
(c) Prioritize expenditures to address the most critical needs of
the public school in alignment with its school improvement plan.
9. The Department may provide additional support and
resources to persistently underperforming schools that are
implementing a corrective measure pursuant to this section. Such
support may include, without limitation:
(a) Leadership coaching for new principals and other key
personnel appointed pursuant to this section to ensure effective
school management;
(b) Ongoing professional development opportunities for
teachers to support best practices in instruction and curriculum
delivery; and
(c) Funding to enter into contracts with consultants or
educational specialists to assist in the implementation of effective
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 80 –
school turnaround strategies, ensuring alignment with the
performance improvement goals of the public school.
Sec. 14.4. 1. If, pursuant to section 14.3 of this act, the
corrective measure of direct management of the public school by
the Department is approved by the Public Education Oversight
Board impaneled pursuant to section 9.1 of this act and
implemented for a public school designated as persistently
underperforming, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
assume responsibility for overseeing the operations of the public
school.
2. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction assumes
responsibility for overseeing the operations of a public school
pursuant to subsection 1, the Superintendent shall appoint a
school turnaround director to manage the public school. The
school turnaround director shall:
(a) Exercise full operational control of the public school,
including, without limitation:
(1) Overseeing all instructional, operational and financial
decisions;
(2) Implementing personnel decisions, including, without
limitation, the hiring, reassignment or replacement of
administrators, teachers and other staff employed at the public
school in compliance with state and federal law; and
(3) Revising curriculum and instructional strategies to
align with best practices for improving pupil outcomes.
(b) Develop and implement a comprehensive school
turnaround plan. The school turnaround plan must include,
without limitation:
(1) Specific academic and operational benchmarks the
public school must meet during the period of the corrective
measure imposed pursuant to this section;
(2) Evidence-based interventions to address areas of
underperformance;
(3) Strategies to close achievement gaps for underserved
populations of pupils, including, without limitation, pupils with
special needs, low-income pupils, pupils who are English learners
and pupils from diverse racial or ethnic backgrounds;
(4) A detailed timeline for achieving measurable progress
in performance; and
(5) An evaluation of policies prescribed by the school
district to identify any waivers necessary for the effective execution
of the school turnaround plan.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 81 –
(c) Document all proposed waivers of any policy of the school
district or sponsor of the charter school and submit the proposed
waivers to the superintendent of schools of the school district or
the sponsor of the charter school, as applicable, for review and to
the Superintendent of Public Instruction for review and approval.
(d) Provide regular updates to the Superintendent of Public
Instruction, the Public Education Oversight Board and the board
of trustees of the school district or the sponsor of the charter
school on the implementation of the school turnaround plan to
ensure transparency and accountability.
3. The Department shall provide ongoing support to a public
school operating under the corrective measure of direct
management imposed pursuant to this section, including, without
limitation:
(a) Leadership coaching and development programs for the
appointed school turnaround director and school administrators to
ensure effective management and instructional leadership.
(b) Targeted professional development for teachers, including,
without limitation:
(1) Training on evidence-based instructional practices and
strategies for differentiated instruction;
(2) Support for integrating technology into the classroom to
enhance learning outcomes; and
(3) Coaching to improve classroom management and pupil
engagement.
(c) Access to external consultants and educational specialists
with expertise in school turnaround strategies. Any such
consultant or educational specialist shall:
(1) Provide guidance on curriculum development and
instructional planning;
(2) Assist with the implementation of performance
monitoring systems; and
(3) Support the alignment of school operations with the
goals of the school turnaround plan.
(d) Additional funding support, as necessary, to ensure the
successful execution of the school turnaround plan, including,
without limitation, grants for instructional resources, teacher
incentives and other identified needs.
Secs. 14.65 and 14.7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. NRS 388.055 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.055 1. Each public school, including, without limitation,
each charter school, in which at least 500 pupils are enrolled that is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 82 –
located in a county whose population is less than 100,000 shall, to
the extent that money is available for that purpose:
[1.] (a) Employ a school counselor at the school on a full-time
basis.
[2.] (b) Provide for a comprehensive program for school
counseling developed by a school counselor pursuant to
NRS 391.293.
2. Each public school, including, without limitation, each
charter school, located in a county whose population is 100,000 or
more shall:
(a) Provide for the availability of a school counselor or
equivalent service at the school on a full-time basis.
(b) Provide for a comprehensive program for school
counseling developed by a school counselor pursuant to
NRS 391.293.
Sec. 15.5. NRS 388.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.090 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 388D.330, boards of trustees of school districts shall schedule
and provide a minimum of 180 days of free school in the districts
under their charge.
2. Except for an alternative schedule described in subsection 3,
the Superintendent of Public Instruction may, upon application by
the board of trustees of a school district, authorize the school district
to provide a program of instruction based on an alternative schedule
if the number of minutes of instruction to be provided is equal to or
greater than the number of minutes of instruction that would be
provided in a program of instruction consisting of 180 school days.
The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall notify the board of
trustees of the school district of the approval or denial of the
application not later than 30 days after the Superintendent of Public
Instruction receives the application. An alternative schedule
proposed pursuant to this subsection must be developed in
accordance with chapter 288 of NRS.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may, upon
application by the board of trustees of a school district, authorize a
reduction of not more than 15 school days in that particular district
to establish or maintain an alternative schedule consisting of a 12-
month school program if the board of trustees demonstrates that the
proposed alternative schedule for the program provides for a number
of minutes of instruction that is equal to or greater than that which
would be provided under a program consisting of 180 school days.
4. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may, upon
application by a board of trustees, authorize the addition of minutes
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 83 –
of instruction to any scheduled day of free school if days of free
school are lost because of any interscholastic activity. Not more than
5 days of free school so lost may be rescheduled in this manner. The
provisions of this subsection do not apply to an alternative schedule
approved pursuant to subsection 2.
5. The number of minutes of instruction required for a
particular group of pupils in a program of instruction based on an
alternative schedule approved pursuant to this section and NRS
388.095 and 388.097 must be determined by multiplying the
appropriate minimum daily period of instruction established by the
State Board by regulation for that particular group of pupils by 180.
6. Each school year must contain at least 4 days of
professional development for education personnel assigned to
each elementary school. At least 3 days of such professional
development must be devoted to training on methods and skills
necessary to achieve the goals of the plan for the school prepared
pursuant to section 1.3 of this act.
Sec. 15.6. NRS 388.157 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.157 1. The board of trustees of each school district and
the governing body of each charter school shall prepare a plan to
improve the literacy of pupils enrolled in an elementary school.
Such a plan must include, without limitation:
(a) A program to provide intervention services and intensive
instruction to pupils who have been identified as deficient in the
subject area of reading to ensure that those pupils achieve adequate
proficiency in the requisite reading skills and reading
comprehension skills necessary to perform at a level determined by
a statewide assessment to be within a level determined by the State
Board , or an equivalent level determined by an assessment
administered by the board of trustees of a school district or
governing body of a charter school, for a pupil enrolled in the same
grade in which the pupil is enrolled. Such a program must include,
without limitation, regularly scheduled reading sessions in small
groups and specific instruction designed to target any area of
reading in which the pupil demonstrates a deficiency, including,
without limitation, phonological and phonemic awareness, decoding
skills, reading fluency and vocabulary and reading comprehension
strategies;
(b) Procedures for assessing a pupil’s proficiency in the subject
area of reading using valid and reliable standards-based assessments
[that have been approved by the State Board by regulation] during
each grade level of the elementary school at which the pupil is
enrolled as determined necessary;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 84 –
(c) A program to improve the proficiency in reading of pupils
who are English learners; and
(d) Procedures for facilitating collaboration between licensed
teachers designated as literacy specialists and classroom teachers.
2. The board of trustees of each school district or the governing
body of a charter school, as applicable, shall:
(a) Submit its plan to the Department for approval on or before
the date prescribed by the Department on a form prescribed by the
Department; and
(b) Make such revisions to the plan as the Department
determines are necessary.
3. The Department [shall] :
(a) Shall adopt regulations that prescribe procedures for
assessing the development across early learning domains of a pupil
enrolled in kindergarten within the first 45 days of school in a
school year.
(b) May adopt regulations prescribing the manner by which
the board of trustees of each school district and the governing
body of a charter school are required to collect and report the
results of any assessment used by the school district or charter
school, as applicable, to assess a pupil’s proficiency in the subject
area of reading.
(c) May prescribe one or more valid and reliable standards-
based statewide assessments that must be used in a school district
or charter school to assess a pupil’s proficiency in the subject area
of reading if the board of trustees of the school district or the
governing body of the charter school, as applicable, fails to
include such an assessment in the plan submitted pursuant to
subsection 1.
4. If the board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school administers an assessment to assess the
proficiency of a pupil in the subject of reading other than a
statewide assessment prescribed pursuant to paragraph (c) of
subsection 3 and the Department has established a method to
determine an equivalent score to a score on a statewide assessment
for such an assessment, the Department shall award a grant to the
school district or local educational agency for the charter school
in an amount equal to the savings to the Department, on a
proportional basis, for not administering the statewide assessment
to pupils in the school district or charter school, as applicable. A
grant to a school district or local educational agency awarded
pursuant to this subsection must not exceed, on a per pupil basis,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 85 –
the cost of a statewide assessment prescribed pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 3.
Sec. 16. NRS 388.700 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.700 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, for
each [school quarter of a] school year, the ratio in each school
district of pupils per licensed teacher designated to teach, on a full-
time basis, in classes where core curriculum is taught:
(a) In kindergarten and grades 1 and 2, must not exceed 16 to 1,
and in grade 3, must not exceed 18 to 1; or
(b) If a plan is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
388.720, must not exceed the ratio set forth in that plan for the grade
levels specified in the plan.
 In determining this ratio, all licensed educational personnel who
teach a grade level specified in paragraph (a) or a grade level
specified in a plan that is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS
388.720, as applicable for the school district, must be counted
except teachers of art, music, physical education or special
education, teachers who teach one or two specific subject areas to
more than one classroom of pupils, counselors, librarians,
administrators, deans, specialists, any administrators or other
licensed educational personnel, including, without limitation,
counselors, coaches and special education teachers, who may be
present in a classroom but do not teach every pupil in the classroom
and teachers who are not actively teaching pupils during a class
period or who do not teach a subject area for which the ratio of
pupils per licensed teacher is being determined.
2. A school district may, within the limits of any plan adopted
pursuant to NRS 388.720, assign a pupil whose enrollment in a
grade occurs after the end of a quarter during the school year to any
existing class regardless of the number of pupils in the class if the
school district requests and is approved for a variance from the State
Board pursuant to subsection 4.
3. Each school district that includes one or more elementary
schools which exceed the ratio of pupils per class during any
[quarter of a] school year, as reported to the Department pursuant to
NRS 388.725:
(a) Set forth in subsection 1;
(b) Prescribed in conjunction with a legislative appropriation for
the support of the class-size reduction program; or
(c) Defined by a legislatively approved alternative class-size
reduction plan, if applicable to that school district,
 must request a variance for each such school for the next [quarter
of the current] school year [if a quarter remains in that school year
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 86 –
or for the next quarter of the succeeding school year, as applicable,]
from the State Board by providing a written statement that includes
the reasons for the request, the justification for exceeding the
applicable prescribed ratio of pupils per class and a plan of actions
that the school district will take to reduce the ratio of pupils per
class.
4. The State Board may grant to a school district a variance
from the limitation on the number of pupils per class set forth in
paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of subsection 3 for good cause, including
the lack of available financial support specifically set aside for the
reduction of pupil-teacher ratios.
5. The State Board shall, on [a quarterly] an annual basis,
submit a report to the Interim Finance Committee on each variance
requested by a school district pursuant to subsection 4 during the
[preceding quarter] school year and, if a variance was granted, an
identification of each elementary school for which a variance was
granted and the specific justification for the variance.
6. The State Board shall, on or before February 1 of each odd-
numbered year, submit a report to the Legislature on:
(a) Each variance requested by a school district pursuant to
subsection 4 during the preceding biennium and, if a variance was
granted, an identification of each elementary school for which
variance was granted and the specific justification for the variance.
(b) The data reported to it by the various school districts
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 388.710, including an explanation
of that data, and the current pupil-teacher ratios per class in the
grade levels specified in paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or the grade
levels specified in a plan that is approved pursuant to subsection 3
of NRS 388.720, as applicable for the school district.
7. The Department shall, on or before November 15 of each
year, report to the Chief of the Budget Division of the Office of
Finance and the Fiscal Analysis Division of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau:
(a) The number of teachers employed full-time;
(b) The number of teachers employed in order to attain the ratio
required by subsection 1;
(c) The number of substitute teachers filling vacancies or long-
term positions;
(d) The number of pupils enrolled; and
(e) The number of teachers assigned to teach in the same
classroom with another teacher or in any other arrangement other
than one teacher assigned to one classroom of pupils,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 87 –
 during the current school year in the grade levels specified in
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 or the grade levels specified in a plan
that is approved pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 388.720, as
applicable, for each school district.
8. The provisions of this section do not apply to a charter
school or to a program of distance education provided pursuant to
NRS 388.820 to 388.874, inclusive.
Sec. 17. NRS 388.723 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.723 The Department shall:
1. Develop policies and procedures for:
(a) Monitoring the plan of each school district to reduce the
pupil-teacher ratio per class developed pursuant to NRS 388.720,
which must include, without limitation, provisions for:
(1) The review of each plan submitted to the State Board to
ensure the adequacy of such plans; and
(2) The review of any data submitted to the State Board
pursuant to NRS 388.710.
(b) Monitoring the [quarterly] reports concerning the average
daily enrollment of pupils and the pupil-teacher ratios in each school
district submitted by the board of trustees of the school district
pursuant to NRS 388.725 to ensure the completeness and accuracy
of such reports.
(c) The review of any requests for a variance submitted to the
State Board pursuant to NRS 388.700, which must include, without
limitation, provisions to verify the information in such requests to
ensure the accuracy of the reports on variances submitted by the
State Board to the Legislature pursuant to that section.
(d) The distribution of money to each school district for the
reduction of pupil-teacher ratios, which must include, without
limitation, provisions for:
(1) The retention of all documents and records related to the
distribution; and
(2) The review of the work performed to determine the
distribution of such money to ensure the accuracy of supporting
information and the calculations used in making such
determinations.
2. Provide guidance to the school districts on:
(a) The development of a plan to reduce the pupil-teacher ratio
per class pursuant to NRS 388.720. In developing such guidance,
the Department shall:
(1) Outline the criteria that each plan must include to meet
the requirements of NRS 388.720.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 88 –
(2) Provide examples of policies, plans or strategies adopted
by other states to reduce class sizes.
(b) The requirements for reporting information related to the
reduction of pupil-teacher ratios.
(c) The data that must be monitored pursuant to NRS 388.710
by each school district and used to measure the effectiveness of the
implementation of any plan to reduce pupil-teacher ratios.
3. Communicate with the board of trustees of each school
district regarding the expectations of the Department for the use of
any money distributed to reduce pupil-teacher ratios in the school
district, including, without limitation, the minimum number of
teachers the school district is expected to employ.
Sec. 18. NRS 388.725 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.725 1. On or before [August] October 1 [, November 1,
February 1 and May 1] of each year, the board of trustees of each
school district shall report to the Department for the [preceding
quarter:] current school year:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), the average
daily enrollment of pupils and the ratio of pupils per licensed
teacher for grades 1, 2 and 3 for each elementary school in the
school district.
(b) If the State Board has approved an alternative class-size
reduction plan for the school district pursuant to NRS 388.720, the
average daily enrollment of pupils and the ratio of pupils per
licensed teacher for those grades which are required to comply with
the alternative class-size reduction plan for each elementary school
in the school district.
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall post on the
Internet website maintained by the school district:
(a) The information concerning average daily enrollment and
class size for each elementary school in the school district, as
reported to the Department pursuant to subsection 1; and
(b) An identification of each elementary school in the school
district, if any, for which a variance from the prescribed pupil-
teacher ratios was granted by the State Board pursuant to subsection
4 of NRS 388.700.
Sec. 19. Chapter 388A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board of trustees of a school district in which a
proposed charter school will be located may, not later than 10
business days after a public meeting is held pursuant to subsection
1 of NRS 388A.255, object to the formation of the proposed
charter school if:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 89 –
(a) A majority of members of the board of trustees vote to
approve the objection; and
(b) The board of trustees determines that the academic,
financial or organizational plans included in the application
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 388A.243 for
the charter school do not meet the needs of the community.
2. If the board of trustees of a school district objects to the
formation of a charter school pursuant to subsection 1, the board
of trustees must submit notice of the objection to the State Board
and the State Public Charter School Authority.
3. After receiving notice of an objection pursuant to
subsection 2, the State Public Charter School Authority may make
affirmative findings that the assessment of the academic, financial
or organizational plans included in the application pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 388A.243 made by the board
of trustees of a school district is incorrect. After making such
findings, the State Public Charter School Authority may approve
the application to form a charter school.
Sec. 20. NRS 388A.153 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.153 1. The State Public Charter School Authority
consists of nine members. The membership of the State Public
Charter School Authority consists of:
(a) [Two members appointed by the Governor in accordance
with subsection 2;
(b)] Two members [,] who must not be Legislators, one
of whom holds a license to teach issued pursuant to chapter 391 of
NRS and one of whom has a demonstrated understanding of
charter school operations, appointed by the Majority Leader of the
Senate in accordance with subsection 2;
[(c)] (b) Two members [,] who must not be Legislators, one
of whom holds a license to teach issued pursuant to chapter 391 of
NRS and one of whom has a demonstrated understanding of
charter school operations, appointed by the Speaker of the
Assembly in accordance with subsection 2;
[(d) Two members]
(c) One member who has specific knowledge of the
assessments required in elementary and secondary education,
appointed by the State Board of Education [; and] in accordance
with subsection 2;
[(e)] (d) One member appointed by the Charter School
Association of Nevada or its successor organization [.] ;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 90 –
(e) One member who is a person who has experience and
expertise in managing finances for facilities in the public sector;
and
(f) Two members who are the parent or legal guardian of a
pupil enrolled in a charter school in this State, appointed by the
Governor.
2. The Governor, the Majority Leader of the Senate, the
Speaker of the Assembly and the State Board of Education shall , in
appointing members pursuant to paragraphs (a), (b) and (e) of
subsection 1, attempt to ensure that the membership of the State
Public Charter School Authority:
(a) Includes persons with a demonstrated understanding of
charter schools and a commitment to using charter schools as a way
to strengthen public education in this State;
(b) [Includes a parent or legal guardian of a pupil enrolled in a
charter school in this State;
(c)] Includes persons with specific knowledge of:
(1) Issues relating to elementary and secondary education;
(2) School finance or accounting, or both;
(3) Management practices;
(4) Assessments required in elementary and secondary
education;
(5) Educational technology; and
(6) The laws and regulations applicable to charter schools;
[(d)] (c) Insofar as practicable, reflects the ethnic and
geographical diversity of this State; and
[(e)] (d) Insofar as practicable, consists of persons who are
experts on best practices for authorizing charter schools and
developing and operating high-quality charter schools and charter
management organizations.
3. Each member of the State Public Charter School Authority
must be a resident of this State.
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a member of
the State Public Charter School Authority must not be actively
engaged in business with or hold a direct pecuniary interest relating
to charter schools, including, without limitation, serving as a vendor,
contractor, employee, officer, director or member of the governing
body of a charter school, educational management organization or
charter management organization.
5. Not more than two members of the State Public Charter
School Authority may be teachers or administrators who are
employed by a charter school or charter management organization in
this State. For a teacher or administrator employed by a charter
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 91 –
school or charter management organization to be eligible to serve as
a member of the State Public Charter School Authority, the charter
school or charter management organization which employs the
teacher or administrator must not have ever received an annual
rating established as one of the three lowest ratings of performance
pursuant to the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
6. After the initial terms, the term of each member of the State
Public Charter School Authority , other than any ex officio
member, is 3 years, commencing on July 1 of the year in which he
or she is appointed. A vacancy in the membership of the State
Public Charter School Authority must be filled for the remainder of
the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment.
A member shall continue to serve on the State Public Charter School
Authority until his or her successor is appointed.
7. The members of the State Public Charter School Authority
shall select a Chair and Vice Chair from among its members. After
the initial selection of those officers, each of those officers holds the
position for a term of 2 years commencing on July 1 of each odd-
numbered year. If a vacancy occurs in the Chair or Vice Chair, the
vacancy must be filled in the same manner as the original selection
for the remainder of the unexpired term.
8. Each member of the State Public Charter School Authority
is entitled to receive:
(a) For each day or portion of a day during which he or she
attends a meeting of the State Public Charter School Authority a
salary of not more than $80, as fixed by the State Public Charter
School Authority; and
(b) For each day or portion of a day during which he or she
attends a meeting of the State Public Charter School Authority or is
otherwise engaged in the business of the State Public Charter School
Authority the per diem allowance and travel expenses provided for
state officers and employees generally.
Sec. 20.5. NRS 388A.220 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388A.220 1. The board of trustees of a school district may
apply to the Department for authorization to sponsor charter schools
within the school district in accordance with the regulations adopted
by the Department pursuant to NRS 388A.105 or 388A.110. An
application must be approved by the Department before the board of
trustees may sponsor a charter school. Not more than 180 days after
receiving approval to sponsor charter schools, the board of trustees
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 92 –
shall provide public notice of its ability to sponsor charter schools
and solicit applications for charter schools.
2. The State Public Charter School Authority shall sponsor
charter schools whose applications have been approved by the State
Public Charter School Authority pursuant to NRS 388A.255. Except
as otherwise provided by specific statute, if the State Public Charter
School Authority sponsors a charter school, the State Public Charter
School Authority is responsible for the evaluation, monitoring and
oversight of the charter school.
3. A college or university within the Nevada System of Higher
Education may submit an application to the Department to sponsor
charter schools in accordance with the regulations adopted by the
Department pursuant to NRS 388A.105 or 388A.110. An
application must be approved by the Department before a college or
university within the Nevada System of Higher Education may
sponsor charter schools.
4. A city or county may submit an application to the
Department to sponsor charter schools in accordance with the
regulations adopted by the Department pursuant to NRS 388A.105
or 388A.110. An application must be approved by the Department
before a city or county may sponsor charter schools. A city or
county:
(a) [May] Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, may
not sponsor a new charter school or allow an existing charter school
sponsored by the city or county to increase enrollment or operate an
additional campus of an existing charter school sponsored by the
city or county if the total number of pupils enrolled in charter
schools sponsored by the city or county is 7 percent or more of the
number of pupils enrolled in public schools in the city or county
other than charter schools that are not sponsored by the city or
county. A city or county may sponsor a new charter school or
allow an existing charter school sponsored by the city or county to
increase enrollment or operate an additional campus of an
existing charter school sponsored by the city or county if:
(1) The city or county is located in a school district that has
been designated as a low-performing school district pursuant to
subsection 1 of section 6.5 of this act; and
(2) The new charter school, increase in enrollment of an
existing charter school or operation of an additional campus of an
existing charter school will serve pupils residing in the zone of
attendance of a public school that is designated as a low-
performing school or persistently underperforming pursuant to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 93 –
section 6.6 or 14.25 of this act, respectively, or that is identified as
overcrowded.
(b) May only sponsor a charter school which is located entirely
within the incorporated area of the city or the unincorporated area of
the county, as applicable.
5. The total enrollment growth of a charter school that is new
or expanding pursuant to subsection 4 may account for an
increase in enrollment at the charter school of not more than 15
percent.
6. The board of trustees of a school district, a college or
university within the Nevada System of Higher Education or a city
or county may enter into an agreement with the State Public Charter
School Authority to provide technical assistance and support in
preparing an application to sponsor a charter school and planning
and executing the duties of a sponsor of a charter school as
prescribed in this section.
[6.] 7. Before a board of trustees of a school district, a college
or university within the Nevada System of Higher Education or a
city or county that is approved to sponsor charter schools approves
an application to form a charter school, the board of trustees, college
or university or city or county, as applicable, shall prepare, in
collaboration with the Department and, to the extent practicable, the
school district in which the proposed charter school will be located
and any other sponsor of a charter school located in that school
district, an evaluation of the demographic information of pupils, the
academic needs of pupils and the needs of any pupils who are at risk
of dropping out of school in the geographic areas served by the
sponsor.
[7.] 8. On or before January 31 of each year, the State Public
Charter School Authority shall prepare, in collaboration with the
Department and, to the extent practicable, the board of trustees of
each school district in this State and any other sponsor of a charter
school in this State, an evaluation of the demographic information of
pupils, the academic needs of pupils and the needs of any pupils
who are at risk of dropping out of school in this State.
Sec. 21. NRS 388A.246 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.246 An application to form a charter school must include
all information prescribed by the Department by regulation and:
1. A summary of the plan for the proposed charter school.
2. A clear written description of the mission of the charter
school and the goals for the charter school. A charter school must
have as its stated purpose at least one of the following goals:
(a) Improving the academic achievement of pupils;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 94 –
(b) Encouraging the use of effective and innovative methods of
teaching;
(c) Providing an accurate measurement of the educational
achievement of pupils;
(d) Establishing accountability and transparency of public
schools;
(e) Providing a method for public schools to measure
achievement based upon the performance of the schools; or
(f) Creating new professional opportunities for teachers.
3. A clear description of the indicators, measures and metrics
for the categories of academics, finances and organization that the
charter school proposes to use, the external assessments that will be
used to assess performance in those categories and the objectives
that the committee to form a charter school plans to achieve in those
categories, which must be expressed in terms of the objectives,
measures and metrics. The objectives and the indicators, measures
and metrics used by the charter school must be consistent with the
performance framework adopted by the sponsor pursuant to
NRS 388A.270.
4. A resume and background information for each person who
serves on the board of the charter management organization or the
committee to form a charter school, as applicable, which must
include the name, telephone number, electronic mail address,
background, qualifications, any past or current affiliation with any
charter school in this State or any other state, any potential conflicts
of interest and any other information required by the sponsor.
5. The proposed location of, or the geographic area to be
served by, the charter school and evidence of a need and community
support for the charter school in that area.
6. The minimum, planned and maximum projected enrollment
of pupils in each grade in the charter school for each year that the
charter school would operate under the proposed charter contract.
7. The procedure for applying for enrollment in the proposed
charter school, which must include, without limitation, the proposed
dates for accepting applications for enrollment in each year of
operation under the proposed charter contract and a statement of
whether the charter school will enroll pupils who are in a particular
category of at-risk pupils before enrolling other children who are
eligible to attend the charter school pursuant to NRS 388A.456 and
the method for determining eligibility for enrollment in each such
category of at-risk pupils served by the charter school.
8. The academic program that the charter school proposes to
use, a description of how the academic program complies with the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 95 –
requirements of NRS 388A.366, the proposed academic calendar for
the first year of operation and a sample daily schedule for a pupil in
each grade served by the charter school.
9. A description of the proposed instructional design of the
charter school and the type of learning environment the charter
school will provide, including, without limitation, whether the
charter school will provide a program of distance education,
the planned class size and structure, the proposed curriculum for the
charter school and the teaching methods that will be used at the
charter school.
10. The manner in which the charter school plans to identify
and serve the needs of pupils with disabilities, pupils who are
English learners, pupils who are academically behind their peers and
gifted pupils.
11. A description of any co-curricular or extracurricular
activities that the charter school plans to offer and the manner in
which these programs will be funded.
12. Any uniform or dress code policy that the charter school
plans to use.
13. Plans and timelines for recruiting and enrolling students,
including procedures for any lottery for admission that the charter
school plans to conduct.
14. The rules of behavior and punishments that the charter
school plans to adopt pursuant to NRS 388A.495, including, without
limitation, any unique discipline policies for pupils with disabilities.
15. A chart that clearly presents the proposed organizational
structure of the charter school and a clear description of the roles
and responsibilities of the governing body, administrators and any
other persons included on the chart and a table summarizing the
decision-making responsibilities of the staff and governing body of
the charter school and, if applicable, the charter management
organization that operates the charter school. The table must also
identify the person responsible for each activity conducted by the
charter school, including, without limitation, the person responsible
for establishing curriculum and culture, providing professional
development to employees of the charter school and making
determinations concerning the staff of the charter school.
16. The names of any external organizations that will play a
role in operating the charter school and the role each such
organization will play.
17. The manner in which the governing body of the charter
school will be chosen.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 96 –
18. A staffing chart for the first year in which the charter
school plans to operate and a projected staffing plan for the term of
the charter contract.
19. Plans for recruiting administrators, teachers and other staff,
providing professional development to such staff.
20. Proposed bylaws for the governing body, a description of
the manner in which the charter school will be governed, including,
without limitation, any governance training that will be provided to
the governing body, and a code of ethics for members and
employees of the governing body. The code of ethics must be
prepared with guidance from the Nevada Commission on Ethics and
must not conflict with any policy adopted by the sponsor.
21. Explanations of any partnerships or contracts central to the
operations or mission of the charter school.
22. A statement of whether the charter school will provide for
the transportation of pupils to and from the charter school. If the
charter school will provide transportation, the application must
include the proposed plan for the transportation of pupils. If the
charter school will not provide transportation, the application must
include a statement that the charter school will work with the
parents and guardians of pupils enrolled in the charter school to
develop a plan for transportation to ensure that pupils have access to
transportation to and from the charter school.
23. The procedure for the evaluation of teachers of the charter
school, if different from the procedure prescribed in NRS 391.680
and 391.725. If the procedure is different from the procedure
prescribed in NRS 391.680 and 391.725, the procedure for the
evaluation of teachers of the charter school must provide the same
level of protection and otherwise comply with the standards for
evaluation set forth in NRS 391.680 and 391.725.
24. A statement of the charter school’s plans for food service
and other significant operational services, including a statement of
whether the charter school will provide food service or participate in
the National School Lunch Program, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1751 et seq. If
the charter school will not provide food service or participate in the
National School Lunch Program, the application must include an
explanation of the manner in which the charter school will ensure
that the lack of such food service or participation does not prevent
pupils from attending the charter school.
25. Opportunities and expectations for involving the parents of
pupils enrolled in the charter school in instruction at the charter
school and the operation of the charter school, including, without
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 97 –
limitation, the manner in which the charter school will solicit input
concerning the governance of the charter school from such parents.
26. A detailed plan for starting operation of the charter school
that identifies necessary tasks, the persons responsible for
performing them and the dates by which such tasks will be
accomplished.
27. A description of the financial plan and policies to be used
by the charter school [.] , including, without limitation, a
consideration and description of the efficient use of any public
money received by the charter school in carrying out the financial
plan and policies, including, without limitation, for construction
purposes.
28. A description of the insurance coverage the charter school
will obtain.
29. Budgets for starting operation at the charter school, the first
year of operation of the charter school and the first 5 years of
operation of the charter school, with any assumptions inherent in the
budgets clearly stated.
30. Evidence of any money pledged or contributed to the
budget of the charter school.
31. A statement of the facilities that will be used to operate the
charter school and a plan for operating such facilities, including,
without limitation, any backup plan to be used if the charter school
cannot be operated out of the planned facilities.
32. If the charter school operates a vocational school, a
description of the career and technical education program that will
be used by the charter school.
33. If the charter school will provide a program of distance
education, a description of the system of course credits that the
charter school will use and the manner in which the charter school
will:
(a) Monitor and verify the participation in and completion of
courses by pupils;
(b) Require pupils to participate in assessments and submit
course work;
(c) Conduct parent-teacher conferences; and
(d) Administer any test, examination or assessment required by
state or federal law in a proctored setting.
34. If the charter school will provide a program where a
student may earn college credit for courses taken in high school, a
draft memorandum of understanding between the charter school and
the college or university through which the credits will be earned
and a term sheet, which must set forth:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 98 –
(a) The proposed duration of the relationship between the
charter school and the college or university and the conditions for
renewal and termination of the relationship;
(b) The roles and responsibilities of the governing body of the
charter school, the employees of the charter school and the college
or university;
(c) The scope of the services and resources that will be provided
by the college or university;
(d) The manner and amount that the college or university will be
compensated for providing such services and resources, including,
without limitation, any tuition and fees that pupils at the charter
school will pay to the college or university;
(e) The manner in which the college or university will ensure
that the charter school effectively monitors pupil enrollment and
attendance and the acquisition of college credits; and
(f) Any employees of the college or university who will serve on
the governing body of the charter school.
35. If the applicant currently operates a charter school in
another state, evidence of the performance of such charter schools
and the capacity of the applicant to operate the proposed charter
school.
36. If the applicant proposes to contract with an educational
management organization or any other person to provide
educational or management services:
(a) Evidence of the performance of the educational management
organization or other person when providing such services to a
population of pupils similar to the population that will be served by
the proposed charter school;
(b) A term sheet that sets forth:
(1) The proposed duration of the proposed contract between
the governing body of the charter school and the educational
management organization;
(2) A description of the responsibilities of the governing
body of the charter school, employees of the charter school and the
educational management organization or other person;
(3) All fees that will be paid to the educational management
organization or other person;
(4) The manner in which the governing body of the charter
school will oversee the services provided by the educational
management organization or other person and enforce the terms of
the contract;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 99 –
(5) A disclosure of the investments made by the educational
management organization or other person in the proposed charter
school; and
(6) The conditions for renewal and termination of the
contract; and
(c) A disclosure of any conflicts of interest concerning the
applicant and the educational management organization or other
person, including, without limitation, any past or current
employment, business or familial relationship between any
prospective employee of the charter school and a member of the
committee to form a charter school or the board of directors of the
charter management organization, as applicable.
37. Any additional information that the sponsor determines is
necessary to evaluate the ability of the proposed charter school to
serve pupils in the school district in which the proposed charter
school will be located.
 As used in this section, “pupil with a disability” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 388.417.
Sec. 22. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 23. NRS 388A.255 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.255 1. If the State Public Charter School Authority
receives an application pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 388A.249
or subsection 4 of NRS 388A.252, it shall consider the application
at a public meeting which must be held not later than 120 days after
receipt of the application or a later period mutually agreed upon by
the committee to form the charter school and the State Public
Charter School Authority. If the application states that the charter
school will be located in a county whose population is 100,000 or
more, the meeting must be held in that county. Notice of the
meeting must be posted in accordance with chapter 241 of NRS.
The State Public Charter School Authority shall review the
application in accordance with the requirements for review set forth
in subsections 2 and 3 of NRS 388A.249. The State Public Charter
School Authority may approve an application only if the
requirements of subsection 3 of NRS 388A.249 are satisfied. [Not]
Except as otherwise provided in section 19 of this act, not more
than 30 days after the meeting, the State Public Charter School
Authority shall provide written notice of its determination to the
applicant.
2. If the State Public Charter School Authority denies or fails
to act upon an application, the denial or failure to act must be based
upon a finding that the requirements of subsection 3 of NRS
388A.249 have not been satisfied. The State Public Charter School
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 100 –
Authority shall include in the written notice the reasons for the
denial or the failure to act and the deficiencies. The staff designated
by the State Public Charter School Authority shall meet with the
applicant to confer on the method to correct the identified
deficiencies. The applicant must be granted 30 days after receipt of
the written notice to correct any deficiencies identified in the written
notice and resubmit the application.
3. If the State Public Charter School Authority denies an
application after it has been resubmitted pursuant to subsection 2,
the applicant may, not more than 30 days after the receipt of the
written notice from the State Public Charter School Authority,
appeal the final determination to the district court of the county in
which the proposed charter school will be located.
Sec. 24. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 25. NRS 388A.279 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.279 1. The State Public Charter School Authority [,]
shall, and the board of trustees of the school district, a college or
university within the Nevada System of Higher Education or a city
or county, as applicable, which sponsors a charter school may , hold
a public hearing concerning any request to amend a charter contract
of the charter school it sponsors, including, without limitation, a
request to amend a charter contract for the purpose of:
(a) Expanding the charter school to offer instruction in grade
levels for which the charter school does not already offer
instruction.
(b) Increasing the total enrollment of a charter school or the
enrollment of pupils in a particular grade level in the charter school
for a school year to more than 120 percent of the enrollment
prescribed in the charter contract for that school year.
(c) Reducing the total enrollment of a charter school or the
enrollment of pupils in a particular grade level in the charter school
for a school year to less than 80 percent of the enrollment prescribed
in the charter contract for that school year.
(d) Seeking to acquire an additional facility in any county of this
State to expand the enrollment of the charter school.
(e) Consolidating the operations of multiple charter schools
pursuant to NRS 388A.282.
2. A charter contract may not be amended in any manner
described in subsection 1 unless the amendment is approved by the
State Public Charter School Authority, the board of trustees of the
school district, a college or university within the Nevada System of
Higher Education or a city or county, as applicable.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 101 –
3. The State Public Charter School Authority, the board of
trustees of the school district, a college or university within the
Nevada System of Higher Education or a city or county, as
applicable, must deny a request to amend a charter contract in the
manner described in paragraph (d) or (e) of subsection 1 if the State
Public Charter School Authority, the board of trustees, a college or
university within the Nevada System of Higher Education or a city
or county, as applicable, determines that:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 of NRS
388A.274, the charter school is not meeting the requirements of the
performance framework concerning academics, finances or
organization established pursuant to NRS 388A.273; or
(b) The governing body does not have a comprehensive and
feasible plan to operate additional facilities.
Sec. 25.3. NRS 388A.300 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388A.300 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection]
subsections 5 and 6, subsection 3 of NRS 385A.720 and subsection
6 of NRS 388A.274, the sponsor of a charter school shall terminate
the charter contract of the charter school or restart the charter school
under a new charter contract if the charter school receives, in any
period of [5] 3 consecutive school years, three annual ratings
established as the lowest rating possible indicating
underperformance of a public school, as determined by the
Department pursuant to the statewide system of accountability for
public schools.
2. [A charter school’s annual rating pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability based upon the performance of the charter
school must not be included in the count of annual ratings for the
purposes of subsection 1 for any school year before the 2015-2016
school year.
3.] If a charter contract is terminated or a charter school is
restarted pursuant to subsection 1, the sponsor of the charter school
shall submit a written report to the Department and the governing
body of the charter school setting forth the reasons for the
termination or restart of the charter school not later than 10 days
after terminating the charter contract or restarting the charter school.
[4.] 3. The provisions of NRS 388A.330 do not apply to the
termination of a charter contract or restart of the charter school
pursuant to this section.
[5.] 4. The Department shall adopt regulations governing
procedures to restart a charter school under a new charter contract
pursuant to subsection 1. Such regulations must include, without
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 102 –
limitation, requiring a charter school that is restarted to enroll a
pupil who was enrolled in the charter school before the school was
restarted before any other eligible pupil is enrolled.
[6.] 5. If the sponsor of a charter school determines that not all
of the elementary, middle or high schools in or campuses of the
charter school meet the criteria described in subsection 1 and that
the charter school can remain financially viable if the charter school
continues to operate and serve only the elementary, middle or high
schools or campuses which do not meet the criteria described in
subsection 1, the sponsor may amend the charter contract to
eliminate the elementary, middle or high schools or campuses that
meet the criteria described in subsection 1 and limit the enrollment
in all other elementary, middle or high schools in or campuses of the
charter school.
6. The sponsor of a charter school described in subsection 1
is not required to terminate the charter contract of the charter
school or restart the charter school under a new charter contract
if the charter school received a rating that is:
(a) Within 5 points of the number of points required for the
second lowest rating of performance pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability for public schools or higher; or
(b) Within 10 points of the number of points required for the
second lowest rating of performance pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability for public schools or higher and the
charter school increased its rating from the immediately preceding
school year by at least 50 percent.
Sec. 25.5. NRS 388A.300 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388A.300 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsections]
subsection 5 , [and 6,] subsection 3 of NRS 385A.720 and
subsection 6 of NRS 388A.274, the sponsor of a charter school shall
terminate the charter contract of the charter school or restart the
charter school under a new charter contract if the charter school
receives, in any period of 3 consecutive school years, three annual
ratings established as the lowest rating possible indicating
underperformance of a public school, as determined by the
Department pursuant to the statewide system of accountability for
public schools.
2. If a charter contract is terminated or a charter school is
restarted pursuant to subsection 1, the sponsor of the charter school
shall submit a written report to the Department and the governing
body of the charter school setting forth the reasons for the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 103 –
termination or restart of the charter school not later than 10 days
after terminating the charter contract or restarting the charter school.
3. The provisions of NRS 388A.330 do not apply to the
termination of a charter contract or restart of the charter school
pursuant to this section.
4. The Department shall adopt regulations governing
procedures to restart a charter school under a new charter contract
pursuant to subsection 1. Such regulations must include, without
limitation, requiring a charter school that is restarted to enroll a
pupil who was enrolled in the charter school before the school was
restarted before any other eligible pupil is enrolled.
5. If the sponsor of a charter school determines that not all of
the elementary, middle or high schools in or campuses of the charter
school meet the criteria described in subsection 1 and that the
charter school can remain financially viable if the charter school
continues to operate and serve only the elementary, middle or high
schools or campuses which do not meet the criteria described in
subsection 1, the sponsor may amend the charter contract to
eliminate the elementary, middle or high schools or campuses that
meet the criteria described in subsection 1 and limit the enrollment
in all other elementary, middle or high schools in or campuses of the
charter school.
Sec. 26. NRS 388A.351 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.351 1. On or before February 15 of each year, the
sponsor of a charter school shall submit a written report to the
Department on a form prescribed by the Department. The written
report must include:
(a) A summary evaluating the academic, financial and
organizational performance of the charter school, as measured by
the performance indicators, measures and metrics set forth in the
performance framework for the charter school.
(b) An identification of each charter school approved by the
sponsor:
(1) Which has not opened and the scheduled time for
opening, if any;
(2) Which is open and in operation;
(3) Which has transferred sponsorship;
(4) Whose charter contract has been terminated by the
sponsor;
(5) Whose charter contract has not been renewed by the
sponsor; and
(6) Which has voluntarily ceased operation.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 104 –
(c) A description of the strategic vision of the sponsor for the
charter schools that it sponsors and the progress of the sponsor in
achieving that vision.
(d) A description of the services provided by the sponsor
pursuant to a service agreement entered into with the governing
body of the charter school pursuant to NRS 388A.381, including an
itemized accounting of the actual costs of those services.
(e) The amount of any money from the Federal Government that
was distributed to the charter school, any concerns regarding the
equity of such distributions and any recommendations on how to
improve access to and distribution of money from the Federal
Government.
(f) A description of the expenditures and sources of all
revenues for the charter school.
2. On or before April 1 of each year, the Department shall
submit to the State Board the report required pursuant to this
section, to be reviewed by the State Board.
3. As used in this section, “revenues” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 388A.605.
Sec. 27. NRS 388A.495 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.495 1. A governing body of a charter school shall
adopt:
(a) Written rules of behavior required of and prohibited for
pupils attending the charter school; and
(b) Appropriate punishments for violations of the rules.
2. A pupil enrolled in a charter school shall only be suspended
or expelled in a manner consistent with the requirements for the
suspension or expulsion of a pupil enrolled in a public school within
a school district as set forth in NRS 392.4601 to 392.472, inclusive.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 392.467, if suspension
or expulsion of a pupil is used as a punishment for a violation of the
rules, the charter school shall ensure that, at the time of the
suspension or expulsion, the pupil and, if the pupil is under 18 years
of age, the parent or guardian of the pupil, are given notice of the
charges against him or her, an explanation of the evidence and an
opportunity for a hearing. If a pupil is significantly suspended,
expelled or permanently expelled, the pupil or, if the pupil is under
18 years of age, the parent or guardian of the pupil may appeal the
significant suspension, expulsion or permanent expulsion in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 392.4671. The charter
school shall ensure that a pupil who is significantly suspended,
expelled or permanently expelled and is appealing the significant
suspension, expulsion or permanent expulsion or a pupil who is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 105 –
being considered for significant suspension, expulsion or permanent
expulsion continues to attend school and receives an appropriate
education in the least restrictive environment possible as required by
NRS 392.4676. The provisions of chapter 241 of NRS do not apply
to any hearing or proceeding conducted pursuant to this section.
Such a hearing or proceeding must be closed to the public.
4. A copy of the rules of behavior, prescribed punishments and
procedures to be followed in imposing punishments must be:
(a) Distributed to each pupil at the beginning of the school year
and to each new pupil who enters school during the year.
(b) Available for public inspection at the charter school.
5. The governing body of a charter school may adopt rules
relating to the truancy of pupils who are enrolled in the charter
school if the rules are [at least as] not more restrictive [as] than the
provisions governing truancy set forth in NRS 392.130 to 392.220,
inclusive. If a governing body adopts rules governing truancy, it
shall include the rules in the written rules adopted by the governing
body pursuant to subsection 1.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Expel” or “expulsion” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 392.4603.
(b) “Permanently expelled” means the disciplinary removal of a
pupil from the school in which the pupil is currently enrolled:
(1) Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (2),
without the possibility of returning to the school in which the pupil
is currently enrolled or another public school within the school
district; and
(2) With the possibility of enrolling in a program or public
school for alternative education for pupils who are expelled or
permanently expelled after being permanently expelled.
(c) “Significantly suspended” has the meaning ascribed to
“significant suspension” in NRS 392.4655.
(d) “Suspend” or “suspension” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 392.4607.
Sec. 28. NRS 388A.518 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.518 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, [at
least 80 percent of the teachers] any teacher who [provide] provides
instruction at a charter school in a core academic subject, as set
forth in NRS 389.018, must hold a license or endorsement to teach
issued by the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to
chapter 391 of NRS.
2. If a charter school specializes in the construction industry or
other building industry, teachers who are employed full-time to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 106 –
teach courses of study relating to business and industry must hold a
license or endorsement issued by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS to teach such courses.
3. [A teacher who is employed by a charter school, regardless
of the date of hire, must be licensed to teach pursuant to chapter 391
of NRS if the teacher teaches one or more of the core academic
subjects designated pursuant to NRS 389.018.
4.] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 388A.515, a charter
school may employ a person who does not hold a license or
endorsement to teach issued by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS to teach a course of
study for which a teacher is not required to hold a license or
endorsement if the person has:
(a) A degree, a license or a certificate in the field for which the
person is employed to teach at the charter school; and
(b) At least 2 years of experience in that field.
[5.] 4. A teacher who is employed by a charter school to teach
special education or English as a second language must be licensed
to teach special education or English as a second language, as
applicable.
Sec. 29. Chapter 388D of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 30 to 31.7, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 30. 1. Each school, including, without limitation, a
private school, that receives a grant of money on behalf of a pupil
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 388D.270 shall report to the
Department, on or before July 1 of each year, on a form
prescribed by the Department:
(a) The total number of pupils enrolled in the school for whom
a grant was made during the immediately preceding school year;
and
(b) The total number of pupils for whom a grant was made
during the immediately preceding school year who were no longer
enrolled in the school at the end of the school year, including the
number of pupils who:
(1) Were expelled from the school and the reason for the
expulsion;
(2) Withdrew from enrollment in the school due to a
voluntary decision by the pupil or the parent or guardian of the
pupil and the stated reason for the decision;
(3) After withdrawing from enrollment, as described in
subparagraph (2):
(I) Enrolled in a public school in this State;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 107 –
(II) Enrolled in a private school in this State;
(III) Began homeschooling pursuant to NRS 388D.020;
or
(IV) Were deemed a truant or declared a habitual truant
pursuant to NRS 392.130 or 392.140, respectively; and
(4) Withdrew from enrollment in the school and were credit
deficient in, or failed or were failing courses in at least one of the
core academic subjects set forth in NRS 389.018.
2. The information reported pursuant to subsection 1 must be
disaggregated by:
(a) Grade level;
(b) Gender;
(c) Pupils from major racial and ethnic groups;
(d) Pupils with disabilities; and
(e) Pupils who are economically disadvantaged.
3. The Department shall adopt regulations establishing a
method for schools to track the information that is required to be
reported pursuant to subsection 1.
4. Each school, including, without limitation, each private
school, that receives a grant of money on behalf of a pupil
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 388D.270 and does not comply
with the requirements set forth in subsections 1 and 2 is ineligible
to receive such grants of money during the subsequent school
year.
5. The Department shall, on or before January 1 of each
even-numbered year, prepare a report containing information on
pupils who withdraw from enrollment as described in paragraph
(b) of subsection 1. The Department shall:
(a) Prepare the report by aggregating the data received
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1;
(b) Submit the report to the State Board and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education; and
(c) Publish the report on the Internet website maintained by
the Department.
6. As used in this section, “private school” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 394.103.
Sec. 31. 1. Each school, including, without limitation, a
private school, that receives a grant of money on behalf of a pupil
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 388D.270 shall ensure that each
pupil for whom such a grant is made:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 108 –
(a) Is administered each of the examinations required by this
State pursuant to NRS 390.105 or equivalent national
examinations that are norm-referenced; and
(b) If the pupil is an English learner, is administered the
assessment required pursuant to NRS 390.810.
2. Each school that administers any examinations or
assessments pursuant to subsection 1 shall, to the extent
authorized by the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of
1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, and any regulations adopted pursuant
thereto, provide the results of the examinations and assessments to
the Department. The results must be disaggregated by:
(a) The grade in which the pupil is enrolled;
(b) The gender of the pupil;
(c) The race and ethnicity of the pupil;
(d) Whether the pupil has a disability; and
(e) Whether the pupil is economically disadvantaged.
3. The Department shall adopt regulations:
(a) Establishing a method for schools to track the information
that is required to be provided pursuant to subsection 2; and
(b) Prescribing requirements for the administration of an
examination or assessment pursuant to subsection 1 by a private
school.
4. Each school, including, without limitation, each private
school, that receives a grant of money on behalf of a pupil
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 388D.270 that does not comply
with the requirements set forth in subsections 1 and 2 in a school
year is ineligible to receive such grants of money during the
subsequent school year.
5. The Department shall, on or before January 1 of each
even-numbered year, prepare a report containing information on
the results of examinations and assessments provided to the
Department pursuant to subsection 2. The Department shall:
(a) Prepare the report by aggregating the information received
pursuant to subsection 2;
(b) Submit the report to the State Board and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim
Standing Committee on Education; and
(c) Publish the report on the Internet website maintained by
the Department.
6. As used in this section, “private school” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 394.103.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 109 –
Sec. 31.2. To participate in the Nevada Educational Choice
Scholarship Program, a scholarship organization must register
with the Department of Education by providing:
1. On a form provided by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction:
(a) The name, address and contact information of the
scholarship organization; and
(b) If the scholarship organization uses a fiscal year other
than July 1 to June 30, the period of the fiscal year used by the
scholarship organization;
2. Evidence of an official declaration by the Internal Revenue
Service that the scholarship organization qualifies as a tax-exempt
organization pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c);
3. Confirmation that the scholarship organization is
incorporated pursuant to chapter 82 of NRS;
4. A copy of the written procedures established pursuant to
subsection 2 of section 31.7 of this act; and
5. An affidavit signed by the chief executive officer or
president or chair of the board of directors of the scholarship
organization under penalty of perjury stating that:
(a) No member of the board of directors or employee of the
scholarship organization:
(1) Has declared bankruptcy within the 7 years immediately
preceding the date on which the affidavit is submitted; or
(2) Has ever been convicted of a felony; and
(b) Neither the scholarship organization nor any member of
the board of directors or employee thereof owns or operates a
school in this State that receives grant money from the Nevada
Educational Choice Scholarship Program.
Sec. 31.3. 1. Each scholarship organization that is
registered with the Department of Education pursuant to section
31.2 of this act shall:
(a) Not later than October 15, January 15, March 15 and
June 15 of each year, provide to the Department in a format
prescribed by the Department an electronic list of each pupil on
behalf of whom the scholarship organization awarded a grant
pursuant to NRS 388D.270 for the previous quarter. The
electronic list must include:
(1) Demographic information for each pupil, including,
without limitation, the name, date of birth, grade level, gender and
race or ethnicity of the pupil, whether the pupil has a disability,
the household income of the pupil calculated pursuant to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 110 –
section 31.7 of this act and the name and address of the parent or
guardian of the pupil;
(2) The amount of each grant provided on behalf of a
pupil;
(3) Whether the pupil received any other scholarships in
addition to the grant;
(4) The manner in which money from each grant has been
used, including, without limitation:
(I) The name of each school that has received money
from a grant;
(II) The tuition and fees charged by each school; and
(III) Any portion of such money that has been used to
pay for transportation to and from the school; and
(5) The number of applications for a grant received by the
scholarship organization for which a grant was not awarded and
the reason that a grant was not awarded in each case.
(b) Annually submit to the Department the name of:
(1) The school attended by each pupil on whose behalf a
grant is provided during the school year immediately preceding
the school year for which the grant is awarded or, if such a pupil
was not enrolled in a school, whether the pupil was a
homeschooled child, an opt-in child or was not required to attend
school pursuant to NRS 392.040 for that school year; and
(2) The last public school, if any, attended by each pupil on
whose behalf a grant is provided.
2. The Department of Education shall annually:
(a) Compile the information submitted by each scholarship
organization pursuant to subsection 1; and
(b) Review the information to determine whether to
recommend legislation to revise the priority for awarding grants to
the Legislature.
Sec. 31.4. Each scholarship organization that is registered
with the Department of Education pursuant to section 31.2 of this
act shall:
1. Not more than 180 days after the conclusion of the fiscal
year of the scholarship organization, submit to the Department of
Education a copy of an audited or compiled financial statement of
the scholarship organization prepared by an independent certified
public accountant.
2. If the scholarship organization no longer meets the
qualifications prescribed by law to participate in the Nevada
Educational Choice Scholarship Program as a scholarship
organization or ceases to exist, notify the Department within 30
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 111 –
days. Upon receiving such notification, the Department of
Education shall update the directory maintained pursuant to
section 31.6 of this act and notify the Department of Taxation.
3. Within 72 hours after receiving notice from the
Superintendent of Public Instruction or his or her designee, make
any financial records of the scholarship organization or records
concerning a pupil maintained by the scholarship organization
available to the Superintendent or his or her designee for
inspection during regular business hours.
Sec. 31.5. 1. A scholarship organization that is registered
with the Department of Education pursuant to section 31.2 of this
act shall notify the Department of Taxation in writing not more
than 10 days after receiving a donation from a taxpayer pursuant
to NRS 363A.139 or 363B.119, as applicable, of the amount of the
donation.
2. Any donation received by a scholarship organization must
not be carried forward for more than 5 years after the last day on
the calendar year in which the donation is made.
Sec. 31.6. The Department of Education shall:
1. Maintain on its Internet website a directory of each
scholarship organization that is registered with the Department
pursuant to section 31.2 of this act and, not later than
September 30, December 30, March 30 and June 30 of each year,
submit to the Department of Taxation a list of each such
scholarship organization.
2. Not later than March 30 of each year, submit to the
Governor, the State Board of Education and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau a summary of the information
reported to the Department by each scholarship organization
pursuant to NRS 388D.280.
Sec. 31.7. 1. The parent or guardian of a pupil who meets
the requirements to receive a grant pursuant to NRS 388D.270
may apply to a scholarship organization registered with the
Department of Education pursuant to section 31.2 of this act for
such a grant. A scholarship organization may charge each family
that applies for a grant on behalf of one or more children of the
family an administrative fee of not more than $25.
2. A scholarship organization shall:
(a) Establish written procedures that the scholarship
organization will use to determine whether a pupil meets the
requirements to receive a grant pursuant to NRS 388D.270 and to
award grants on behalf of pupils.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 112 –
(b) Post the procedures established pursuant to paragraph (a)
on an Internet website maintained by the scholarship organization
and provide a written copy of the procedures with each application
form.
(c) Provide an application form to be completed by an
applicant for a grant. A scholarship organization may only award
a grant on behalf of a pupil for whom a complete application is
submitted but is not required to award a grant to a pupil solely
because his or her application is complete.
(d) Verify annually that each pupil on behalf of whom the
scholarship organization awards a grant is a member of a
household that has a household income which is not more than
300 percent of the federally designated level signifying poverty.
Such verification must:
(1) Use the most recent federal poverty guidelines published
in the Federal Register by the United States Department of Health
and Human Services; and
(2) Calculate household income based on the information
reported in the application submitted on behalf of the pupil and in
accordance with the most recent guidance established by the Food
and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of
Agriculture for determining eligibility of pupils for free and
reduced-price meals.
3. A scholarship organization shall award grants on behalf of
pupils in the following order of priority:
(a) A grant must be awarded for the current school year on
behalf of a pupil for whom a completed application was received
on or before the deadline for the submission of such applications
by the scholarship organization and on whose behalf a grant was
awarded for the immediately preceding school year before a grant
is awarded on behalf of any other pupil.
(b) A grant must be awarded on behalf of a pupil for whom a
completed application was received on or before the deadline for
the submission of such applications by the scholarship
organization and who is the sibling of a pupil on whose behalf a
grant has been awarded for the current school year before a grant
is awarded on behalf of other pupils.
(c) A grant must be awarded on behalf of a pupil who is not
described in paragraph (a) or (b) in the order in which the
completed application is received. If there are an insufficient
number of grants available to award a grant on behalf of each
pupil for whom a complete application was received on the same
day:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 113 –
(1) A grant must be awarded on behalf of a pupil who is a
member of a household that has a lower household income before
a grant is awarded on behalf of a pupil who is a member of a
household that has a higher household income;
(2) If two or more applicants are members of households
that have the same household income, a grant must be awarded on
behalf of the pupil who is enrolled in a public school that has
received a lower rating based on the most recent annual report of
the statewide system of accountability for public schools before a
grant is awarded on behalf of a pupil who is enrolled in a public
school that has received higher ratings; and
(3) If two or more applicants are members of households
that have the same household income and attend public schools
that received the same rating based on the most recent annual
report of the statewide system of accountability for public schools,
grants must be awarded on behalf of pupils in this category on a
random basis.
Sec. 31.8. NRS 388D.250 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388D.250 NRS 363A.139, 363B.119 and 388D.250 to
388D.280, inclusive, and sections 31.2 to 31.7, inclusive, of this act
may be cited as the Nevada Educational Choice Scholarship
Program.
Sec. 32. NRS 388D.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388D.260 As used in NRS 388D.250 to 388D.280, inclusive,
and sections 30 to 31.7, inclusive, of this act, unless the context
otherwise requires, “scholarship organization” means an
organization in this State that meets the requirements set forth in
NRS 388D.270.
Sec. 33. NRS 388D.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388D.270 1. A scholarship organization must:
(a) Be exempt from taxation pursuant to section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3).
(b) Not own or operate any school in this State, including,
without limitation, a private school, which receives any grant money
pursuant to the Nevada Educational Choice Scholarship Program.
(c) Accept donations from taxpayers and other persons and may
also solicit and accept gifts and grants.
(d) Not expend more than 5 percent of the total amount of
money accepted pursuant to paragraph (c) to pay its administrative
expenses.
(e) Provide grants on behalf of pupils who are members of a
household that has a household income which is not more than 300
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 114 –
percent of the federally designated level signifying poverty to allow
those pupils to attend schools in this State chosen by the parents or
legal guardians of those pupils, including, without limitation, private
schools. The total amount of a grant provided by the scholarship
organization on behalf of a pupil pursuant to this paragraph must not
exceed $7,755 for Fiscal Year 2015-2016.
(f) Not limit to a single school the schools for which it provides
grants.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e), not limit to
specific pupils the grants provided pursuant to that paragraph.
2. The maximum amount of a grant provided by the
scholarship organization pursuant to paragraph (e) of subsection 1
must be adjusted on July 1 of each year for the fiscal year beginning
that day and ending June 30 in a rounded dollar amount
corresponding to the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price
Index (All Items) published by the United States Department of
Labor for the preceding calendar year. On May 1 of each year, the
Department of Education shall determine the amount of increase
required by this subsection, establish the adjusted amounts to take
effect on July 1 of that year and notify each scholarship organization
of the adjusted amounts. The Department of Education shall also
post the adjusted amounts on its Internet website.
3. A grant provided on behalf of a pupil pursuant to subsection
1 must be paid directly to the school chosen by the parent or legal
guardian of the pupil. Each school that receives such a grant,
including, without limitation, a private school, must comply with
the requirements set forth in sections 30 and 31 of this act.
4. A scholarship organization shall provide each taxpayer and
other person who makes a donation, gift or grant of money to the
scholarship organization pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1
with an affidavit, signed under penalty of perjury, which includes,
without limitation:
(a) A statement that the scholarship organization satisfies the
requirements set forth in subsection 1; and
(b) The total amount of the donation, gift or grant made to the
scholarship organization.
5. Each school in which a pupil is enrolled for whom a grant is
provided by a scholarship organization shall maintain a record of the
academic progress of the pupil. The record must be maintained in
such a manner that the information may be aggregated and reported
for all such pupils . [if reporting is required by the regulations of the
Department of Education.] On or before August 1 of each year,
each school in which a pupil is enrolled for whom a grant is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 115 –
provided by a scholarship organization shall submit to the
Department of Education a report on the academic progress of all
such pupils enrolled in the school during the immediately
preceding school year. The report must be in such form as the
Department may prescribe by regulation and:
(a) Include, without limitation:
(1) The name and grade level of each such pupil;
(2) Information concerning the academic performance of
each such pupil, including, without limitation, grades and
progress assessments;
(3) Information concerning any disciplinary action taken
against each such pupil, including, without limitation, if the pupil
was suspended or expelled; and
(4) A comparison of the academic performance of each
such pupil during the immediately preceding school year and the
school year before that, if the pupil attended the school both years
or information is otherwise available for both years.
(b) Be accompanied by a statement signed by the owner,
executive head or chair of the governing body of the school
certifying under penalty of perjury that, to the best of his or her
knowledge or belief, the information included in the report is
complete and accurate.
6. The Department of Education:
(a) Shall adopt regulations prescribing the contents of and
procedures for applications for grants provided pursuant to
subsection 1.
(b) May adopt such other regulations as the Department
determines necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
(c) Shall compile and analyze the data submitted by schools
pursuant to subsection 5 to evaluate the impact of the Nevada
Educational Choice Scholarship Program and submit, on or
before February 1 of each year, an anonymized summary of the
data and any recommendations for legislation to:
(1) The Governor;
(2) The State Board; and
(3) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
(I) In odd-numbered years, the next regular session of
the Legislature; and
(II) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education.
7. The reporting required pursuant to subsections 5 and 6
must be performed in a manner that complies with the Family
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 116 –
Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1232g,
and any other applicable state and federal privacy laws.
8. If a school fails to comply with the provisions of subsection
5, the Department of Education may suspend or disqualify the
school from receiving grants on behalf of pupils under the Nevada
Educational Choice Scholarship Program. A scholarship
organization shall not make a grant on behalf of a pupil to a
school that has been suspended or disqualified from receiving
grants pursuant to this subsection.
9. As used in this section, “private school” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 394.103.
Sec. 33.1. Chapter 388G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Beginning July 1, 2026, the board of trustees of a school
district may establish a pilot program to designate a public school
within the school district as an innovation school. The State
Public Charter School Authority may designate a charter school
sponsored by the Authority as an innovation school. The purpose
of an innovation school is to implement innovative educational
practices designed to improve pupil achievement, increase
educational equity and address specific challenges within the
public school or community it serves.
2. A public school may be designated as an innovation school
only if:
(a) At least 25 percent of the staff assigned to the public school
express interest in the designation;
(b) More than 50 percent of the staff assigned to the public
school vote in favor of the designation; and
(c) Any collective bargaining rights and agreements remain in
effect after the designation.
3. To be designated as an innovation school, a public school
must develop an innovation plan that:
(a) Identifies specific challenges or barriers to pupil
achievement and proposes evidence-based strategies to address
those challenges or barriers;
(b) Outlines measurable goals and performance benchmarks;
(c) Details the autonomies requested, including, without
limitation, autonomy in any or all of the following:
(1) Curriculum;
(2) Budgeting;
(3) Staffing;
(4) Scheduling; or
(5) Professional development; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 117 –
(d) Describes methods for engaging stakeholders, including,
without limitation, teachers, parents and community members in
the development and implementation of the innovation plan.
4. A public school that has developed an innovation plan
pursuant to subsection 3 shall submit the innovation plan to the
board of trustees of the school district or the State Public Charter
School Authority, as applicable. The board of trustees or State
Public Charter School Authority shall review the plan and, if the
plan is satisfactory, designate the public school as an innovation
school.
5. The board of trustees or State Public Charter School
Authority, as applicable, shall subject an innovation school to
heightened measures of accountability to ensure that the proposed
innovations lead to measurable improvements in pupil outcomes.
An innovation school shall provide to the entity that designated the
innovation school an annual progress report that includes,
without limitation:
(a) Performance of pupils on standardized assessments and
other academic benchmarks;
(b) Progress toward goals specified in the innovation plan; and
(c) Stakeholder engagement and satisfaction metrics.
6. The Department may revoke the designation of an
innovation school if the innovation school fails to meet the
performance benchmarks outlined in its innovation plan or does
not comply with applicable laws and regulations.
7. A group of innovation schools serving geographically
proximate or thematically aligned populations of pupils may be
designated as an innovation zone by the board of trustees of a
school district or the State Public Charter School Authority, as
applicable. The innovation schools within an innovation zone may
collaborate on shared goals, resources and strategies while
maintaining school-level autonomy as outlined in their respective
innovation plans.
8. The board of trustees of a school district or the sponsor of
a charter school, as applicable, shall ensure that an innovation
school has access to adequate resources to implement effectively
its innovation plan. A pilot innovation school may apply for grants
or other funding opportunities provided by the State or the Federal
Government to support innovative educational practices.
9. The pilot innovation school program established pursuant
to this section may include:
(a) Not more than three pilot innovation schools in each
county whose population is 100,000 or more.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 118 –
(b) Not more than one pilot innovation school in each county
whose population is less than 100,000.
10. The Department shall adopt regulations prescribing the
method for reviewing and approving a pilot innovation school
pursuant to subsection 3.
Sec. 33.2. NRS 388G.510 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388G.510 As used in NRS [388G.500] 388G.510 to 388G.810,
inclusive, unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms
defined in NRS 388G.515 to 388G.560, inclusive, have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 33.3. NRS 388G.535 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388G.535 “Local school precinct” means a public school
[which is deemed to be a local school precinct pursuant to NRS
388G.600.] within a large school district, including, without
limitation, any school operating as a specialty school.
Sec. 33.4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 33.5. NRS 388G.570 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388G.570 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
provisions of NRS [388G.500] 388G.510 to 388G.810, inclusive,
apply to each large school district.
2. If any school district that is not a large school district at the
beginning of a school year becomes a large school district during the
school year, the provisions of NRS [388G.500] 388G.510 to
388G.810, inclusive, apply to that school district at the beginning of
the immediately succeeding school year.
Sec. 33.52. NRS 388G.580 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388G.580 1. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
take such actions as deemed necessary and appropriate to ensure
that each large school district carries out the reorganization of the
school district in accordance with NRS [388G.500] 388G.510 to
388G.810, inclusive, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
2. Each large school district shall cooperate with the
Superintendent of Public Instruction in carrying out the provisions
of NRS [388G.500] 388G.510 to 388G.810, inclusive, including,
without limitation, by providing any financial or other information
requested, including any information requested to ensure that the
intent of the provisions of NRS [388G.500] 388G.510 to 388G.810,
inclusive, is carried out.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 119 –
3. Information that may be requested pursuant to subsection 2
and which each large school district must provide upon request to
the Superintendent of Public Instruction includes, without
limitation:
(a) Budgets for personnel, excluding any personally identifiable
information and names, made available by local school precinct and
job function;
(b) Expenditures made by the large school district, including,
without limitation, expenditures for programs, support,
transportation, police, legal services, food services, internal services,
settlements and risk management payments;
(c) The amount paid for general administrative services,
including, without limitation, the salaries of administrators, staff of
central services and school administrators, the salaries of the
members of the board of trustees of the large school district and
support services for the board of trustees, and other amounts paid
for central services and school administration; and
(d) Detailed information regarding other budgetary items of the
large school district, including, without limitation, identification of
all sources of money available to the large school district,
expenditures of money for buildings, capital projects, federally
funded projects and state funded projects and any other expenditures
of money.
4. Each large school district shall provide any information
requested pursuant to subsection 2 as soon as possible and in the
format requested by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. If
the large school district is unable to provide the information in the
format requested, the information must be provided in another easily
interpreted format that is approved by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction.
Sec. 33.53. NRS 388G.590 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388G.590 The State Board shall adopt such regulations as it
deems necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of NRS
[388G.500] 388G.510 to 388G.810, inclusive.
Sec. 33.54. NRS 388G.600 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388G.600 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
each public school within a large school district shall be deemed a
local school precinct, including, without limitation, any school
operating as a specialty school. A charter school or university school
for profoundly gifted pupils shall not be deemed a local
school precinct.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 120 –
2. [Each local school precinct must operate using site-based
decision-making in which certain authority to carry out
responsibilities is transferred from the large school district to the
local school precinct as set forth in NRS 388G.610.
3.] On and after May 8, 2017, a specialty school must not be
reduced in size or converted into any other type of school unless
otherwise specifically provided by law or:
(a) The reduction or conversion is recommended by the local
school precinct and approved by the superintendent and the board of
trustees of the large school district; or
(b) The superintendent with the approval of the board of trustees
of the large school district, determines that there is good cause to
reduce the size of the specialty school or convert the specialty
school into another type of school.
[4.] 3. This section does not authorize a local school precinct:
(a) To change, grant a waiver regarding or in any way affect any
zone of attendance which has been established pursuant to
NRS 388.040.
(b) To change the policy of the large school district concerning
the eligibility and selection of a pupil to attend a specialty school.
Sec. 33.56. NRS 388G.650 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388G.650 1. On or before January 15 of each year, to assist
the local school precincts in preparing their budgets for the next
school year, the superintendent shall establish and make public:
(a) The average unit cost for each type of employee employed to
work at a local school precinct which is determined based upon the
average unit cost across the large school district. A separate average
unit cost must be established for teachers and substitute teachers,
respectively.
(b) A list of equipment, services and supplies that a local school
precinct may obtain from the large school district using the money
allocated to the local school precinct and the cost for such
equipment, services and supplies. The cost of such equipment,
services and supplies must not exceed the actual cost to the large
school district to provide the equipment, services and supplies to the
local school precinct.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, each
local school precinct must carry forward its year-end balance to the
next school year for use by the local school precinct. The large
school district must account for any such amount that is carried
forward as a restricted fund balance.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 121 –
3. If the year-end balance carried forward pursuant to
subsection 2 in any school year exceeds 5 percent of the actual
expenditures of the local school precinct during the immediately
preceding school year, the local school precinct shall spend the
entire amount of money by which the year-end balance carried
forward pursuant to subsection 2 exceeds 5 percent of the actual
expenditures of the local school precinct during the immediately
preceding school year for one or more of the following purposes, in
order of priority:
(a) Tutoring or other supplemental academic achievement
programs within the local school precinct;
(b) Programs to support social and emotional learning within the
local school precinct;
(c) Extracurricular programming for pupils within the local
school precinct;
(d) Tutoring or other supplemental academic achievement
programs within the large school district;
(e) Extracurricular programming for pupils within the large
school district; and
(f) Any other instructional training, program or activity designed
and intended to improve the achievement of pupils enrolled in the
local school precinct.
4. If a local school precinct fails to spend the entire amount of
money by which the year-end balance carried forward pursuant to
subsection 2 exceeds 5 percent of the actual expenditures of the
local school precinct during the immediately preceding school year
within 24 months after the end of the school year from which the
year-end balance is carried forward, the large school district shall
transfer the amount of money by which the balance carried forward
exceeded 5 percent of the actual expenditures of the local school
precinct during the immediately preceding school year, less any
amount spent by the local school precinct pursuant to subsection 3,
to the Education Stabilization Account created by NRS 387.1213.
The local school precinct shall reduce any balance carried forward
by any amount transferred to the Education Stabilization Account
pursuant to this subsection.
5. A large school district [shall not] may intervene to require a
local school precinct to [use either] spend the money [expended]
carried forward pursuant to subsection [3 or 4, or] 2 on the
programs and activities [supported by such money, to supplant any
duty, responsibility or funding owed by the large school district to
any local school precinct.] described in paragraphs (a) to (f),
inclusive, of subsection 3.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 122 –
Sec. 33.57. NRS 388G.660 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388G.660 1. On or before January 15 of each year, the
superintendent shall establish for the next school year [:
(a) The] the estimated total amount of money to be received by
the large school district from all sources, including any year-end
balance that is carried forward, and shall identify the sources of such
a year-end balance and whether the year-end balance is restricted. If
the year-end balance is restricted, the superintendent shall identify
the source of the restriction and the total of amount of money to be
received by the large school district that is unrestricted. Money may
only be identified as restricted if it is required by state or federal
law, if it is proscribed by the Department or if it has been otherwise
encumbered.
[(b) The estimated percentage of the amount of money
determined pursuant to paragraph (a) to be unrestricted that will be
allocated to the local school precincts. The percentage must equal:
(1) For the first school year in which the large school district
operates pursuant to the provisions of NRS 388G.500 to 388G.810,
inclusive, not less than 80 percent of the total amount of money
from all sources received by the large school district that is
unrestricted for the school year; and
(2) For each subsequent school year, 85 percent of the total
amount of money from all sources received by the large school
district that is unrestricted for the school year.
(c) The estimated amount of categorical funding to be received
by the large school district and whether such funding is restricted in
a manner that prohibits the large school district from including that
categorical funding in the amount of funding per pupil that is
allocated to the local school precincts.
(d) The total estimated amount of money that will be allocated
to each local school precinct as determined pursuant to
NRS 388G.680.]
2. The superintendent shall post the information established
pursuant to subsection 1 on the Internet website of the large school
district and make the information available to any person upon
request.
Sec. 33.58. NRS 388G.680 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388G.680 1. [On] Each year, on or before [January 15 of
each year,] a date determined by the superintendent, the
superintendent shall inform each local school precinct of the
estimated amount of money that will be allocated to the local school
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 123 –
precinct for the next school year. The allocation must be based upon
estimates by the large school district of the number of pupils in each
category who will attend the local school precinct after applying the
appropriate weight to each category of pupil . [as determined
pursuant to NRS 388G.670.]
2. If an additional local school precinct is added in the large
school district, for the purpose of determining the first allocation for
the new local school precinct, the large school district must estimate
the number of pupils in each category who will attend the new local
school precinct and the effect on any existing local school precinct.
If the opening of a new local school precinct is anticipated to reduce
the number of pupils who will attend another local school precinct,
for purposes of determining the allocation, the number of pupils
must be adjusted accordingly.
3. The estimated amount of money allocated to each local
school precinct for the next school year must be adjusted on or
before November 1 of each year to reflect the actual number of
pupils in each category who attend the local school precinct.
Sec. 33.59. NRS 388G.690 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388G.690 1. On or before November 1 of the year after the
first year that a large school district operates pursuant to the
provisions of NRS [388G.500] 388G.510 to 388G.810, inclusive,
and on or before [November 1] a date determined by the
superintendent of each year thereafter, the superintendent shall
determine for the immediately preceding school year:
(a) The total per pupil allocation made to each local school
precinct in the large school district and the actual amount expended
by the large school district for the local school precinct;
(b) The amount budgeted by each local school precinct for
teacher salaries and benefits and the actual amount expended by the
large school district for teacher salaries and benefits for teachers
employed at each local school precinct;
(c) The number of teacher vacancies at each local school
precinct and the amount of money included in the allocation to that
local school precinct which the local school precinct used for other
purposes as a result of those vacancies; and
(d) The amount budgeted by each local school precinct for each
type of employee other than teachers and the actual amount
expended by the large school district for salaries and benefits of
such employees at each local school precinct.
2. The superintendent shall post the information determined
pursuant to subsection 1 on the Internet website of the large school
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 124 –
district and make the information available to any person upon
request.
Secs. 33.6 and 33.7. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 33.8. NRS 388G.740 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388G.740 1. An organizational team shall:
(a) Provide assistance and advice to the principal of the local
school precinct regarding the development of the plan of operation
for the local school precinct and vote on whether to approve that
plan of operation;
(b) Provide continued assistance and advice to the principal of
the local school precinct in carrying out the plan of operation for the
local school precinct; and
(c) Whenever a vacancy occurs in the position of principal for
the local school precinct, assist with the selection of the next
principal in accordance with the provisions of this section.
2. The organizational team may provide input regarding the
principal of the local school precinct to the school associate
superintendent not more than two times each school year.
3. Whenever a vacancy occurs in the position of principal for
the local school precinct, the organizational team shall establish a
list of qualifications that the organizational team determines are
desirable for the next principal of the local school precinct and
provide the list to the superintendent. The list of qualifications must
include, without limitation, qualifications relating to the:
(a) Employment history of the candidate;
(b) Ability of the candidate to connect and communicate with
pupils;
(c) Ability of the candidate to provide a safe and respectful
learning environment pursuant to NRS 388.1321; and
(d) Strategies the candidate would implement to improve the
achievement of pupils.
4. The superintendent shall post notice of the vacancy pursuant
to subsection 3. The superintendent shall interview qualified
candidates and establish a list of at least three but not more than five
candidates to submit to the organizational team. One member of the
organizational team must be allowed to participate in interviewing
candidates with the superintendent.
5. From the list of candidates submitted by the superintendent
pursuant to subsection 4, the organizational team shall [rank the]
indicate a preference of candidates for the position of principal [by
preference] and submit a [list with that ranking] written indication
of the preference within 15 school days after receipt of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 125 –
recommendation. The superintendent, [in consultation] after
consulting with the school associate superintendent [,] and the
written indication of preference submitted by the organizational
team, must select a candidate to hire for the position of principal.
Before any vote on the selected candidate, the school associate
superintendent responsible for the local school precinct must make
every effort to notify the members of the organizational team for the
local school precinct of the date, time and location of the scheduled
vote. [The organizational team may reject the selection of the
candidate if at least 75 percent of the members of the organizational
team who are present at the time of the vote elect to do so. The
superintendent must then select a candidate from the remaining
members of the list submitted pursuant to subsection 4.]
6. Each person who participates in interviewing candidates
pursuant to this section shall comply with all laws that apply to an
employer when making a decision about employment.
7. After the principal of the local school precinct is hired, the
superintendent may, in his or her sole discretion, reassign and make
other employment decisions concerning the principal.
Sec. 33.9. NRS 388G.810 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
388G.810 1. On or before October 1 of each year, the
superintendent shall prepare a report with information from the
school year before the immediately preceding school year which
includes, without limitation:
(a) [A summary of the responsibilities for which authority to
carry out was transferred to the local school precincts pursuant to
NRS 388G.610;
(b)] A summary of the results of the surveys administered
pursuant to NRS 388G.800;
[(c)] (b) An assessment of the performance of the local school
precincts based upon specific measures of achievement which are
established by the superintendent on or before January 1 of the
immediately preceding school year;
[(d)] (c) An assessment of the effectiveness of operating local
school precincts and the large school district in the manner set forth
in NRS [388G.500] 388G.510 to 388G.810, inclusive; and
[(e)] (d) Any recommendations for regulations or legislation to
improve the operation of the local school precincts and the large
school district in the manner set forth in NRS [388G.500] 388G.510
to 388G.810, inclusive.
2. The superintendent shall forward the report prepared
pursuant to subsection 1 to the:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 126 –
(a) Governor;
(b) Superintendent of Public Instruction; and
(c) Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to
the members of the Legislature.
Sec. 33.93. Chapter 389 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. To the extent that money is available, the Department shall
establish a pilot program pursuant to which schools selected to
participate in the pilot program integrate science, technology,
engineering and mathematics into instruction in literacy in
kindergarten and grades 1, 2 and 3.
2. To carry out the pilot program, the Department shall issue
a request for proposals from schools or groups of schools to apply
for a grant of money to integrate science, technology, engineering
and mathematics into instruction in literacy in kindergarten and
grades 1, 2 and 3. In response to such a request for proposals, a
school or group of schools may apply to the Department for such a
grant.
3. In determining whether to approve an application for a
grant submitted pursuant to subsection 2, the Department shall
consider:
(a) The quality of the proposed curricula for a program that
integrates texts related to science, technology, engineering and
mathematics into instruction in literacy in kindergarten and
grades 1, 2 and 3 that uses scientifically based reading research;
(b) The proposed instructional strategies; and
(c) The extent to which the approach to instruction is
innovative.
4. Not later than June 1 of the year following the
implementation of the pilot program, a school or group of schools
receiving a grant of money under the pilot program shall submit to
the Department a report that summarizes:
(a) The initial outcomes of the use of the grant received from
the pilot program, including, without limitation, measurable
progress of the foundational literacy skills of pupils;
(b) Feedback from teachers and administrators at the school
or group of schools who participated in the pilot program; and
(c) Recommendations for the integration of science,
technology, engineering and mathematics into instruction in
literacy in kindergarten and grades 1, 2 and 3 throughout this
State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 127 –
5. The Department shall present the findings of the pilot
program to the State Board, and the Department shall determine
whether to:
(a) Extend the pilot program for an additional year;
(b) Expand the pilot program to additional schools; or
(c) Discontinue the pilot program.
6. As used in this section, “scientifically based reading
research” means research that employs rigorous, systematic and
objective:
(a) Methods to gain knowledge from multiple disciplines to
understand how children learn to read;
(b) Strategies or methods to teach children to read; and
(c) Approaches to overcome reading difficulties.
Sec. 33.95. NRS 389.026 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
389.026 1. The State Board shall develop a model curriculum
for the subject areas of English language arts and mathematics for
each grade level in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive. The
State Board shall use the results of the pilot program established
pursuant to section 33.93 of this act to determine whether the
model curriculum for the subject area of English language arts
for each grade level in kindergarten and grades 1, 2 and 3 should
include, without limitation, phonics-based instruction and the
integration of science, technology, engineering and mathematics
into instruction in English language arts.
2. The Department shall provide each model curriculum
developed pursuant to subsection 1 to:
(a) The board of trustees of each school district; and
(b) The governing body of each regional training program for
the professional development of teachers and administrators.
3. The Department shall provide to the governing body of each
charter school the model curriculum developed pursuant to
subsection 1 for the grade levels taught at the charter school.
4. The board of trustees of each school district shall make
available to each public school within the school district the model
curriculum for the grade levels taught at the public school.
5. The model curriculum may be used as a guide by teachers
and administrators in developing class lesson plans to ensure
compliance with the academic standards adopted for English
language arts and mathematics.
6. The governing body of each regional training program for
the professional development of teachers and administrators may
use the model curriculum in the provision of training to teachers and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 128 –
administrators to ensure compliance with the academic standards
adopted for English language arts and mathematics.
Sec. 33.97. NRS 389.520 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
389.520 1. The Council shall:
(a) Establish standards of content and performance, including,
without limitation, a prescription of the resulting level of
achievement, for the grade levels set forth in subsection 5, based
upon the content of each course, that is expected of pupils for the
following courses of study:
(1) English language arts;
(2) Mathematics;
(3) Science;
(4) Social studies, which includes only the subjects of
history, geography, economics, civics, financial literacy and
multicultural education;
(5) The arts;
(6) Computer education and technology, which includes
computer science and computational thinking;
(7) Health;
(8) Physical education; and
(9) A foreign or world language.
(b) Establish a schedule for the periodic review and, if
necessary, revision of the standards of content and performance. The
review must include, without limitation, the review required
pursuant to NRS 390.115 of the results of pupils on the
examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105.
(c) Assign priorities to the standards of content and performance
relative to importance and degree of emphasis and revise the
standards, if necessary, based upon the priorities.
2. The standards for computer education and technology must
include a policy for the ethical, safe and secure use of computers
and other electronic devices. The policy must include, without
limitation:
(a) The ethical use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation:
(1) Rules of conduct for the acceptable use of the Internet
and other electronic devices; and
(2) Methods to ensure the prevention of:
(I) Cyber-bullying;
(II) Plagiarism; and
(III) The theft of information or data in an electronic
form;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 129 –
(b) The safe use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation, methods to:
(1) Avoid cyber-bullying and other unwanted electronic
communication, including, without limitation, communication with
on-line predators;
(2) Recognize when an on-line electronic communication is
dangerous or potentially dangerous; and
(3) Report a dangerous or potentially dangerous on-line
electronic communication to the appropriate school personnel;
(c) The secure use of computers and other electronic devices,
including, without limitation:
(1) Methods to maintain the security of personal identifying
information and financial information, including, without limitation,
identifying unsolicited electronic communication which is sent for
the purpose of obtaining such personal and financial information for
an unlawful purpose;
(2) The necessity for secure passwords or other unique
identifiers;
(3) The effects of a computer contaminant;
(4) Methods to identify unsolicited commercial material; and
(5) The dangers associated with social networking Internet
sites; and
(d) A designation of the level of detail of instruction as
appropriate for the grade level of pupils who receive the instruction.
3. The standards for social studies must include multicultural
education, including, without limitation, information relating to
contributions made by men and women from various racial and
ethnic backgrounds. The Council shall consult with members of the
community who represent the racial and ethnic diversity of this
State in developing such standards.
4. The standards for health must include mental health and the
relationship between mental health and physical health.
5. The Council shall establish standards of content and
performance for each grade level in kindergarten and grades 1 to 8,
inclusive, for English language arts and mathematics. The Council
shall establish standards of content and performance for the grade
levels selected by the Council for the other courses of study
prescribed in subsection 1. The standards for kindergarten and
grades 1, 2 and 3 for English language arts must:
(a) Incorporate phonics-based instruction, including, without
limitation, phonics-based foundational literacy skills that focus on
explicit, systematic, sequential and cumulative instruction in:
(1) Phonological and phonemic awareness;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 130 –
(2) Phonics, including, without limitation, decoding and
encoding;
(3) Fluency;
(4) Vocabulary; and
(5) Comprehension; and
(b) Integrate science, technology, engineering and
mathematics texts into instruction in English language arts to
expose pupils to foundational concepts in science, technology,
engineering and mathematics through engaging and age-
appropriate reading materials.
6. The Council shall forward to the State Board the standards
of content and performance established by the Council for each
course of study. The State Board shall:
(a) Adopt the standards for each course of study, as submitted
by the Council; or
(b) If the State Board objects to the standards for a course of
study or a particular grade level for a course of study, return those
standards to the Council with a written explanation setting forth the
reason for the objection.
7. If the State Board returns to the Council the standards of
content and performance for a course of study or a grade level, the
Council shall:
(a) Consider the objection provided by the State Board and
determine whether to revise the standards based upon the objection;
and
(b) Return the standards or the revised standards, as applicable,
to the State Board.
 The State Board shall adopt the standards of content and
performance or the revised standards, as applicable.
8. The Council shall work in cooperation with the State Board
to prescribe the examinations required by NRS 390.105.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Computer contaminant” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 205.4737.
(b) “Cyber-bullying” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388.123.
(c) “Electronic communication” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 388.124.
Sec. 34. Chapter 390 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Each school within a school district shall, on or before
July 1 of each year, prepare and submit to the board of trustees of
the school district a report detailing the aggregate amount of class
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 131 –
time used for preparing for and conducting examinations and
assessments during the immediately preceding school year.
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall, on or
before July 31 of each year, submit to the Department each report
received pursuant to subsection 1.
3. The Department shall, on or before January 1 of each
year, submit each report received pursuant to subsection 2 to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(a) In odd-numbered years, the Senate and Assembly Standing
Committees on Education; and
(b) In even-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education.
4. The Department shall:
(a) On or before January 1, 2027, develop a plan to provide
assistance to schools that exceed the limitation described in
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 390.805; and
(b) Create a corrective action plan for each such school to
limit the time to prepare for or conduct an examination or
assessment to not more than 2 percent of the total number of
annual minutes of attendance required for a pupil.
5. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise
requires, “examination or assessment” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 390.805.
Sec. 35. NRS 390.805 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.805 1. The Department shall adopt regulations that, for
an examination or assessment administered pursuant to this chapter
or required to be administered by the board of trustees of a school
district, the governing body of a charter school or a public school on
a district-wide or school-wide basis, as applicable, prescribe limits
on the:
(a) Actual time taken from [instruction] a school day to prepare
for or conduct an examination or assessment; and
(b) Number of examinations or assessments administered to
pupils in a school year.
2. The regulations adopted by the Department pursuant to
subsection 1 must:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), prohibit
using more than 2 percent of the total number of annual minutes
of attendance required for a pupil, excluding time prescribed for
recess, for preparing for or conducting an examination or
assessment; and
(b) Provide exceptions from the limitation described in
paragraph (a):
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 132 –
(1) That are necessary to comply with the requirements of
federal law, including, without limitation, the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., and section
204 of the Equal Educational Opportunities Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C.
§ 1703(f);
(2) For a pupil who is being administered an examination
or assessment as a result of the pupil participating in:
(I) An advanced placement course;
(II) An international baccalaureate course;
(III) A program of career and technical education; or
(IV) Any plan, procedure, program or service for the
purpose of improving the literacy of pupils enrolled in an
elementary school pursuant to NRS 388.157; and
(3) For a pupil who is administered an examination or
assessment to screen for any special needs of the pupil, including,
without limitation, any difficulty in English language acquisition
or any disability.
3. If the board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school intends to administer an examination or
assessment that would exceed a limitation in a regulation adopted by
the Department pursuant to subsection 1, the board of trustees of the
school district or the governing body of the charter school must
request a waiver from the State Board to exceed the limitation. The
State Board may grant a waiver requested pursuant to this
subsection if the State Board deems it appropriate.
4. As used in this section, “examination or assessment”
means a federal, state or locally mandated test that is intended to
measure the academic readiness, learning progress and skill
acquisition of a pupil. The term does not include:
(a) A quiz or test developed by a teacher or time devoted to
quizzes, examinations, reviews of portfolios or evaluations of
performance that are initiated by a teacher; or
(b) A test that is not administered to all pupils but is
administered to a subset of pupils to obtain data based on
statistical sampling.
Sec. 36. Chapter 391 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 37 to 38.8, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 37. 1. There is hereby created the Commission on
Recruitment and Retention within the Department, consisting of:
(a) The following five nonvoting, ex officio members:
(1) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, or his or her
designee;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 133 –
(2) The Chancellor of the Nevada System of Higher
Education, or his or her designee; and
(3) The Dean of the College of Education at:
(I) The University of Nevada, Reno;
(II) The University of Nevada, Las Vegas; and
(III) Nevada State University; and
(b) The following 17 voting members:
(1) One member who works in the field of human
resources, appointed by the Governor;
(2) One member who is a representative of a private
business or industry of this State, appointed by the Governor;
(3) Two members appointed by the Majority Leader of the
Senate;
(4) Two members appointed by the Speaker of the
Assembly;
(5) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Senate;
(6) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Assembly;
(7) One member who is a teacher and is a member of the
Nevada State Education Association, appointed by the President of
that Association;
(8) One member who is a teacher and is a member of the
Clark County Education Association, appointed by the President
of that Association;
(9) One member who is an education support professional
at a school in this State, appointed by the Education Support
Employees Association;
(10) One member who is another licensed educational
professional at a school in this State, appointed by the Clark
County Education Association;
(11) One member who is the superintendent of schools of a
school district in this State, appointed by the Nevada Association
of School Superintendents;
(12) One member who is an administrator at a school,
appointed by the Nevada Association of School Administrators;
(13) One member who is an elected member of the board of
trustees of a school district in this State, appointed by the Nevada
Association of School Boards or its successor organization;
(14) One member appointed by the State Public Charter
School Authority; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 134 –
(15) One member who is a parent or legal guardian of a
pupil enrolled in a public school in this State, appointed by the
Nevada Parent Teacher Association.
2. The Majority Leader and Minority Leader of the Senate
and the Speaker and Minority Leader of the Assembly shall
coordinate their respective appointments of members pursuant to
subsection 1 to ensure that:
(a) Two members are representatives of a private business or
industry of this State; and
(b) Two members work in the field of human resources.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall call the
first meeting of the Commission. At its first meeting and annually
thereafter, the members of the Commission shall elect a Chair and
Vice Chair from among the members of the Commission.
4. Members of the Commission serve without compensation,
except that for each day or portion of a day during which a
member of the Commission attends a meeting of the Commission
or is otherwise engaged in the business of the Commission, the
member is entitled to receive the per diem allowance and travel
expenses provided for state officers and employees generally.
5. As used in this section, “education support professional”
means a person, other than a teacher or administrator, who is
employed to work at a public school. The term includes, without
limitation:
(a) Paraprofessionals;
(b) School police officers, school resource officers and other
providers of security services at a school;
(c) School nurses;
(d) School counselors;
(e) School psychologists;
(f) School social workers;
(g) Drivers of school buses;
(h) Secretaries;
(i) Members of the custodial or maintenance staff; and
(j) Workers in food services.
Sec. 38. The Commission on Recruitment and Retention
created by section 37 of this act shall:
1. Conduct a study of issues concerning the recruitment and
retention of educators in this State, including, without limitation:
(a) The use by school districts of a minimum salary scale for
the compensation of teachers that would reflect the cost of living
and include an annual cost of living increase;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 135 –
(b) Providing health insurance to educators through the
Public Employees’ Benefits Program;
(c) The allocation of funding for mentorship programs for
educators;
(d) The allocation of funding for scholarships for students
seeking to become a school counselor, school social worker or
school psychologist;
(e) The provision of Nevada Teacher Advancement
Scholarships pursuant to NRS 391A.650 to 391A.695, inclusive;
(f) The allocation of funding to school districts to assist a
licensed teacher with obtaining an endorsement in a subject area
in which a shortage of teachers has been identified by the
Department or the school district; and
(g) The establishment and funding of a program to provide
forgiveness of student education loans to licensed teachers who
have taught in this State for at least 5 consecutive years and are
ineligible for other forms of loan forgiveness.
2. On or before November 15 of each odd-numbered year:
(a) Prepare an interim report describing the activities taken by
the Commission during the immediately preceding fiscal year; and
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee
on Education.
3. On or before November 15 of each even-numbered year:
(a) Prepare a report describing the findings of the study
conducted pursuant to subsection 1 and any recommendations for
legislation; and
(b) Submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau for transmittal to the Senate and Assembly Standing
Committees on Education.
Sec. 38.2. 1. A school employee is immune from both
criminal and civil liability for actions taken in good faith to
intervene in physical altercations, fights or other incidents that
pose an imminent risk to the safety of pupils, other school
employees and persons in proximity to the altercation, fight or
incident, provided that:
(a) The school employee is acting within the course and scope
of his or her employment and within the course and scope of his
or her role in maintaining order, discipline or the safety of pupils;
(b) The actions of the school employee are consistent with
federal, state and local laws and the policies of the school district
employing the school employee or the school at which the school
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 136 –
employee is employed relating to the maintenance of safety and
discipline; and
(c) Any harm caused by the intervention was not the result of:
(1) Willful or intentional misconduct;
(2) Gross negligence;
(3) Reckless misconduct; or
(4) A conscious, flagrant indifference to the rights or safety
of the person harmed.
2. If any school employee intervenes in a fight or altercation
involving a pupil, the school employee shall report the incident to
school administration as soon as practicable and in accordance
with the policies and protocols established by the school district
employing the school employee or the school at which the school
employee is employed.
3. Each school or school district shall maintain a record of
reports received pursuant to subsection 2 and use the records only
to assess the need for additional training, support or policy
adjustments to improve school safety practices.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Intervene” or “intervention” means taking any physical
or verbal action to prevent, separate or otherwise manage pupils in
a manner designed to avoid imminent harm to pupils, school
employees or others in proximity to the area in which such actions
are taken.
(b) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
who is employed by:
(1) A board of trustees of a school district pursuant to NRS
391.100 or 391.281; or
(2) The governing body of a charter school.
Sec. 38.3. 1. In consultation with the Teacher and Leaders
Council of Nevada created by NRS 391.455, the Department shall
adopt regulations establishing a framework for the establishment
of a performance improvement plan for a postprobationary
administrator who receives an evaluation designating his or her
overall performance as ineffective or minimally effective for 2
consecutive school years.
2. A performance improvement plan must be established for
any postprobationary administrator who receives an evaluation
designating his or her overall performance as ineffective or
minimally effective for 2 consecutive school years.
3. A performance improvement plan established pursuant to
subsection 2 must contain clear and measurable goals for the
improvement of instructional practices, pupil engagement and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 137 –
academic outcomes that are aligned with educational standards in
this State and that directly address areas of underperformance
identified in the evaluations of the postprobationary administrator.
4. A postprobationary administrator for whom a performance
improvement plan is established shall participate in programs of
professional development training to address the areas of
underperformance identified in the evaluations of the
postprobationary administrator, including, without limitation,
professional development training in:
(a) Instructional strategies for improving pupil engagement
and classroom differentiation;
(b) Data-driven instruction and the use of formative
assessments to track pupil progress; or
(c) Classroom management techniques and behavioral
interventions to promote a positive learning environment.
5. Each school district and governing body of a charter
school shall ensure that an experienced mentor or leadership
coach is assigned to each postprobationary administrator for
whom a performance improvement plan is established. The
mentor or leadership coach shall:
(a) Provide regular feedback;
(b) Conduct classroom observations; and
(c) Assist the administrator in developing and implementing
new instructional strategies.
6. At least once each school quarter, the principal of the
school of a postprobationary administrator for whom a
performance improvement plan is established, or the
superintendent of schools of a school district or his or her
designee if the postprobationary administrator is a principal, shall
review and assess the progress of the postprobationary
administrator toward achieving the goals of the performance
improvement plan.
Sec. 38.4. 1. The superintendent of schools of a school
district or the governing body of a charter school may place a
postprobationary administrator on probation for a period of 2
school years if, based on the evaluation of the postprobationary
administrator pursuant to NRS 391.710, the superintendent or
governing body determines that the postprobationary
administrator:
(a) Is consistently ineffective in meeting instructional practice
standards, pupil performance standards and classroom
management standards; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 138 –
(b) Fails to demonstrate adequate progress under a
performance improvement plan established pursuant to section
38.3 of this act.
2. Upon placing a postprobationary administrator on
probation pursuant to subsection 1, the superintendent or
governing body shall give written notice to the postprobationary
administrator that the postprobationary administrator has been
placed on probation pursuant to this section. The written notice
must contain an explanation of areas of underperformance for
which the postprobationary administrator has been placed on
probation pursuant to this section and a performance
improvement plan established pursuant to section 38.3 of this act
that details the support and interventions that will be provided to
the postprobationary administrator.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, during a
period of probation imposed pursuant to this section, the
postprobationary administrator must not be reassigned or
transferred to another school in the school district or otherwise
employed at another school or charter school in the school district.
The postprobationary administrator may be reassigned or
transferred during a period of probation imposed pursuant to this
section if the reassignment or transfer is required because of low
enrollment, program elimination or other district-wide or school-
wide operational needs. Any such transfer or reassignment must
be made in accordance with the policies and procedures of the
school district or charter school, and such reassignment or
transfer must not conflict with the terms of the period of probation
imposed pursuant to this section.
4. Upon the conclusion of a period of probation imposed
pursuant to this section, the postprobationary administrator must
be evaluated to determine whether the postprobationary
administrator has met improvement goals. If, based on the
evaluation, the postprobationary administrator:
(a) Has met the improvement goals, the postprobationary
administrator must be removed from probation.
(b) Has shown improvement and progress toward meeting the
improvement goals, the period of probation imposed pursuant to
this section may be extended for 1 additional school year and the
postprobationary administrator must continue to receive support
and monitoring under a performance improvement plan
established pursuant to section 38.3 of this act.
(c) Has failed to make adequate progress toward achieving the
improvement goals, the postprobationary administrator may be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 139 –
given notice pursuant to NRS 391.820 that the postprobationary
administrator will not be reemployed or the superintendent may
initiate the process for dismissing the postprobationary
administrator pursuant to NRS 391.822, 391.824 and 391.826. A
postprobationary administrator who is not reemployed or for
whom a process for dismissal is initiated pursuant to NRS
391.822, 391.824 and 391.826 may apply for another position
within the school district or charter school, as applicable.
5. A postprobationary administrator who is placed on
probation pursuant to this section shall be deemed a probationary
employee for the purposes of NRS 391.650 to 391.826, inclusive,
and must serve an additional probationary period in accordance
with the provisions of NRS 391.820, except that the duration of
that period of probation must be determined in accordance with
the provisions of this section.
6. The postprobationary administrator placed on probation
pursuant to this section:
(a) Shall not be reemployed pursuant to NRS 391.820 or shall
be dismissed pursuant to NRS 391.822, 391.824 and 391.826 if the
postprobationary administrator is determined to have failed to
meet the objectives in the performance improvement plan
established for the postprobationary administrator and the
dismissal is in the best interest of the pupils and the school.
(b) May be reassigned or have any other consequences
imposed only if compelling evidence demonstrates extenuating
circumstances contributing to the underperformance and it is in
the best interest of the pupils in the school for the administrator to
be reassigned or have other consequences imposed.
7. The Department shall provide support to a school district
or charter school that does not reemploy or dismisses a
postprobationary administrator pursuant to subsection 6. Such
support may include, without limitation:
(a) Assistance in recruiting and hiring highly effective
administrators to fill any resulting vacancies; and
(b) Access to leadership and instructional coaching resources
to support school leadership in managing transitions and
improving instructional leadership practices.
Sec. 38.6. 1. The Department shall establish a data-
tracking system to monitor programs in this State, or that receive
funding from this State, to provide training for school
administrators.
2. The data-tracking system established pursuant to
subsection 1 must record program participation, licensure
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 140 –
completion rates and relevant data to assess the effectiveness of
each program.
3. The Department shall produce an annual report evaluating
the impact on school achievement and pupil achievement of
school administrators who completed training through each
program in this State, or that receives funding from this State, to
provide training for school administrators. The report must:
(a) Analyze the relative performance of school administrators;
(b) Be presented at a meeting of the State Board; and
(c) Include, without limitation:
(1) An evaluation of the direct impact on the academic
performance of pupils of school administrators who received
training from each program. This evaluation must utilize growth
measures as calculated through the statewide system of
accountability for public schools, providing insights into the
effectiveness of each program in preparing school administrators
to positively influence the achievement of pupils.
(2) Comparative data on the performance of school
administrators from different licensure preparation programs,
including traditional institutions of higher education and
alternative routes to licensure. This analysis must examine the
ability of school administrators from each program to drive pupil
growth and improve academic success within their respective
schools.
4. Based on findings from the annual report produced
pursuant to subsection 3, the Department shall make
recommendations to the State Board and the Nevada System of
Higher Education for continuous improvement in administrator
licensure programs, emphasizing evidence-based practices that
demonstrate a positive impact on pupil achievement. The
Department shall work collaboratively with the Nevada System of
Higher Education to establish a data-sharing agreement that
facilitates the evaluation of licensure programs and their
effectiveness, which must ensure the secure and accurate sharing
of data necessary to monitor program outcomes and support
evidence-based recommendations.
Sec. 38.7. 1. In consultation with the Teachers and Leaders
Council of Nevada created by NRS 391.455, the Department shall
adopt regulations establishing a framework for the establishment
of a performance improvement plan for a postprobationary
teacher who receives an evaluation designating his or her overall
performance as ineffective or minimally effective for 2 consecutive
school years.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 141 –
2. A performance improvement plan must be established for
any postprobationary teacher who receives an evaluation
designating his or her overall performance as ineffective or
minimally effective for 2 consecutive school years.
3. A performance improvement plan established pursuant to
subsection 2 must contain clear and measurable goals for the
improvement of instructional practices, pupil engagement and
academic outcomes that are aligned with educational standards in
this State and that directly address areas of underperformance
identified in the evaluations of the postprobationary teacher.
4. A postprobationary teacher for whom a performance
improvement plan is established shall participate in programs of
professional development training to address the areas of
underperformance identified in the evaluations of the
postprobationary teacher, including, without limitation,
professional development training in:
(a) Instructional strategies for improving pupil engagement
and classroom differentiation;
(b) Data-driven instruction and the use of formative
assessments to track pupil progress; and
(c) Classroom management techniques and behavioral
interventions to promote a positive learning environment.
5. Each school district and governing body of a charter
school shall ensure that an experienced mentor or instructional
coach is assigned to each postprobationary teacher for whom a
performance improvement plan is established. The mentor or
instructional coach shall:
(a) Provide regular feedback;
(b) Conduct classroom observations; and
(c) Assist the postprobationary teacher in developing and
implementing new instructional strategies.
6. At least once each school quarter, the leadership team of
the school of a postprobationary teacher for whom a performance
improvement plan is established shall review and assess the
progress of the postprobationary teacher toward achieving the
goals of the performance improvement plan.
7. As used in this section, “leadership team” means the
principal and any assistant principals assigned to a school.
Sec. 38.8. 1. The superintendent of schools of a school
district or executive director of a charter school may place a
postprobationary teacher on probation for a period of 2 school
years if, based on the evaluation of the postprobationary teacher
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 142 –
pursuant to NRS 391.690, the superintendent or executive director
determines that the postprobationary teacher:
(a) Is consistently ineffective in meeting instructional practice
standards, pupil performance standards and classroom
management standards; or
(b) Fails to demonstrate adequate progress under a
performance improvement plan established pursuant to section
38.7 of this act.
2. Upon placing a postprobationary teacher on probation
pursuant to subsection 1, the superintendent shall give written
notice to the postprobationary teacher that the postprobationary
teacher has been placed on probation pursuant to this section. The
written notice must contain an explanation of areas of
underperformance for which the postprobationary teacher has
been placed on probation pursuant to this section and a
performance improvement plan established pursuant to section
38.7 of this act that details the support and interventions that will
be provided to the postprobationary teacher.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, during a
period of probation imposed pursuant to this section, the
postprobationary teacher must not be reassigned or transferred to
another school in the school district or charter school or otherwise
employed at another school in the school district or charter school.
The postprobationary teacher may be reassigned or transferred
during a period of probation imposed pursuant to this section if
the reassignment or transfer is required because of low
enrollment, program elimination or other district-wide or school-
wide operational needs. Any such transfer or reassignment must
be made in accordance with the policies and procedures of the
school district or charter school, and such reassignment or
transfer must not conflict with the terms of the period of probation
imposed pursuant to this section.
4. Upon the conclusion of a period of probation imposed
pursuant to this section, the postprobationary teacher must be
evaluated to determine whether the postprobationary teacher has
met improvement goals. If, based on the evaluation, the
postprobationary teacher:
(a) Has met the improvement goals, the postprobationary
teacher must be removed from probation.
(b) Has shown improvement and progress toward meeting the
improvement goals, the period of probation imposed pursuant to
this section may be extended for 1 additional school year and the
postprobationary teacher must continue to receive support and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 143 –
monitoring under a performance improvement plan established
pursuant to section 38.7 of this act.
(c) Has failed to make adequate progress toward achieving the
improvement goals, the postprobationary teacher may be given
notice pursuant to NRS 391.820 that the postprobationary teacher
will not be reemployed or the superintendent or executive director
may initiate the process for dismissing the postprobationary
teacher pursuant to NRS 391.822, 391.824 and 391.826.
5. A postprobationary teacher who is placed on probation
pursuant to this section shall be deemed a probationary employee
for the purposes of NRS 391.650 to 391.826, inclusive, and must
serve an additional probationary period in accordance with NRS
391.820, except that the duration of that probationary period must
be determined in accordance with the provisions of this section.
6. The postprobationary teacher placed on probation
pursuant to this section:
(a) Shall not be reemployed pursuant to NRS 391.820 or shall
be dismissed pursuant to NRS 391.822, 391.824 and 391.826 if the
postprobationary teacher is determined to have failed to meet the
objectives in the performance improvement plan established for
the postprobationary teacher and the dismissal is in the best
interest of the pupils and the school.
(b) May be reassigned or have any other consequences
imposed only if compelling evidence demonstrates extenuating
circumstances contributing to the underperformance and it is in
the best interest of the pupils in the school for the teacher to be
reassigned or have other consequences imposed.
7. The Department shall provide support to a school district
or charter school that does not reemploy or dismisses a
postprobationary teacher pursuant to subsection 6. Such support
may include, without limitation:
(a) Assistance in recruiting and hiring highly effective
teachers to fill any resulting vacancies; and
(b) Access to leadership and instructional coaches to support
school leadership in managing transitions and improving teaching
practices.
Sec. 39. NRS 391.019 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.019 1. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.027,
the] The Commission shall adopt regulations:
(a) Prescribing the qualifications for licensing teachers and other
educational personnel and the procedures for the issuance and
renewal of those licenses. The regulations:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 144 –
(1) Must include, without limitation, the qualifications for
licensing teachers and administrators pursuant to an alternative route
to licensure which provides that the required education and training
may be provided by any qualified provider which has been approved
by the Commission, including, without limitation, institutions of
higher education and other providers that operate independently of
an institution of higher education. The regulations adopted pursuant
to this subparagraph must:
(I) Establish the requirements for approval as a qualified
provider;
(II) Require a qualified provider to be selective in its
acceptance of students;
(III) Require a qualified provider to provide in-person or
virtual supervised, school-based experiences and ongoing support
for its students, such as mentoring and coaching;
(IV) Significantly limit the amount of course work
required or provide for the waiver of required course work for
students who achieve certain scores on tests;
(V) Allow for the completion in 2 years or less of the
education and training required under the alternative route to
licensure;
(VI) Provide that a person who has completed the
education and training required under the alternative route to
licensure and who has satisfied all other requirements for licensure
may apply for a regular license pursuant to sub-subparagraph (VII)
regardless of whether the person has received an offer of
employment from a school district, charter school or private school;
and
(VII) Upon the completion by a person of the education
and training required under the alternative route to licensure and the
satisfaction of all other requirements for licensure, provide for the
issuance of a regular license to the person pursuant to the provisions
of this chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant to this chapter.
(2) Must require an applicant for a license to teach middle
school or junior high school education or secondary education to
demonstrate proficiency in a field of specialization or area of
concentration by successfully completing course work prescribed by
the Department or completing a subject matter competency
examination prescribed by the Department with a score deemed
satisfactory.
(3) Must not prescribe qualifications which are more
stringent than the qualifications set forth in NRS 391.0315 for a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 145 –
licensed teacher who applies for an additional license in accordance
with that section.
(b) Identifying fields of specialization in teaching which require
the specialized training of teachers.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.125, requiring
teachers to obtain from the Department an endorsement in a field of
specialization to be eligible to teach in that field of specialization.
(d) Setting forth the educational requirements a teacher must
satisfy to qualify for an endorsement in each field of specialization.
The regulations must require that, to teach pupils enrolled in
kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or 3, a teacher must complete a course
of instruction in foundational literacy skills that satisfies the
requirements set forth in regulations adopted by the Commission.
Such regulations must require that, on or after July 1, 2028, a
person who applies for an initial license to teach or for the
renewal of such a license who will teach pupils enrolled in
kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or 3 must have completed a course
required pursuant to this paragraph or professional development
that is provided at no cost to the teacher or his or her employer by
a regional training program, as defined in NRS 391A.105. The
Commission shall develop regulations to ensure that approved
teacher preparation programs include in any program of
preparation for teaching pupils enrolled in kindergarten or grade
1, 2 or 3 a course of instruction in foundational literacy skills that
satisfies the requirements set forth in regulations adopted by the
Commission. The requirements for a course of instruction in
foundational literacy must include, without limitation:
(1) Training and instruction in effective methods for
teaching foundational literacy skills aligned with the science of
reading, including, without limitation:
(I) Phonological and phonemic awareness;
(II) Phonics, including, without limitation, decoding
and encoding;
(III) Fluency;
(IV) Vocabulary; and
(V) Comprehension;
(2) Techniques for differentiating literacy instruction, to
meet the needs of pupils with advanced literacy skills, as well as
pupils with reading deficiencies, including, without limitation,
pupils with indicators of dyslexia and pupils with disabilities;
(3) Implementation of effective literacy instruction using
high-quality instructional materials in alignment with current
research on the science of reading;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 146 –
(4) Classroom behavior management, trauma-informed
practices and other developmentally appropriate supports to
ensure a conducive learning environment for literacy instruction;
and
(5) The use of data concerning pupils, including, without
limitation, literacy assessments, to make instructional decisions,
including, without limitation, decisions about improving the
effectiveness of classroom reading instruction and the design of
reading interventions.
(e) Setting forth the qualifications and requirements for
obtaining a license or endorsement to teach American Sign
Language, including, without limitation, being registered with the
Aging and Disability Services Division of the Department of Health
and Human Services pursuant to NRS 656A.100 to engage in the
practice of sign language interpreting in a primary or secondary
educational setting.
(f) Requiring teachers and other educational personnel to be
registered with the Aging and Disability Services Division pursuant
to NRS 656A.100 to engage in the practice of sign language
interpreting in a primary or secondary educational setting if they:
(1) Provide instruction or other educational services; and
(2) Concurrently engage in the practice of sign language
interpreting, as defined in NRS 656A.060.
(g) Prescribing course work on parental involvement and family
engagement. The Commission shall:
(1) Work in cooperation with the Office of Parental
Involvement and Family Engagement created by NRS 385.630 in
developing the regulations required by this paragraph.
(2) Establish standards for professional development training
which may be used to satisfy any course work requirement
prescribed pursuant to this paragraph.
(h) Establishing the requirements for obtaining an endorsement
on the license of a teacher, administrator or other educational
personnel in cultural competency.
(i) Authorizing the Superintendent of Public Instruction to issue
a license by endorsement to an applicant who holds an equivalent
license or authorization issued by a governmental entity in another
country if the Superintendent determines that the qualifications for
the equivalent license or authorization are substantially similar to
those prescribed pursuant to paragraph (a).
(j) Establishing the requirements for obtaining an endorsement
on the license of a teacher, administrator or other educational
personnel in teaching courses relating to financial literacy.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 147 –
(k) Authorizing a person who is employed as a paraprofessional
and enrolled in a program to become a teacher to complete an
accelerated program of student teaching in the same or a
substantially similar area in which the person is employed as a
paraprofessional while remaining employed as a paraprofessional.
(l) Requiring the Department to accept a program of student
teaching or other teaching experience completed in another state or
foreign country by an applicant for a license if the Department
determines that the program or experience substantially fulfills the
standards of a program of student teaching in this State.
(m) Authorizing a person who is employed by a public school to
provide support or other services relating to school psychology, if
the person does not hold a license or endorsement as a school
psychologist but is enrolled in a program that would allow the
person to obtain such a license or endorsement, to complete a
program of internship in school psychology while remaining
employed in such a position.
(n) To carry out the provisions of NRS 391B.010.
(o) Establishing the requirements for a person to obtain a
provisional license with an endorsement as a registered
apprentice, including, without limitation, requiring a person to
complete a teacher preparation program for registered apprentices
that is approved by the State Apprenticeship Council.
2. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.027, the] The
Commission may adopt such other regulations as it deems necessary
for its own government or to carry out its duties.
3. Any regulation which increases the amount of education,
training or experience required for licensing:
(a) Must, in addition to the requirements for publication in
chapter 233B of NRS, be publicized before its adoption in a manner
reasonably calculated to inform those persons affected by the
change.
(b) Must not become effective until at least 1 year after the date
it is adopted by the Commission.
(c) Is not applicable to a license in effect on the date the
regulation becomes effective.
Sec. 40. NRS 391.021 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.021 1. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.027,
the] The Commission shall adopt regulations governing
examinations for the initial licensing of teachers and other
educational personnel. The regulations adopted by the Commission
must ensure that the examinations test the ability of the applicant to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 148 –
teach and the applicant’s knowledge of each specific subject he or
she proposes to teach.
2. When adopting regulations pursuant to subsection 1, the
Commission shall consider including any alternative means of
demonstrating competency for persons with a disability or health-
related need that the Commission determines are necessary and
appropriate.
3. The regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to
subsection 1 must authorize an applicant to be exempt from any
requirement to pass a competency test in basic reading, writing and
mathematics if the applicant submits to the Department evidence
that, after not passing a competency test in basic reading, writing
and mathematics at the level of competence specified by the
Commission, the applicant began and completed, with a grade of B
or better, a course of study approved by the Department in each
subject area of the competency test that the applicant did not pass at
the level of competence specified by the Commission.
4. Teachers and educational personnel from another state who
obtain a reciprocal license pursuant to NRS 391.032 or 391B.010
are not required to take the examinations for the initial licensing of
teachers and other educational personnel described in this section or
any other examination for initial licensing required by the
regulations adopted by the Commission.
Sec. 41. NRS 391.028 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.028 On or before [December] January 31 of each year, the
Commission shall submit a written report to [the State Board and]
the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education. The report
must include, without limitation:
1. A summary of the regulations adopted by the Commission
during the previous year and the status of those regulations;
2. A work plan which designates the proposed activities of the
Commission during the [next] current year; and
3. A description of the progress and status of each regulation
relating to the licensure of educational personnel which the
Commission is required to adopt pursuant to a legislative measure
enacted within the two previous regular sessions of the Legislature
or any special session of the Legislature occurring within that time.
If the Commission has not adopted a required regulation, the
Commission shall include in the report a detailed explanation
describing the reasons each regulation was not adopted.
Sec. 41.5. NRS 391.031 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.031 There are the following kinds of licenses for teachers
and other educational personnel in this State:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 149 –
1. A license to teach pupils in a program of early childhood
education, which authorizes the holder to teach in any program of
early childhood education in the State.
2. [A] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a
license to teach elementary education, which authorizes the holder
to teach in any elementary school in the State. The holder of a
license to teach elementary education must have completed a
course in foundational literacy approved by the Commission
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 of NRS 391.019 to be
eligible to teach pupils in kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or 3 on or
after July 1, 2028.
3. A license to teach middle school or junior high school
education, which authorizes the holder to teach in his or her major
or minor field of preparation or in both fields in any middle school
or junior high school. He or she may teach only in these fields
unless an exception is approved pursuant to regulations adopted by
the Commission.
4. A license to teach secondary education, which authorizes the
holder to teach in his or her major or minor field of preparation or in
both fields in any secondary school. He or she may teach only in
these fields unless an exception is approved pursuant to regulations
adopted by the Commission.
5. A license to teach special education, which authorizes the
holder to teach pupils with disabilities or gifted and talented pupils,
or both.
6. A special license, which authorizes the holder to teach or
perform other educational functions in a school or program as
designated in the license.
Sec. 41.6. NRS 391.0315 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
391.0315 1. A person licensed to teach early childhood
education, elementary education, middle school or junior high
school education or secondary education in this State may apply for
and the Superintendent of Public Instruction may issue to that
person an additional license or endorsement to teach early
childhood education, elementary education, middle school or junior
high school education or secondary education, other than for
teaching pupils with disabilities, which is outside the person’s grade
level of experience if the applicant meets the course work
requirements, competency testing requirements and qualifications
for the license [.] or endorsement.
2. A licensed teacher who applies for an additional license or
endorsement pursuant to this section must not be required to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 150 –
participate in a program of student teaching as a condition for the
issuance of the additional license or endorsement if the applicant
has 3 years of verified teaching experience.
Sec. 42. NRS 391.032 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.032 1. [Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.027,
the] The Commission shall:
(a) Adopt regulations which provide for the issuance of
provisional licenses to teachers and other educational personnel
before completion of all courses of study or other requirements for a
license in this State.
(b) Adopt regulations which provide for the reciprocal licensure
of educational personnel from other states including, without
limitation, for the reciprocal licensure of persons who hold a license
to teach special education. Such regulations must include, without
limitation, provisions:
(1) For the reciprocal licensure of persons who obtained a
license pursuant to an alternative route to licensure which the
Department determines is as rigorous or more rigorous than the
alternative route to licensure prescribed pursuant to subparagraph
(1) of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 391.019.
(2) Which provide for the licensure of persons pursuant to
the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact enacted in NRS 391B.010.
(c) Adopt regulations which provide that, for teachers
employed by a charter school, requirements to teach in a subject
that is not a core subject, as set forth in NRS 389.018, are satisfied
if the teacher holds:
(1) The appropriate endorsement issued by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction; or
(2) An industry-recognized credential or certificate relevant
to the subject that is not a core subject in which he or she provides
instruction.
2. A person who is a member of the Armed Forces of the
United States, a veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States or
the spouse of such a member or veteran of the Armed Forces of the
United States and who has completed the equivalent of an
alternative route to licensure program in another state may obtain a
license as if such person has completed the alternative route to
licensure program of this State.
3. The Commission shall adopt regulations requiring the
Superintendent of Public Instruction to issue a provisional license to
teach if:
(a) The Superintendent determines that the applicant is
otherwise qualified for the license; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 151 –
(b) The applicant:
(1) Graduated with a bachelor’s degree or higher but is
awaiting conferment of the degree; or
(2) Satisfies the requirements for conditional licensure
through an alternative route to licensure.
4. A person who is issued a provisional license must complete
all courses of study and other requirements for a license in this State
which is not provisional within 3 years after the date on which a
provisional license is issued.
Sec. 43. NRS 391.033 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.033 1. All licenses for teachers and other educational
personnel are granted by the Superintendent of Public Instruction
pursuant to regulations adopted by the Commission and as
otherwise provided by law.
2. An application for the issuance of a license must include the
social security number of the applicant.
3. Every applicant for [a license must submit with his or her
application:]
(a) [A] The initial issuance of a license must submit with his or
her application a complete set of his or her fingerprints and written
permission authorizing the Superintendent to forward the
fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History for its initial report on the criminal history of the
applicant [and for reports thereafter upon renewal of the license
pursuant to subsection 8 of NRS 179A.075,] and for submission to
the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report on the criminal
history of the applicant . [; and] Each application for an initial
license must contain a disclosure that the applicant is subject to
the provisions of section 60 of this act, which must be in the form
and manner prescribed by the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History and include, without limitation, a
statement that the applicant is consenting to be enrolled in the
program established by section 60 of this act.
(b) [Written] The initial issuance or renewal of a license must
submit with his or her application written authorization for the
Superintendent to obtain any information concerning the applicant
that may be available from the Statewide Central Registry and any
equivalent registry maintained by a governmental entity in a
jurisdiction in which the applicant has resided within the
immediately preceding 5 years.
4. In conducting an investigation into the background of an
applicant for the issuance or renewal of a license, the
Superintendent may cooperate with any appropriate law
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 152 –
enforcement agency to obtain information relating to the criminal
history of the applicant, including, without limitation, any record of
warrants for the arrest of or applications for protective orders
against the applicant.
5. The Superintendent may issue a provisional license pending
receipt of the reports of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the
Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History if the
Superintendent determines that the applicant is otherwise qualified.
6. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, a license must
be issued to, or renewed for, as applicable, an applicant if:
(a) The Superintendent determines that the applicant is
qualified;
(b) The information obtained by the Superintendent pursuant to
subsections 3 and 4 [:] or pursuant to section 60 of this act:
(1) Does not indicate that the applicant has been convicted of
a felony or any offense involving moral turpitude or indicates that
the applicant has been convicted of a felony or an offense involving
moral turpitude but the Superintendent determines that the
conviction is unrelated to the position within the county school
district or charter school for which the applicant applied or for
which he or she is currently employed, as applicable;
(2) Does not indicate that there has been a substantiated
report of abuse or neglect of a child, as defined in NRS 432B.020,
or a violation of NRS 201.540, 201.553, 201.560, 392.4633 or
394.366 made against the applicant in any state; and
(3) Does not indicate that the applicant has a warrant for his
or her arrest; and
(c) For initial licensure, the applicant submits the statement
required pursuant to NRS 391.034.
7. If, pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b) of
subsection 6, the information indicates that a substantiated report
has been made against the applicant in any state, the Superintendent
shall:
(a) Suspend the application process;
(b) Notify the applicant of the substantiated report; and
(c) Provide the applicant an opportunity to rebut the
substantiated report.
8. The Superintendent may deny an application for the
issuance or renewal of a license pursuant to this section if:
(a) A report on the criminal history of the applicant from the
Federal Bureau of Investigation or the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History , or any notification received
pursuant to section 60 of this act, indicates that the applicant has
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 153 –
been arrested for or charged with a sexual offense involving a minor
or pupil, including, without limitation, any attempt, solicitation or
conspiracy to commit such an offense; and
(b) The Superintendent provides to the applicant:
(1) Written notice of his or her intent to deny the application;
and
(2) An opportunity for the applicant to have a hearing.
9. To request a hearing pursuant to subsection 8, an applicant
must submit a written request to the Superintendent within 15 days
after receipt of the notice by the applicant. Such a hearing must be
conducted in accordance with regulations adopted by the State
Board. If no request for a hearing is filed within that time, the
Superintendent may deny issuance or renewal of the license.
10. If the Superintendent denies an application for the issuance
or renewal of a license pursuant to this section, the Superintendent
must, within 15 days after the date on which the application is
denied, provide notice of the denial to the school district or charter
school that employs the applicant if the applicant is employed by a
school district or charter school. Such a notice must not state the
reasons for denial.
11. The Superintendent may not be held liable for damages
resulting from any action of the Superintendent authorized by
subsection 4.
12. The Superintendent may enter into reciprocal agreements
with appropriate officials of other countries concerning the licensing
of teachers.
13. As used in this section, “sexual offense” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 179D.097.
Sec. 44. NRS 391.039 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.039 1. The [State Board] Department shall, on an annual
basis, evaluate each provider approved by the Commission to offer a
course of study or training designed to qualify a person to be a
teacher or administrator or to perform other educational functions,
including, without limitation, a qualified provider approved by the
Commission pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of NRS 391.019 to offer an alternative route to
licensure. The evaluation must include, without limitation, for each
provider, the number of persons:
(a) Who received a license pursuant to this chapter after
completing the education, course of study or training offered by the
provider; and
(b) Identified in paragraph (a) who are employed by a school
district or a charter school in this State after receiving a license and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 154 –
information relating to the performance evaluations of those persons
conducted by the school district or charter school. The information
relating to the performance evaluations must be reported in an
aggregated format and not reveal the identity of a person.
2. The Department shall post on its Internet website the
evaluation conducted pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 45. NRS 391.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.040 1. The Commission shall fix fees of not less than
$100 for the:
(a) Initial issuance of a license, which must include the fees for
processing the fingerprints of the applicant by the Central
Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History and the Federal
Bureau of Investigation; and
(b) Renewal of a license . [, which must include the fees for
processing the fingerprints of the applicant for renewal by the
Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal History and the
Federal Bureau of Investigation.]
2. The fee for issuing a duplicate license is the same as for
issuing the original.
3. The portion of each fee which represents the amount charged
by the Federal Bureau of Investigation for processing the
fingerprints of the applicant must be deposited with the State
Treasurer for credit to the appropriate account of the Department of
Public Safety. The remaining portion of the money received from
the fees must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the
appropriate account of the Department of Education.
4. The Department of Education may waive any fee for the
initial issuance of a license, the renewal of a license or the issuance
of a duplicate license for an applicant or licensee who is a veteran of
the Armed Forces of the United States, an applicant or licensee who
is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States who is on
active duty or an applicant or licensee who is the spouse of such a
veteran or member of the Armed Forces of the United States.
Sec. 46. NRS 391.104 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.104 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.105
and 391.1055, each applicant for employment pursuant to NRS
391.100 or employee, except a teacher or other person licensed by
the Superintendent of Public Instruction, or volunteer who is likely
to have unsupervised contact with pupils, must, before beginning his
or her employment or service as a volunteer and at least once every
5 years thereafter, submit to the school district:
(a) A full set of the applicant’s, employee’s or volunteer’s
fingerprints and written permission authorizing the school district to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 155 –
forward the fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada
Records of Criminal History for its report on the criminal history of
the applicant, employee or volunteer and for submission to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report on the criminal history
of the applicant, employee or volunteer; and
(b) Written authorization for the board of trustees of the school
district to obtain any information concerning the applicant,
employee or volunteer that may be available from the Statewide
Central Registry and any equivalent registry maintained by a
governmental entity in a jurisdiction in which the applicant,
employee or volunteer has resided within the immediately preceding
5 years.
2. In conducting an investigation into the background of an
applicant, employee or volunteer, a school district may cooperate
with any appropriate law enforcement agency to obtain information
relating to the criminal history of the applicant, employee or
volunteer, including, without limitation, any record of warrants for
the arrest of or applications for protective orders against the
applicant, employee or volunteer.
3. The board of trustees of a school district may use a
substantiated report of the abuse or neglect of a child, as defined in
NRS 392.281, or a violation of NRS 201.540, 201.553, 201.560,
392.4633 or 394.366 obtained from the Statewide Central Registry
or an equivalent registry maintained by a governmental agency in
another jurisdiction:
(a) When making determinations concerning assignments,
requiring retraining, imposing discipline, hiring, accepting a
volunteer or termination; and
(b) In any proceedings to which the report is relevant, including,
without limitation, an action for trespass or a restraining order.
4. [Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the] The
board of trustees of a school district shall not require a licensed
teacher or other person licensed by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction pursuant to NRS 391.033 who has taken a leave of
absence from employment authorized by the school district,
including, without limitation:
(a) Sick leave;
(b) Sabbatical leave;
(c) Personal leave;
(d) Leave for attendance at a regular or special session of the
Legislature of this State if the employee is a member thereof;
(e) Maternity leave; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 156 –
(f) Leave permitted by the Family and Medical Leave Act of
1993, 29 U.S.C. §§ 2601 et seq.,
 to submit a set of his or her fingerprints as a condition of return
to or continued employment with the school district if the employee
is in good standing when the employee began the leave.
5. [A board of trustees of a school district may ask the
Superintendent of Public Instruction to require a person licensed by
the Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to NRS 391.033
who has taken a leave of absence from employment authorized by
the school district to submit a set of his or her fingerprints as a
condition of return to or continued employment with the school
district if the board of trustees has probable cause to believe that the
person has committed a felony or an offense involving moral
turpitude during the period of his or her leave of absence.
6.] The board of trustees of a school district:
(a) May accept any gifts, grants and donations to carry out the
provisions of subsections 1 and 2 and NRS 391.105.
(b) May not be held liable for damages resulting from any action
of the board of trustees authorized by subsection 2 or 3 or
NRS 391.105.
Sec. 47. NRS 391.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.110 1. The board of trustees of a school district [may:]
located in a county whose population is 100,000 or more shall:
(a) Employ any person [the board of trustees determines is
qualified] who meets the requirements of this paragraph to serve
as the superintendent of schools of the school district. [The
Commission may require the superintendent of any school district to
hold a master’s degree.] A person is eligible to serve as the
superintendent of schools of a school district if:
(1) The person:
(I) Holds a graduate degree from a postsecondary
educational institution that is accredited by a regional accrediting
agency recognized by the United States Department of Education
or approved by the Department for the purposes of this paragraph;
and
(II) Has at least 6 years of experience teaching, of
which at least 3 years must have been spent in a supervisory or
administrative capacity; or
(2) The person served as the financial administrator or
chief executive officer of a private or public entity with a budget of
at least $275,000,000; or
(3) The person holds a graduate degree from a
postsecondary educational institution that is accredited by a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 157 –
regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States
Department of Education in business, finance or management and
has at least 4 years of relevant experience in any of those fields.
(b) Employ a person who meets the qualifications of this
paragraph to serve as chief financial officer of schools of the
school district. A person is eligible to serve as chief financial
officer of schools of a school district if the person:
(1) Holds:
(I) A graduate degree from a postsecondary educational
institution that is accredited by a regional accrediting agency
recognized by the United States Department of Education or
approved by the Department for the purposes of this paragraph;
and
(II) A professional license as a certified public
accountant, certified management accountant or certified
financial analyst and has experience with fiscal analysis,
processes, problems and opportunities and developing fiscal
policies, audit procedures and systems of public and fund
accounting; or
(2) Served as the financial administrator of a private or
public entity with a budget similar in size to the budget of the
school district in which he or she seeks employment; or
(3) Has received status as a credentialed manager from the
International City/County Management Association, or its
successor organization.
(c) Define the powers and fix the duties of the superintendent of
schools [.
(c)] and the chief financial officer of schools, if applicable.
(d) Fix the salary of the superintendent of schools [.] and the
chief financial officer of schools, if applicable.
2. The board of trustees of a school district located in a
county whose population is 100,000 or more that selects a
candidate to serve as superintendent of schools of the school
district or chief financial officer of schools of the school district
shall, before hiring the candidate, submit the name and
application of the candidate to the Department for review. The
Department shall review the qualifications of the candidate
selected by the board of trustees to ensure that the candidate meets
the requirements set forth in subsection 1. Not more than 10 days
after completing the review, the Department shall:
(a) If the Department determines that the candidate meets the
requirements set forth in subsection 1, issue a letter to the board of
trustees of the school district affirming that the candidate is
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 158 –
eligible to serve as superintendent of schools of the school district
or chief financial officer of schools of the school district, as
applicable; or
(b) If the Department determines that the candidate does not
meet the requirements set forth in subsection 1, issue a letter to the
board of trustees of the school district affirming that the candidate
is ineligible to serve as superintendent of schools of the school
district or chief financial officer of schools of the school district,
as applicable.
3. The board of trustees of a school district that receives a
letter affirming that a candidate is ineligible to be hired pursuant
to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 shall not hire the candidate for
the position for which he or she applied.
4. The Department may revoke a letter issued pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 if the Department determines that a
candidate for superintendent of schools or chief financial officer
of schools no longer meets the requirements for eligibility set forth
in subsection 1.
5. The board of trustees of a school district that is located in a
county whose population is less than 100,000 may:
(a) Employ any person the board of trustees of the school
district determines is qualified to serve as superintendent of
schools of the school district. The Commission may require the
superintendent of any such school district to hold a master’s
degree.
(b) Define the powers and fix the duties of the superintendent
of schools.
(c) Fix the salary of the superintendent of schools.
6. If the board of trustees of a school district employs a person
who is not licensed as an administrator to serve as the
superintendent of schools, the board of trustees shall employ a
person who is licensed as an administrator to oversee the academic
programs of the public schools within the school district.
[3.] 7. A superintendent of schools may be employed for an
initial term not to exceed 4 years. The term of any subsequent
employment may be of any duration.
[4.] 8. A superintendent of schools [may] shall be dismissed at
any time for cause [.
5.] , including, without limitation, if:
(a) The superintendent of schools does not meet any of the
professional or other standards identified in an annual evaluation
conducted by the board of trustees of the school district.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 159 –
(b) The superintendent of schools refuses or fails to comply
with and carry out the requirements of this title. The board of
trustees of a school district may, at any time, request a
determination from the Department that the superintendent of
schools of the school district has refused or failed to comply with
and carry out the requirements of this title. If the board of trustees
of a school district requests such a determination, the Department
must promptly conduct an investigation and determine whether
the superintendent of schools has refused or failed to observe and
carry out the requirements of this title.
(c) The Department revokes a letter pursuant to subsection 4.
9. Each employment contract entered into between the board
of trustees of a school district and the superintendent of schools of
the school district must include, without limitation:
(a) The provisions set forth in subsection 8 and any additional
reasons why the superintendent of schools would be required to be
dismissed for cause by the board of trustees of the school district
that the board of trustees deems appropriate.
(b) A description of the process for annually evaluating the
superintendent of schools that includes, without limitation:
(1) Measures of learning and behavior outcomes of pupils;
and
(2) Professional standards that are nationally recognized.
10. A superintendent of schools may administer oaths or
affirmations relating to public schools.
Sec. 48. NRS 391.125 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.125 1. If the board of trustees of a school district
determines that a shortage of teachers exists within the school
district in a particular subject area, the board of trustees may, on or
before September 1 of the school year in which such a determination
is made, submit a written request to the Superintendent of Public
Instruction to employ persons who are licensed teachers but who do
not hold an endorsement to teach in the subject area for which there
is a shortage of teachers at a public school within the school district.
The Superintendent of Public Instruction may grant such a request if
the Superintendent determines that a shortage of teachers exists in
the subject area. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction grants a
request pursuant to this subsection, a person who holds a license to
teach but not an endorsement in the subject area for which the
request was granted may be employed by the school district for not
more than 3 school years to teach in that subject area at a public
school within the school district.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 160 –
2. If the Superintendent of Public Instruction grants a request
pursuant to subsection 1, the Superintendent shall submit a written
report to the Commission [and the State Board] that includes the
name of the school district for which the request was granted and
the subject area for which the request was granted. Upon receipt of
such a report, the Commission [and the State Board] shall consider
whether to adopt revisions to the requirements for an endorsement
in that subject area to address the shortage of teachers.
Sec. 49. NRS 391.465 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.465 1. The State Board shall, based upon the
recommendations of the Teachers and Leaders Council of Nevada
submitted pursuant to NRS 391.460, adopt regulations establishing a
statewide performance evaluation system which incorporates
multiple measures of an employee’s performance. Except as
otherwise provided in subsection 3, the State Board shall prescribe
the tools to be used by a school district for obtaining such measures.
2. The statewide performance evaluation system must:
(a) Require that an employee’s overall performance is
determined to be:
(1) Highly effective;
(2) Effective;
(3) Developing; or
(4) Ineffective.
(b) Include the criteria for making each designation identified in
paragraph (a), which must include, without limitation, consideration
of whether the classes for which the employee is responsible exceed
the applicable recommended ratios of pupils per licensed teacher
prescribed by the State Board pursuant to NRS 388.890 and, if so,
the degree to which the ratios affect:
(1) The ability of the employee to carry out his or her
professional responsibilities; and
(2) The instructional practices of the employee.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3 of NRS
391.695 and subsections 2 and 3 of NRS 391.715, require that pupil
growth, as determined pursuant to NRS 391.480 [, account] :
(1) Account for 15 percent of the evaluation of a teacher or
administrator who provides direct instructional services to pupils at
a school in a school district [.] ; and
(2) For the purposes of calculating the rating used to
evaluate a teacher or administrator pursuant to subparagraph (1),
be used to evaluate a teacher or administrator using a points
system in which the teacher or administrator who provides direct
instructional services to pupils at a school in a school district:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 161 –
(I) Receives one point if not more than 20 percent of
pupils to which he or she provides direct instructional services
achieve satisfactory goals for educational growth established
pursuant to NRS 391.480.
(II) Receives two points if more than 20 percent but not
more than 40 percent of pupils to which he or she provides direct
instructional services achieve satisfactory goals for educational
growth pursuant to NRS 391.480.
(III) Receives three points if more than 40 percent but
not more than 60 percent of pupils to which he or she provides
direct instructional services achieve satisfactory goals for
educational growth pursuant to NRS 391.480.
(IV) Receives four points if more than 60 percent but
not more than 80 percent of pupils to which he or she provides
direct instructional services achieve satisfactory goals for
educational growth pursuant to NRS 391.480.
(V) Receives five points if more than 80 percent of
pupils to which he or she provides direct instructional services
achieve satisfactory goals for educational growth pursuant to
NRS 391.480.
(d) Include an evaluation of whether the teacher, or
administrator who provides primarily administrative services at the
school level or administrator at the district level who provides direct
supervision of the principal of a school, and who does not provide
primarily direct instructional services to pupils, regardless of
whether the probationary administrator is licensed as a teacher or
administrator, including, without limitation, a principal and vice
principal or licensed educational employee, other than a teacher or
administrator, employs practices and strategies to involve and
engage the parents and families of pupils.
(e) Include a process for peer observations of teachers by
qualified educational personnel which is designed to provide
assistance to teachers in meeting the standards of effective teaching,
and includes, without limitation, conducting observations,
participating in conferences before and after observations of the
teacher and providing information and resources to the teacher about
strategies for effective teaching. The regulations must include the
criteria for school districts to determine which educational personnel
are qualified to conduct peer observations pursuant to the process.
(f) Require a person who evaluates a teacher who is responsible
for a number of pupils that exceeds the applicable recommended
ratio of pupils per licensed teacher prescribed by the State Board
pursuant to NRS 388.890, who is a postprobationary employee as
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 162 –
defined in NRS 391.650 and whose performance on that evaluation
is designated as effective or highly effective to, under the statewide
performance evaluation system, award the teacher an additional
weight for criteria relating to:
(1) The manner in which the teacher structures a classroom
environment;
(2) The manner in which the teacher provides an opportunity
for extended discourse;
(3) The manner in which the teacher employs the cognitive
abilities and skills of all pupils;
(4) The manner in which the teacher engages with the
families of pupils; and
(5) The perception of pupils of the performance of the
teacher,
 that is equivalent to the percentage by which the ratio of pupils
for which the teacher is responsible exceeds the recommended ratio
of pupils per licensed teacher. Any additional weight awarded to a
teacher pursuant to this paragraph must not cause the score on a
criterion to exceed the maximum score that would otherwise be
possible on the criterion for a teacher rated as highly effective.
(g) If an employee knowingly and willfully failed to comply
with the provisions of NRS 388.1351, indicate any disciplinary
actions taken against the employee pursuant to NRS 388.1354.
3. A school district may apply to the State Board to use a
performance evaluation system and tools that are different than the
evaluation system and tools prescribed pursuant to subsection 1. The
application must be in the form prescribed by the State Board and
must include, without limitation, a description of the evaluation
system and tools proposed to be used by the school district. The
State Board may approve the use of the proposed evaluation system
and tools if it determines that the proposed evaluation system and
tools apply standards and indicators that are equivalent to those
prescribed by the State Board.
4. An administrator at the district level who provides direct
supervision of the principal of a school and who also serves as the
superintendent of schools of a school district must not be evaluated
using the statewide performance evaluation system.
5. A school associate superintendent or administrator who
supervises schools within a school district shall, not later than the
last day of each school year, conduct a review of at least 3 percent
of all evaluations of licensed educational personnel conducted
pursuant to this chapter for the local school precincts overseen by
the school associate superintendent or the schools within a school
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 163 –
district overseen by the administrator who supervises such schools.
The review must be conducted using procedures and guidance
developed by the Department, in consultation the Teachers and
Leaders Council of Nevada created by NRS 391.455 and include,
without limitation, for each evaluation selected:
(a) A review of documents for the development of plans,
observations, conferences, evidence and a summary of the
evaluation; and
(b) An interview with the administrator and person who was
evaluated;
6. If the school associate superintendent or administrator
who supervises schools determines that an evaluation that was
reviewed pursuant to subsection 5 was not conducted properly, the
administrator who conducted the evaluation must conduct a
review of all evaluations conducted for licensed educational
personnel assigned to the relevant local school precinct or school
during the previous school year.
7. A school associate superintendent or administrator who
supervises schools who conducts a review pursuant to subsection 5
shall, on or before May 15 of each year, submit to the
Superintendent of Public Instruction a report that:
(a) Verifies that a review was conducted pursuant to
subsection 5;
(b) Describes the local school precincts or schools in which:
(1) Evaluations were properly conducted; and
(2) Evaluations were not properly conducted; and
(c) A plan of action for each administrator who did not
properly conduct an evaluation.
8. As used in this section, “school associate superintendent”
has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 388G.550.
Sec. 50. NRS 391.480 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.480 1. Each teacher at a school in a school district shall,
in consultation with the principal of the school at which the teacher
is employed or other administrator who is assigned by the principal,
develop [learning] goals for educational growth for the pupils of
the teacher for a specified period.
2. Each principal, vice principal and other administrator who
provides direct instructional services to pupils at a school in a school
district shall, in consultation with his or her direct supervisor,
develop [learning] goals for educational growth for the pupils at the
school where the principal, vice principal or other administrator, as
applicable, is employed for a specified period.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 164 –
3. The [Department shall establish a list of assessments that
may] examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 must
be used by a school or school district to measure the achievement of
[learning] goals for educational growth established pursuant to this
section [.] for each teacher who provides instruction in English
language arts, science or mathematics. If a teacher does not
provide instruction in such subjects, a school or school district
may use, without limitation, assessments that:
(a) Are course-embedded;
(b) Are teacher-developed; or
(c) Align with the standards identified as the area of highest
pupil need within an individual classroom.
4. The board of trustees of each school district shall ensure that
the [learning] goals for educational growth for pupils established
pursuant to this section measure pupil growth in accordance with the
criteria established by regulation of the State Board.
5. Each teacher and administrator who establishes [learning]
goals for educational growth for pupils pursuant to this section
must be evaluated at the end of the specified period to determine the
extent to which the [learning] goals for educational growth of the
pupils were achieved. Such an evaluation must be conducted in
accordance with the criteria established by regulation of the State
Board for determining the level of pupil growth for the purposes of
the statewide performance evaluation system. The State Board may
establish by regulation the manner in which to include certain
categories of pupils in the evaluation conducted pursuant to this
subsection.
Sec. 51. NRS 391.485 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.485 1. The State Board shall annually review the
statewide performance evaluation system to ensure accuracy and
reliability. Such a review must include, without limitation, an
analysis of the:
(a) Number and percentage of teachers, administrators and other
licensed educational personnel who receive each designation
identified in paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 391.465 in each
school, school district, and the State as a whole;
(b) Data used to evaluate pupil growth in each school, school
district and the State as a whole, including, without limitation, any
observations; and
(c) Effect of the evaluations conducted pursuant to the statewide
system of accountability for public schools on the academic
performance of pupils enrolled in the school district in each school
and school district, and the State as a whole.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 165 –
2. The board of trustees of each school district shall annually
review the manner in which schools in the school district carry out
the evaluation of teachers, administrators and other licensed
educational personnel pursuant to the statewide performance
evaluation system.
3. The Department may review the manner in which the
statewide performance evaluation system is carried out by each
school district, including, without limitation, the manner in which
the [learning] goals for educational growth for pupils are
established and evaluated pursuant to NRS 391.480.
4. The Department shall:
(a) Ensure that the manner in which the statewide
performance evaluation system is carried out by each school
district:
(1) Ensures distinct skills associated with high-quality
teaching are evaluated; and
(2) Requires data for each teacher to be reported to the
Department each year;
(b) In consultation with the Teachers and Leaders Council of
Nevada created by NRS 391.455, adopt regulations establishing a
framework for a certification program to rate administrators based
on the ability of an administrator to properly conduct an
evaluation; and
(c) Ensure that only certified administrators conduct
evaluations pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 52. NRS 391.685 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.685 1. A probationary teacher must receive one
evaluation during each school year of his or her probationary
employment. The evaluation must be based in part upon at least
three scheduled observation cycles of the teacher during the first
school year of his or her probationary period as follows:
(a) The first scheduled observation cycle must occur within [40]
30 days after the first day of instruction of the school year;
(b) The second scheduled observation cycle must occur after
[40] 75 days but within [80] 105 days after the first day of
instruction of the school year; and
(c) The third scheduled observation cycle must occur [after 80
days but within 120] during the final 40 days [after the first day] of
instruction [of] in the school year.
2. If a probationary teacher receives an evaluation designating
his or her overall performance as effective or highly effective:
(a) During the first school year of his or her probationary period,
the evaluation during the second school year of the probationary
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 166 –
period must be based in part upon at least two scheduled observation
cycles of the teacher which must occur within the times specified in
paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 1.
(b) During the first and second school years of his or her
probationary period, the evaluation during the third school year of
the probationary period must be based in part upon at least one
scheduled observation cycle of the teacher which must occur within
120 days after the first day of instruction of the school year.
3. If a probationary teacher receives an evaluation designating
his or her overall performance as developing or ineffective during
the first or second school year of the probationary period, the
probationary teacher must receive one evaluation during the
immediately succeeding school year which is based in part upon
three observation cycles which must occur in accordance with the
observation schedule set forth in subsection 1.
Sec. 52.5. NRS 391.730 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.730 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 391.717, a
postprobationary employee who receives an evaluation designating
his or her overall performance as:
[1.] (a) Ineffective; or
[2.] (b) Developing during 1 year of the 2-year consecutive
period and ineffective during the other year of the period,
 for 2 consecutive school years shall be deemed to be a
probationary employee for the purposes of NRS 391.650 to 391.826,
inclusive, and must serve an additional probationary period in
accordance with the provisions of NRS 391.820.
2. If a postprobationary employee who is deemed to be a
probationary employee pursuant to this section receives an
evaluation designating his or her overall performance as
ineffective for 2 consecutive school years during the additional
probationary period required by this section:
(a) The board of trustees of the school district or the governing
body of the charter school may notify the employee in writing
during the second or third school year of the employee’s
probationary period, in accordance with NRS 391.820, that the
employee may not be reemployed for the third year of the
probationary period or for the fourth school year as a
postprobationary employee; or
(b) The superintendent of the school district or executive
director of the charter school may recommend the dismissal of the
probationary employee to the board of trustees of the school
district or the governing body of the charter school before the end
of a contract year pursuant to NRS 391.822. If the superintendent
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 167 –
or executive director makes such a recommendation, the
postprobationary employee who is deemed to be a probationary
employee pursuant to this section is entitled to notice and a
hearing pursuant to NRS 391.824 and 391.826.
3. The Department shall provide support to a school district
or charter school that, pursuant to subsection 2, does not reemploy
or dismisses a postprobationary employee who is deemed to be a
probationary employee pursuant to subsection 1. Such support
may include, without limitation:
(a) Assistance in recruiting and hiring highly-qualified
administrators to fill any resulting vacancies; and
(b) Access to leadership and instructional coaches to support
school leadership in managing transitions and improving teaching
practices.
Sec. 53. Chapter 391A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 54 to 56.5, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 54. As used in this section and sections 55 and 56 of this
act, “large school district” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 388G.530.
Sec. 55. 1. A large school district shall, through
negotiations with an employee organization conducted pursuant to
NRS 288.150, establish a differential pay scale for all licensed
educational personnel employed at a Title I school which has had
a vacancy rate of at least 7 percent for at least 2 consecutive
school years.
2. As used in this section, “Title I school” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 385A.040.
Sec. 56. To the extent that money is available, the board of
trustees of each large school district shall reserve for each fiscal
year an amount of money sufficient to carry out any increase in
the salary of a licensed teacher, administrator, as defined in
NRS 388.1215, or principal set forth by a differential pay scale
established pursuant to section 55 of this act.
Sec. 56.2. 1. A school district and the governing body of a
charter school shall ensure that a course of professional
development training in the science of reading that is approved by
the Department is successfully completed by:
(a) Teachers who teach pupils in kindergarten or grade 1, 2
or 3;
(b) Administrators of schools in which pupils in kindergarten
or grade 1, 2 or 3 are enrolled and other administrators who
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 168 –
supervise such administrators or are responsible for shaping
educational systems that impact pupil achievement in reading; and
(c) Paraprofessionals who directly serve pupils in kindergarten
or grade 1, 2 or 3.
2. Any course of professional development training required
to be completed by an employee pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) May be provided by the school district or governing body or
through an agreement with an institution of higher education or a
regional training program for the professional development of
teachers and administrators.
(b) Must be provided at no cost to the employee.
3. Each teacher who teaches pupils in kindergarten or grade
1, 2 or 3, and each paraprofessional who directly serves pupils in
kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or 3, and who was employed to teach or
serve such pupils before August 1, 2025, must successfully
complete the course of professional development training required
by this section not later than the end of the 2027-2028 school year.
Each teacher who teaches pupils in kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or
3, and each paraprofessional who directly serves pupils in
kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or 3, and who is employed to teach or
serve such pupils on or after August 1, 2025, must successfully
complete the course of professional development training required
by this section not later than 3 years after the employment start
date for the teacher or paraprofessional.
4. Each administrator of a school in which pupils in
kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or 3 are enrolled, and any other
administrator who supervises such administrators or is responsible
for shaping educational systems that impact pupil achievement in
reading, and who is employed in such a position before August 1,
2025, must complete the course of professional development
training required by this section not later than the end of the 2027-
2028 school year. Each administrator of a school in which pupils
in kindergarten or grade 1, 2 or 3 are enrolled, and any other
administrator who supervises such administrators or is responsible
for shaping educational systems that impact pupil achievement in
reading, and who is employed in such a position on or after
August 1, 2025, must complete the course of professional
development training required by this section not later than 3
years after the employment start date of the administrator for that
position.
5. The Department shall develop and post on the Internet
website maintained by the Department a list of courses of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 169 –
professional development training in the science of reading that
have been approved by the Department.
6. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall:
(a) Maintain such records of the successful completion of
courses of professional development training required by
subsection 1 as necessary to ensure compliance with the
requirements of this section; and
(b) Provide such records to the Department upon request.
7. On or before November 1 of each year, the Department
shall prepare, and post on the Internet website maintained by the
Department, a report on the compliance of each board of trustees
of a school district and governing body of a charter school with
the requirements of this section. The report must contain:
(a) The number of persons who are required to complete the
course of professional development training and the percentage of
such persons who have completed the course of professional
development training, disaggregated by district;
(b) A list of the approved providers of courses of professional
development training and the standards applied by the Department
to approve such a course; and
(c) An analysis of trends, challenges and recommendations for
improving compliance and training outcomes.
8. On or before November 1 of each year, the Department
shall submit the report prepared pursuant to subsection 7 to:
(a) The Governor;
(b) The State Board;
(c) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
(1) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, if
the report is submitted in an odd-numbered year; or
(2) The Senate and Assembly Standing Committees on
Education, if the report is submitted in an even-numbered year;
and
(d) The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school.
9. The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of this section, including, without limitation,
regulations to establish standards for the approval of courses of
professional development in the science of reading and the
approval of providers of such courses.
Sec. 56.5. 1. The Education Service Center is hereby
created as an educational service agency for the purpose of acting
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 170 –
as an educational service agency under 34 C.F.R. § 300.12 to
develop, manage and provide services and programs to local
educational agencies and, as necessary, to other local
governments.
2. The governing body of the Education Service Center is the
Board of the Education Service Center, which must consist of the
following members:
(a) Two members appointed by the Governor;
(b) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Majority Leader of the Senate;
(c) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Minority Leader of the Senate;
(d) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Speaker of the Assembly;
(e) One member, who must not be a Legislator, appointed by
the Minority Leader of the Assembly; and
(f) One member appointed by the State Board.
3. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall call the
first meeting of the Board of the Education Service Center. At its
first meeting and annually thereafter, the members of the Board
shall elect a Chair and Vice Chair from among the members of the
Board. After its first meeting, the Board shall meet as needed at
the call of the Chair.
4. Each member of the Board of the Education Service
Center:
(a) Serves without compensation; and
(b) While engaged in the business of the Education Service
Center, is entitled to receive the travel expenses provided for state
officers and employees generally.
5. Each member of the Board of the Education Service
Center serves a term of 2 years and may be reappointed for
additional terms of 2 years in the same manner as the original
appointment. Any vacancy occurring in the membership of the
Board must be filled in the same manner as the original
appointment not later than 30 days after the vacancy occurs.
6. Within the limits of available money:
(a) The Board of the Education Service Center may appoint an
Executive Director. The Executive Director shall not pursue any
other business or occupation or hold any other office of profit
without the approval of the Board.
(b) The Executive Director may employ such staff as is
necessary to the performance of the functions of the Education
Service Center.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 171 –
 The Executive Director and any staff of the Education Service
Center are eligible to participate in the Public Employees’ Benefits
Program and the Public Employees’ Retirement System.
7. The Education Service Center:
(a) May not impose or levy any tax or borrow money or incur
indebtedness.
(b) May apply for any available grants and accept any
available gifts, grants, appropriations or donations, and use any
such gifts, grants, appropriations or donations to carry out its
purposes.
(c) May enter into agreements with any agency or political
subdivision of this State, including, without limitation, counties,
cities and school districts, for the purpose of carrying out the
purposes set forth in this section.
8. The Education Service Center:
(a) May carry out activities set forth in this title, on behalf of
the Department, and provide services to local educational agencies
throughout this State, including, without limitation, services that
require specialized personnel.
(b) Shall provide support for the initiatives and efforts of this
State to improve the performance of schools and school districts in
this State, including, without limitation, evidence-based and
research-based support for the improvement of schools and school
districts identified for rigorous interventions pursuant to the
provisions of sections 14.25 to 14.6, inclusive, of this act.
(c) Shall implement or support the implementation of state or
federally funded initiatives assigned to the Education Service
Center by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.
(d) Shall avoid duplication of programs and services to ensure
a streamlined and efficient delivery of educational services.
9. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may adopt
regulations to prescribe operational aspects of the Education
Service Center, including, without limitation, accountability,
finance and budgeting, qualifications for the Board and
employees of the Education Service Center and procedures for
contracting.
10. The Education Service Center is hereby deemed a local
educational agency, as defined in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(30)(A), for all
purposes.
Sec. 57. NRS 391A.125 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.125 1. Based upon the assessment of needs for training
within the region and priorities of training adopted by the governing
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 172 –
body pursuant to NRS 391A.175, each regional training program
shall provide:
(a) Training for teachers and other licensed educational
personnel in the:
(1) Standards established by the Council to Establish
Academic Standards for Public Schools pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(2) Curriculum and instruction required for the standards
adopted by the State Board;
(3) Curriculum and instruction recommended by the
Teachers and Leaders Council of Nevada; [and]
(4) Culturally relevant pedagogy, taking into account cultural
diversity and demographic differences throughout this State [.] ; and
(5) Whole school improvement and turnaround options
described in sections 14.25 to 14.6, inclusive, of this act.
(b) Through the Nevada Early Literacy Intervention Program
established for the regional training program, training for teachers
who teach kindergarten and grades 1, 2 or 3 , literacy coaches,
reading specialists, reading interventionists and teachers who
teach English as a second language on methods to teach
fundamental reading skills, including, without limitation:
(1) [Phonemic] Phonological and phonemic awareness;
(2) Phonics [;] , including, without limitation, decoding and
encoding;
(3) Vocabulary;
(4) Fluency; and
(5) Comprehension . [; and
(6) Motivation.]
(c) Training for administrators who conduct the evaluations
required pursuant to NRS 391.685, 391.690, 391.705 and 391.710
relating to the manner in which such evaluations are conducted.
Such training must be developed in consultation with the Teachers
and Leaders Council of Nevada created by NRS 391.455.
(d) Training for teachers, administrators and other licensed
educational personnel relating to correcting deficiencies and
addressing recommendations for improvement in performance that
are identified in the evaluations conducted pursuant to NRS
391.685, 391.690, 391.705 or 391.710.
(e) Training for teachers on methods to teach computer literacy
or computer science to pupils.
(f) At least one of the following types of training:
(1) Training for teachers and school administrators in the
assessment and measurement of pupil achievement and the effective
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 173 –
methods to analyze the test results and scores of pupils to improve
the achievement and proficiency of pupils.
(2) Training for teachers in specific content areas to enable
the teachers to provide a higher level of instruction in their
respective fields of teaching. Such training must include instruction
in effective methods to teach in a content area provided by teachers
who are considered masters in that content area.
(3) In addition to the training provided pursuant to paragraph
(b), training for teachers in the methods to teach basic skills to
pupils, such as providing instruction in reading with the use of
phonics and providing instruction in basic skills of mathematics
computation.
(g) In accordance with the program established by the Statewide
Council pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 391A.135
training for:
(1) Teachers on how to engage parents and families,
including, without limitation, disengaged families, in the education
of their children and to build the capacity of parents and families to
support the learning and academic achievement of their children.
(2) Training for teachers and paraprofessionals on working
with parent liaisons in public schools to carry out strategies and
practices for effective parental involvement and family engagement.
(h) Training and continuing professional development for
teachers who receive an endorsement to teach courses relating to
financial literacy pursuant to NRS 391.019 and 396.5198.
2. The training required pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Include the activities set forth in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(42), as
deemed appropriate by the governing body for the type of training
offered.
(b) Include appropriate procedures to ensure follow-up training
for teachers and administrators who have received training through
the program.
(c) Incorporate training that addresses the educational needs of:
(1) Pupils with disabilities who participate in programs of
special education; and
(2) Pupils who are English learners.
(d) Include instructional practices and strategies that are
evidence-based and tailored to improve the achievement and
proficiency of pupils in the core academic subjects, as set forth in
NRS 389.018.
3. The governing body of each regional training program shall
prepare and maintain a list that identifies programs for the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 174 –
professional development of teachers and administrators that
successfully incorporate:
(a) The standards of content and performance established by the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools
pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(b) Fundamental reading skills; and
(c) Other training listed in subsection 1.
 The governing body shall provide a copy of the list on an annual
basis to school districts for dissemination to teachers and
administrators.
4. A regional training program may include model classrooms
that demonstrate the use of educational technology for teaching and
learning.
5. A regional training program may contract with the board of
trustees of a school district that is served by the regional training
program as set forth in NRS 391A.120 to provide professional
development to the teachers and administrators employed by the
school district that is in addition to the training required by this
section. Any training provided pursuant to this subsection must
include the activities set forth in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(42), as deemed
appropriate by the governing body for the type of training offered.
6. To the extent money is available from legislative
appropriation or otherwise, a regional training program may provide
training to paraprofessionals.
7. To the extent that money is available, the Department shall
administer the training required pursuant to paragraph (h) of
subsection 1.
8. As used in this section, “paraprofessional” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 391.008.
Sec. 58. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 58.5. NRS 391A.175 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
391A.175 1. The governing body of each regional training
program shall:
(a) [Adopt] In collaboration with the Department, adopt a
training model, taking into consideration other model programs,
including, without limitation, the program used by the Geographic
Alliance in Nevada.
(b) Assess the training needs of teachers and administrators who
are employed by the school districts within the primary jurisdiction
of the regional training program and adopt priorities of training for
the program based upon the assessment of needs. The board of
trustees of each such school district may submit recommendations to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 175 –
the appropriate governing body for the types of training that should
be offered by the regional training program.
(c) In making the assessment required by paragraph (b) and as
deemed necessary by the governing body, review the plans to
improve the achievement of pupils prepared pursuant to NRS
385A.650 for individual schools within the primary jurisdiction of
the regional training program.
(d) Prepare a 5-year plan for the regional training program for
review by the Statewide Council, which includes, without
limitation:
(1) An assessment of the training needs of teachers and
administrators who are employed by the school districts within the
primary jurisdiction of the regional training program; and
(2) Specific details of the training that will be offered by the
regional training program for the first 2 years covered by the plan
including, without limitation, the biennial budget of the regional
training program for those 2 years.
 The governing body shall incorporate into the 5-year plan any
revisions recommended by the Statewide Council.
(e) Review the 5-year plan on an annual basis and make
revisions to the plan as are necessary to serve the training needs of
teachers and administrators employed by the school districts within
the primary jurisdiction of the regional training program.
(f) Ensure that the staff of the regional training program
assists in developing and providing training in whole school
improvement efforts throughout this State.
2. The Department, the Nevada System of Higher Education
and the board of trustees of a school district may request the
governing body of the regional training program that serves the
school district to provide training, participate in a program or
otherwise perform a service that is in addition to the duties of the
regional training program that are set forth in the plan adopted
pursuant to this section or otherwise required by statute. An entity
may not represent that a regional training program will perform
certain duties or otherwise obligate the regional training program as
part of an application by that entity for a grant unless the entity has
first obtained the written confirmation of the governing body of the
regional training program to perform those duties or obligations.
The governing body of a regional training program may, but is not
required to, grant a request pursuant to this subsection.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 176 –
Sec. 58.7. Chapter 394 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A school employee is immune from both criminal and civil
liability for actions taken in good faith to intervene in physical
altercations, fights or other incidents that pose an imminent risk to
the safety of pupils, other school employees and persons in
proximity to the altercation, fight or incident, provided that:
(a) The school employee is acting within the course and scope
of his or her employment and within the course and scope of his
or her role in maintaining order, discipline or the safety of pupils;
(b) The actions of the school employee are consistent with
federal, state and local laws and the policies of the school district
employing the school employee or the school at which the school
employee is employed relating to the maintenance of safety and
discipline; and
(c) Any harm caused by the intervention was not the result of:
(1) Willful or intentional misconduct;
(2) Gross negligence;
(3) Reckless misconduct; or
(4) A conscious, flagrant indifference to the rights or safety
of the person harmed.
2. If any school employee intervenes in a fight or altercation
involving a pupil, the school employee shall report the incident to
school administration as soon as practicable and in accordance
with the policies and protocols established by the school employing
the school employee.
3. Each school shall maintain a record of reports received
pursuant to subsection 2 and use these records only to assess the
need for additional training, support or policy adjustments to
improve school safety practices.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Intervene” or “intervention” means taking any physical
or verbal action to prevent, separate or otherwise manage pupils in
a manner designed to avoid imminent harm to pupils, school
employees or others in proximity to the area where such actions
are taken.
(b) “School employee” means a licensed or unlicensed person
who is employed by a private school.
Sec. 59. Chapter 396 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 59.3 and 59.5 of this act.
Sec. 59.3. The Board of Regents shall, in consultation with
the Department, develop a method for sharing with the
Department the unique number for student identification issued by
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 177 –
the System to an applicant for a license to teach issued pursuant to
chapter 391 of NRS who received a baccalaureate degree or
master’s degree from an institution within the System. The method
must be developed using the best practices for identifying the
number of graduates of institutions within the System who become
licensed teachers in this State.
Sec. 59.5. The Board of Regents may require each institution
within the System that offers a program of study to satisfy the
educational requirements for a license to teach elementary school
to collaborate with the Department and the Commission on
Professional Standards in Education to develop within the
program of study a course of instruction in foundational literacy
skills that satisfies the requirements adopted pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 of NRS 391.019 to qualify to teach
kindergarten and grades 1, 2 and 3.
Sec. 60. Chapter 179A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Department of Education, may, at no cost to the
Department of Education, participate in the Rap Back Program
administered in this State by the Central Repository. The Central
Repository may retain fingerprints and submit fingerprints to the
Federal Bureau of Investigation for the purpose of enabling the
Department of Education to receive ongoing status notifications of
any criminal history of a person who is licensed by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to NRS 391.033 if
the subscription to the service is active. For the purposes of the
Rap Back Program, the Department of Education is hereby
deemed to be an authorized entity that engages in the licensing of
educational personnel pursuant to NRS 391.033.
2. Any fingerprints forwarded to the Central Repository for
the purpose of licensure pursuant to NRS 391.033 must be
retained in the state and federal Next Generation Identification
Systems for the purpose of participating in the Rap Back Program
and being searched by future submissions to the state and federal
Next Generation Identification Systems, including, without
limitation, latent fingerprint searches.
3. The Central Repository shall establish a means of
collecting, using, safeguarding, handling, retaining, storing,
disseminating and destroying any records of criminal history in
accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 179A
of NRS and the Security Policy and the Administrative Policies of
the Nevada Criminal Justice Information System adopted as
regulations by the Central Repository.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 178 –
4. The Department of Education shall:
(a) Before retaining the fingerprints of a person in the state
and federal Next Generation Identification Systems for the
purpose of participating in the Rap Back Program, obtain the
consent of the person to retain the fingerprints and release
information concerning his or her criminal history to the
Department of Education.
(b) Notify the Central Repository, in a form and manner
prescribed by the Central Repository, when a person licensed
pursuant to NRS 391.033 is no longer licensed pursuant to that
section. Upon receiving such notice, the Central Repository shall:
(1) Destroy any printed and electronic fingerprint cards
and facsimiles of fingerprints that the Central Repository has
retained for the person as part of the Rap Back Program; and
(2) Notify the Federal Bureau of Investigation that the
person is no longer licensed by an authorized entity and request
that the Federal Bureau of Investigation destroy any printed and
electronic fingerprint cards or facsimiles of fingerprints that the
Federal Bureau of Investigation has retained for the person in the
Rap Back Program.
5. As used in this section, “Rap Back Program” means a
system maintained by the Central Repository and the Federal
Bureau of Investigation that enables authorized entities to receive
ongoing status notifications of any criminal history reported for
persons whose fingerprints are retained in the Next Generation
Identification System maintained by Central Repository and the
Federal Bureau of Investigation.
Sec. 61. NRS 179A.075 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179A.075 1. The Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History is hereby created within the Records,
Communications and Compliance Division of the Department.
2. Each agency of criminal justice and any other agency
dealing with crime shall:
(a) Collect and maintain records, reports and compilations of
statistical data required by the Department; and
(b) Submit the information collected to the Central Repository:
(1) In the manner approved by the Director of the
Department; and
(2) In accordance with the policies, procedures and
definitions of the Uniform Crime Reporting Program of the Federal
Bureau of Investigation.
3. Each agency of criminal justice shall submit the information
relating to records of criminal history that it creates, issues or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 179 –
collects, and any information in its possession relating to the DNA
profile of a person from whom a biological specimen is obtained
pursuant to NRS 176.09123 or 176.0913, to the Division. The
information must be submitted to the Division:
(a) Through an electronic network;
(b) On a medium of magnetic storage; or
(c) In the manner prescribed by the Director of the Department,
 within 60 days after the date of the disposition of the case. If an
agency has submitted a record regarding the arrest of a person who
is later determined by the agency not to be the person who
committed the particular crime, the agency shall, immediately upon
making that determination, so notify the Division. The Division
shall delete all references in the Central Repository relating to that
particular arrest.
4. Each state and local law enforcement agency shall submit
Uniform Crime Reports to the Central Repository:
(a) In the manner prescribed by the Director of the Department;
(b) In accordance with the policies, procedures and definitions
of the Uniform Crime Reporting Program of the Federal Bureau of
Investigation; and
(c) Within the time prescribed by the Director of the
Department.
5. The Division shall, in the manner prescribed by the Director
of the Department:
(a) Collect, maintain and arrange all information submitted to it
relating to:
(1) Records of criminal history; and
(2) The DNA profile of a person from whom a biological
specimen is obtained pursuant to NRS 176.09123 or 176.0913.
(b) When practicable, use a record of the personal identifying
information of a subject as the basis for any records maintained
regarding him or her.
(c) Upon request, provide, in paper or electronic form, the
information that is contained in the Central Repository to the
Committee on Domestic Violence appointed pursuant to NRS
228.470 when, pursuant to NRS 228.495, the Committee is
reviewing the death of the victim of a crime that constitutes
domestic violence pursuant to NRS 33.018.
6. The Division may:
(a) Disseminate any information which is contained in the
Central Repository to any other agency of criminal justice;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 180 –
(b) Enter into cooperative agreements with repositories of the
United States and other states to facilitate exchanges of information
that may be disseminated pursuant to paragraph (a); and
(c) Request of and receive from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation information on the background and personal history of
any person whose record of fingerprints or other biometric identifier
the Central Repository submits to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and:
(1) Who has applied to any agency of the State of Nevada or
any political subdivision thereof for a license which it has the power
to grant or deny;
(2) With whom any agency of the State of Nevada or any
political subdivision thereof intends to enter into a relationship of
employment or a contract for personal services;
(3) Who has applied to any agency of the State of Nevada or
any political subdivision thereof to attend an academy for training
peace officers approved by the Peace Officers’ Standards and
Training Commission;
(4) For whom such information is required or authorized to
be obtained pursuant to NRS 62B.270, 62G.223, 62G.353, 424.031,
432A.170, 432B.198, 433B.183, 449.123 and 449.4329; or
(5) About whom any agency of the State of Nevada or any
political subdivision thereof is authorized by law to have accurate
personal information for the protection of the agency or the persons
within its jurisdiction.
7. To request and receive information from the Federal Bureau
of Investigation concerning a person pursuant to subsection 6, the
Central Repository must receive:
(a) The person’s complete set of fingerprints for the purposes of:
(1) Booking the person into a city or county jail or detention
facility;
(2) Employment;
(3) Contractual services; or
(4) Services related to occupational licensing;
(b) One or more of the person’s fingerprints for the purposes of
mobile identification by an agency of criminal justice; or
(c) Any other biometric identifier of the person as it may require
for the purposes of:
(1) Arrest; or
(2) Criminal investigation,
 from the agency of criminal justice or agency of the State of
Nevada or any political subdivision thereof and submit the received
data to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for its report.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 181 –
8. The Central Repository shall:
(a) Collect and maintain records, reports and compilations of
statistical data submitted by any agency pursuant to subsection 2.
(b) Tabulate and analyze all records, reports and compilations of
statistical data received pursuant to this section.
(c) Disseminate to federal agencies engaged in the collection of
statistical data relating to crime information which is contained in
the Central Repository.
(d) Investigate the criminal history of any person who:
(1) Has applied to the Superintendent of Public Instruction
for the issuance [or renewal] of a license;
(2) Has applied to a county school district, charter school or
private school for employment or to serve as a volunteer; or
(3) Is employed by or volunteers for a county school district,
charter school or private school,
 and immediately notify the superintendent of each county school
district, the governing body of each charter school and the
Superintendent of Public Instruction, or the administrator of each
private school, as appropriate, if the investigation of the Central
Repository indicates that the person has been convicted of a
violation of NRS 200.508, 201.230, 453.3385, 453.3387 or 453.339,
or convicted of a felony or any offense involving moral turpitude.
(e) Upon discovery, immediately notify the superintendent of
each county school district, the governing body of each charter
school or the administrator of each private school, as appropriate, by
providing the superintendent, governing body or administrator with
a list of all persons:
(1) Investigated pursuant to paragraph (d); or
(2) Employed by or volunteering for a county school district,
charter school or private school whose fingerprints were sent
previously to the Central Repository for investigation,
 who the Central Repository’s records indicate have been
convicted of a violation of NRS 200.508, 201.230, 453.3385,
453.3387 or 453.339, or convicted of a felony or any offense
involving moral turpitude since the Central Repository’s initial
investigation. The superintendent of each county school district, the
governing body of a charter school or the administrator of each
private school, as applicable, shall determine whether further
investigation or action by the district, charter school or private
school, as applicable, is appropriate.
(f) Investigate the criminal history of each person who submits
one or more fingerprints or other biometric identifier or has such
data submitted pursuant to NRS 62B.270, 62G.223, 62G.353,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 182 –
424.031, 432A.170, 432B.198, 433B.183, 449.122, 449.123 or
449.4329.
(g) Provide an electronic means to access on the Central
Repository’s Internet website statistical data relating to crime.
(h) Provide an electronic means to access on the Central
Repository’s Internet website statistical data about domestic
violence in this State.
(i) Identify and review the collection and processing of
statistical data relating to criminal justice by any agency identified
in subsection 2 and make recommendations for any necessary
changes in the manner of collecting and processing statistical data
by any such agency.
(j) Adopt regulations governing biometric identifiers and the
information and data derived from biometric identifiers, including,
without limitation:
(1) Their collection, use, safeguarding, handling, retention,
storage, dissemination and destruction; and
(2) The methods by which a person may request the removal
of his or her biometric identifiers from the Central Repository and
any other agency where his or her biometric identifiers have been
stored.
9. The Central Repository may:
(a) In the manner prescribed by the Director of the Department,
disseminate compilations of statistical data and publish statistical
reports relating to crime.
(b) Charge a reasonable fee for any publication or special report
it distributes relating to data collected pursuant to this section. The
Central Repository may not collect such a fee from an agency of
criminal justice or any other agency dealing with crime which is
required to submit information pursuant to subsection 2. All money
collected pursuant to this paragraph must be used to pay for the cost
of operating the Central Repository or for any other purpose
authorized by the Legislature, and any balance of the money
remaining at the end of a fiscal year reverts to the State General
Fund.
(c) In the manner prescribed by the Director of the Department,
use electronic means to receive and disseminate information
contained in the Central Repository that it is authorized to
disseminate pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
10. As used in this section:
(a) “Mobile identification” means the collection, storage,
transmission, reception, search, access or processing of a biometric
identifier using a handheld device.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 183 –
(b) “Personal identifying information” means any information
designed, commonly used or capable of being used, alone or in
conjunction with any other information, to identify a person,
including, without limitation:
(1) The name, driver’s license number, social security
number, date of birth and photograph or computer-generated image
of a person; and
(2) A biometric identifier of a person.
(c) “Private school” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 394.103.
Sec. 62. Chapter 218D of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. For a regular session, the Commission on School Funding
created by NRS 387.1246 may request the drafting of not more
than 1 legislative measure which relates to matters within the
scope of the Commission. The requests must be submitted to the
Legislative Counsel on or before September 1 preceding a regular
session.
2. A request made pursuant to this section must be on a form
prescribed by the Legislative Counsel. A legislative measure
requested pursuant to this section must be prefiled on or before
the third Wednesday in November preceding a regular session. A
legislative measure that is not prefiled on or before that day shall
be deemed withdrawn.
Sec. 63. NRS 218D.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218D.100 1. The provisions of NRS 218D.100 to 218D.220,
inclusive, and section 62 of this act apply to requests for the
drafting of legislative measures for a regular session.
2. Except as otherwise provided by a specific statute, joint rule
or concurrent resolution, the Legislative Counsel shall not honor a
request for the drafting of a legislative measure if the request:
(a) Exceeds the number of requests authorized by NRS
218D.100 to 218D.220, inclusive, and section 62 of this act for the
requester; or
(b) Is submitted by an authorized nonlegislative requester
pursuant to NRS 218D.175 to 218D.220, inclusive, and section 62
of this act, but is not in a subject related to the function of the
requester.
3. The Legislative Counsel shall not:
(a) Honor a request to change the subject matter of a request for
the drafting of a legislative measure after it has been submitted for
drafting.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 184 –
(b) Honor a request for the drafting of a legislative measure
which has been combined in violation of Section 17 of Article 4 of
the Nevada Constitution.
Secs. 64 and 65. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 66. NRS 288.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.150 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 and
NRS 354.6241, every local government employer shall negotiate in
good faith through one or more representatives of its own choosing
concerning the mandatory subjects of bargaining set forth in
subsection 2 with the designated representatives of the recognized
employee organization, if any, for each appropriate bargaining unit
among its employees. If either party so requests, agreements reached
must be reduced to writing.
2. The scope of mandatory bargaining is limited to:
(a) Salary or wage rates or other forms of direct monetary
compensation.
(b) Sick leave.
(c) Vacation leave.
(d) Holidays.
(e) Other paid or nonpaid leaves of absence.
(f) Insurance benefits.
(g) Total hours of work required of an employee on each
workday or workweek.
(h) Total number of days’ work required of an employee in a
work year.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 8 and 11,
discharge and disciplinary procedures.
(j) Recognition clause.
(k) The method used to classify employees in the bargaining
unit.
(l) Deduction of dues for the recognized employee organization.
(m) Protection of employees in the bargaining unit from
discrimination because of participation in recognized employee
organizations consistent with the provisions of this chapter.
(n) No-strike provisions consistent with the provisions of this
chapter.
(o) Grievance and arbitration procedures for resolution of
disputes relating to interpretation or application of collective
bargaining agreements.
(p) General savings clauses.
(q) Duration of collective bargaining agreements.
(r) Safety of the employee.
(s) Teacher preparation time.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 185 –
(t) Materials and supplies for classrooms.
(u) Except as otherwise provided in subsections 9 and 11, the
policies for the transfer and reassignment of teachers.
(v) The salary incentive program for differential pay for
professional growth that must be made available to licensed
educational personnel pursuant to section 55 of this act.
(w) Procedures for reduction in workforce consistent with the
provisions of this chapter.
[(w)] (x) Procedures consistent with the provisions of subsection
6 for the reopening of collective bargaining agreements for
additional, further, new or supplementary negotiations during
periods of fiscal emergency.
3. Those subject matters which are not within the scope of
mandatory bargaining and which are reserved to the local
government employer without negotiation include:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (u) of subsection
2, the right to hire, direct, assign or transfer an employee, but
excluding the right to assign or transfer an employee as a form of
discipline.
(b) The right to reduce in force or lay off any employee because
of lack of work or lack of money, subject to paragraph [(v)] (w) of
subsection 2.
(c) The right to determine:
(1) Appropriate staffing levels and work performance
standards, except for safety considerations;
(2) The content of the workday, including, without
limitation, workload factors, except for safety considerations;
(3) The quality and quantity of services to be offered to the
public; and
(4) The means and methods of offering those services.
(d) Safety of the public.
4. The provisions of NRS 245.063, 268.4069 and 391.1605 are
not subject to negotiations with an employee organization. Any
provision of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated pursuant
to this chapter which differs from or conflicts in any way with the
provisions of NRS 245.063, 268.4069 or 391.1605 is unenforceable
and void.
5. If the local government employer is a school district, any
money appropriated by the State to carry out increases in salaries or
benefits for the employees of the school district is subject to
negotiations with an employee organization.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 186 –
6. Notwithstanding the provisions of any collective bargaining
agreement negotiated pursuant to this chapter, a local government
employer is entitled to:
(a) Reopen a collective bargaining agreement for additional,
further, new or supplementary negotiations relating to compensation
or monetary benefits during a period of fiscal emergency.
Negotiations must begin not later than 21 days after the local
government employer notifies the employee organization that a
fiscal emergency exists. For the purposes of this section, a fiscal
emergency shall be deemed to exist:
(1) If the amount of revenue received by the general fund of
the local government employer during the last preceding fiscal year
from all sources, except any nonrecurring source, declined by 5
percent or more from the amount of revenue received by the general
fund from all sources, except any nonrecurring source, during the
next preceding fiscal year, as reflected in the reports of the annual
audits conducted for those fiscal years for the local government
employer pursuant to NRS 354.624; or
(2) If the local government employer has budgeted an
unreserved ending fund balance in its general fund for the current
fiscal year in an amount equal to 4 percent or less of the actual
expenditures from the general fund for the last preceding fiscal year,
and the local government employer has provided a written
explanation of the budgeted ending fund balance to the Department
of Taxation that includes the reason for the ending fund balance and
the manner in which the local government employer plans to
increase the ending fund balance.
(b) Take whatever actions may be necessary to carry out its
responsibilities in situations of emergency such as a riot, military
action, natural disaster or civil disorder. Those actions may include
the suspension of any collective bargaining agreement for the
duration of the emergency.
 Any action taken under the provisions of this subsection must not
be construed as a failure to negotiate in good faith.
7. The provisions of this chapter, including, without limitation,
the provisions of this section, recognize and declare the ultimate
right and responsibility of the local government employer to manage
its operation in the most efficient manner consistent with the best
interests of all its citizens, its taxpayers and its employees.
8. If the sponsor of a charter school reconstitutes the governing
body of a charter school pursuant to NRS 388A.330, the new
governing body may terminate the employment of any teachers or
other employees of the charter school, and any provision of any
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 187 –
agreement negotiated pursuant to this chapter that provides
otherwise is unenforceable and void.
9. The board of trustees of a school district in which a school is
designated as a turnaround school pursuant to NRS 388G.400 or the
principal of such a school, as applicable, may take any action
authorized pursuant to NRS 388G.400, including, without
limitation:
(a) Reassigning any member of the staff of such a school; or
(b) If the staff member of another public school consents,
reassigning that member of the staff of the other public school to
such a school.
10. Any provision of an agreement negotiated pursuant to this
chapter which differs from or conflicts in any way with the
provisions of subsection 9 or imposes consequences on the board of
trustees of a school district or the principal of a school for taking
any action authorized pursuant to subsection 9 is unenforceable and
void.
11. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school or university school for profoundly gifted
pupils may use a substantiated report of the abuse or neglect of a
child or a violation of NRS 201.540, 201.553, 201.560, 392.4633 or
394.366 obtained from the Statewide Central Registry for the
Collection of Information Concerning the Abuse or Neglect of a
Child established by NRS 432.100 or an equivalent registry
maintained by a governmental agency in another jurisdiction for the
purposes authorized by NRS 388A.515, 388C.200, 391.033,
391.104 or 391.281, as applicable. Such purposes may include,
without limitation, making a determination concerning the
assignment, discipline or termination of an employee. Any provision
of any agreement negotiated pursuant to this chapter which conflicts
with the provisions of this subsection is unenforceable and void.
12. This section does not preclude, but this chapter does not
require, the local government employer to negotiate subject matters
enumerated in subsection 3 which are outside the scope of
mandatory bargaining. The local government employer shall discuss
subject matters outside the scope of mandatory bargaining but it is
not required to negotiate those matters.
13. Contract provisions presently existing in signed and ratified
agreements as of May 15, 1975, at 12 p.m. remain negotiable.
14. As used in this section, “abuse or neglect of a child” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 392.281.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 188 –
Sec. 67. NRS 354.6015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
354.6015 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the governing board of a local government shall:
(a) Submit electronically a fiscal report of the local government
to the Department of Taxation in accordance with the requirements
prescribed by the Committee on Local Government Finance
pursuant to subsection 2; and
(b) [Publish] Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph,
publish a summary of the fiscal report, which must contain the
information required by the Committee on Local Government
Finance pursuant to subsection 2, in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county in which the local government is situated.
The requirements of this paragraph do not apply to the governing
body of a school district.
2. The Committee on Local Government Finance shall
prescribe, by regulation:
(a) The dates and times for filing a fiscal report, which must
require a local government to file at least one fiscal report per year;
(b) The content of a fiscal report, which must include, without
limitation, revenues, expenditures, fund balances, cash balances,
components of assessed value, debt schedules and any other
information that the Committee on Local Government Finance
determines to be appropriate for determining the financial status of a
local government; and
(c) [The content for a summary of a fiscal report that must be
published pursuant to subsection 1; and
(d)] A uniform method for creating and submitting a fiscal
report electronically pursuant to this section. The method must
facilitate the storage and reproduction of the fiscal report in
electronic format by the Department of Taxation.
3. The Committee on Local Government Finance may
establish, by regulation, an exception to the requirement that a fiscal
report be submitted to the Department of Taxation in electronic
format. The exception must be limited to local governments that the
Committee determines do not have the financial ability to comply
with the method for submitting a fiscal report to the Department of
Taxation prescribed by the Committee. If the Committee on Local
Government Finance provides an exception pursuant to this
subsection, the Committee shall provide, by regulation, specific
standards that it will use to determine whether a local government
qualifies for an exemption pursuant to this subsection.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 189 –
4. The Committee on Local Government Finance shall adopt
regulations pursuant to this section in the manner prescribed for
state agencies in chapter 233B of NRS.
Sec. 68. Chapter 610 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 69 and 70 of this act.
Sec. 69. 1. The Nevada Registered Teacher Apprenticeship
Support Account is hereby created in the State General Fund. The
Account must be administered by the State Apprenticeship
Director.
2. The interest and income earned on:
(a) The money in the Account, after deducting any applicable
charges; and
(b) Unexpended appropriations made to the Account from the
State General Fund,
 must be credited to the Account.
3. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year, including, without limitation, any unexpended
appropriations made to the Account from the State General Fund,
reverts to the State General Fund.
4. The State Apprenticeship Director may accept gifts and
grants of money from any source for deposit in the Account.
5. The money in the Account may only be used to provide
grants of money pursuant to section 70 of this act.
Sec. 70. 1. The Nevada Registered Teacher Apprenticeship
Support Program is hereby created in the Office of Labor
Commissioner. The purpose of the program is to provide grants of
money to sponsors of apprenticeship programs in teaching that
have been approved by the Council to provide:
(a) Wrap-around support and staffing services to recruit,
prepare and retain apprentices participating in an apprenticeship
program in teaching who desire to become licensed teachers in
public schools in this State; and
(b) Instruction, including, without limitation, professional
development, coaching, mentoring and induction required during
an apprenticeship in teaching.
2. The State Apprenticeship Director shall:
(a) Administer the Program.
(b) Establish requirements for eligibility to participate in the
Program, including, without limitation, requiring an applicant to:
(1) Establish that the apprenticeship program sponsored by
the applicant has been approved by the Council pursuant to
NRS 610.095;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 190 –
(2) Use evidence-based metrics to evaluate the success of
the apprenticeship program; and
(3) Demonstrate the capability of the applicant to
successfully recruit participants for the program, prepare the
participants to become teachers and retain the participants in a
public school in this State; and
(c) Evaluate applications submitted pursuant to this section.
3. In evaluating an application for a grant of money awarded
pursuant to this section, the State Apprenticeship Director shall
give priority to an applicant who:
(a) Complies with the requirements of subsection 2;
(b) Demonstrates previous success in carrying out an
apprenticeship program;
(c) Provides a plan for new or innovative wrap-around
supports that are determined to be of high quality by the State
Apprenticeship Director; and
(d) Provides a plan to efficiently use the grant of money
awarded pursuant to this section to maximize the number of
participants in an apprenticeship program who will benefit from
its use.
4. An applicant who receives a grant of money pursuant to
this section shall:
(a) Develop, in collaboration with the State Apprenticeship
Director, standards and goals for the program to meet, including,
without limitation, a desired number of pupils to participate in and
complete the apprenticeship program;
(b) Provide wrap-around services to participants in the
apprenticeship program; and
(c) Submit a report to the State Apprenticeship Director at the
end of each semester describing the progress of the apprenticeship
program in achieving the goals developed pursuant to
paragraph (a).
5. The State Apprenticeship Director shall ensure that:
(a) Grants of money are promptly distributed to applicants
selected to receive such a grant; and
(b) Grants of money are awarded proportional to the number
of participants in the apprenticeship program, provided that:
(1) Not more than $4,000 is awarded for each participant;
and
(2) A participant is counted for the purposes of calculating
the amount of a grant for not more than 2 years.
6. Not more than 5 percent of a grant of money awarded
pursuant to this section may be expended by the recipient to cover
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 191 –
costs related to facilities and administration of the apprenticeship
program for which the recipient is the sponsor.
7. The State Apprenticeship Director shall enter into
agreements with applicants selected to receive a grant pursuant to
this section to ensure the collection and analysis of data relating to
the evaluation and identification of metrics concerning
apprenticeship programs supported by the grant, including,
without limitation:
(a) Enrollment in the apprenticeship program;
(b) Demographic information of the participants in the
apprenticeship program;
(c) Retention and graduation rates for the program;
(d) The number of apprentices who were subsequently
employed by a public school in this State during the 3 years after
graduation; and
(e) The results of any surveys conducted of participants
concerning the effectiveness of the apprenticeship program and
any deficits in resources made available to a participant during his
or her participation in the apprenticeship program.
8. On or before June 30 of each year, the State
Apprenticeship Director shall prepare a report on the status of the
Program and the effectiveness of the grants awarded pursuant to
this section and submit the report to the:
(a) Governor; and
(b) Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal
to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education.
Sec. 71. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Commission on Recruitment and Retention
established pursuant to section 37 of this act the sum of $500,000
for the cost of conducting the studies required by section 38 of this
act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 72. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the Nevada
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 192 –
Institute on Teaching and Educator Preparation, if established
pursuant to NRS 396.5185, the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,000,000
2. In making an expenditure from the money appropriated by
subsection 1, the Nevada Institute on Teaching and Educator
Preparation may expend not more than $75,000 for administrative
expenses.
3. The Nevada Institute on Teaching and Educator Preparation
shall:
(a) Prepare and transmit a report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before December 20, 2026, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the Institute
through December 1, 2026; and
(b) Prepare and transmit a final report to the Interim Finance
Committee on or before October 1, 2027, that describes each
expenditure made from the money appropriated by subsection 1
from the date on which the money was received by the Institute
through June 30, 2027.
4. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 73. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for disbursement to
school districts, sponsors of charter schools and nonprofit
organizations which provide early childhood education in this State
to fund the expansion of facilities for early childhood education in
areas of this State where access to high-quality early childhood
education is limited and there is a commitment to providing the
early childhood education for free or at low cost in underserved
communities the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $4,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $5,000,000
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 193 –
2. The Department shall disburse not more than $150,000 for
each 800 square feet of expansion for the purposes described in
subsection 1.
3. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 74. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Nevada Registered Teacher Apprenticeship
Support Account created by section 69 of this act for the support of
the Nevada Registered Teacher Apprenticeship Support Program
created by section 70 of this act the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,000,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 75. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Early Childhood Literacy and Readiness
Account created by NRS 387.1273 for the awarding of grants of
money to support early childhood literacy and readiness programs
pursuant to NRS 387.1275 the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................................. $0
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................. $12,000,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 194 –
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Secs. 75.5 and 76. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 76.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of section 33.93 of this act the following
sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,000,000
2. The sums appropriated by subsection 1 are available for
either fiscal year. Any remaining balance of those sums must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30, 2027, by the entity to
which the appropriation is made or any entity to which money from
the appropriation is granted or otherwise transferred in any manner,
and any portion of the appropriated money remaining must not be
spent for any purpose after September 17, 2027, by either the entity
to which the money was appropriated or the entity to which the
money was subsequently granted or transferred, and must be
reverted to the State General Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 77. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 77.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the purpose
providing transportation to pupils who attend school outside the
zone of attendance that the pupils are otherwise required to attend
and who demonstrate a financial need the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................................. $0
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $7,000,000
2. The Department of Education shall, for the purposes of
subsection 1, adopt regulations prescribing a method for a pupil to
demonstrate a financial need for transportation assistance.
3. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 195 –
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 78. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $500,000
for the maintenance of a portal used to measure the supply and
demand of the educator workforce in this State to ensure the
accountability and transparency of efforts to recruit and retain
educators.
2. The Department shall use the portal described in subsection
1 to monitor, without limitation:
(a) The average class size in this State;
(b) The access a school district has to teachers with classroom
experience;
(c) The use of long-term substitutes by school districts in this
State;
(d) The average and median age of teachers employed by school
districts in this State;
(e) The ratio of the members of a school staff who are licensed
to the members of a school staff who are not licensed; and
(f) Metrics that describe the ability of school districts in this
State to hire teachers who were enrolled in a program for teacher
and educator preparation established by an institution within the
Nevada System of Higher Education.
3. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 78.3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the purpose of
carrying out the provisions of this act, including personnel costs and
improving the efficiency and delivery of services the following
sums:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 196 –
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $2,500,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $4,000,000
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 78.4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education for the purpose of
providing grants of money to school districts and charter schools for
the provision of access to literacy interventionists and tutoring
programs, on the campus of a school or in-person, for pupils in
kindergarten and grades 1 to 5, inclusive the following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 ............................... $1,000,000
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 ............................... $1,000,000
2. In awarding grants pursuant to subsection 1, priority must be
given to ensuring access to, and the provision of, such programs to
pupils attending a public school designated as a 1-star school or a
public school designated as “Focus,” “Center Focus” or “Priority
Growth.”
3. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 78.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education the sum of $400,000
for the purpose of revising and providing training concerning the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 197 –
statewide performance evaluation system established pursuant to
NRS 391.465, as amended by section 49 of this act.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 78.6. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Commission on School Funding the sum of
$400,000 for analysis and research support.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 78.7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Commission on School Funding the sum of
$250,000 for reviewing revenue and tax structures and making any
subsequent recommendations.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 78.8. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Commission on School Funding the sum of
$20,000 for meeting and travel costs of the Commission.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 198 –
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 79. The provisions of section 55 of this act apply to any
contract in existence on July 1, 2025, to the extent that the
provisions of section 55 of this act do not conflict with the terms of
such a contract and to the extent that a conflict exists, the provisions
of the contract control.
Sec. 80. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 81. 1. The Commission on School Funding created by
NRS 387.1246 shall conduct an interim study concerning public
school funding. The study must include, without limitation, an
examination of:
(a) The efficiency of developing reporting requirements relating
to education, including, without limitation, accountability of school
districts and whether such reporting requirements should be
consolidated or eliminated, including, without limitation, whether
the Department of Education should create a portal to receive such
consolidated data;
(b) The capacity of the Department to properly store and collect
data received from school districts and whether data requested from
school districts and charter schools by state agencies other than the
Department should be coordinated through the Department to ensure
efficiency;
(c) The levels of funding and staffing that are necessary for the
adequate implementation of multi-tiered systems of supports in
schools in this State;
(d) The ability of school districts to implement a consistent
method of recording and allocating costs within the school district;
(e) Adequate levels of staffing that are necessary for meeting the
needs of pupils;
(f) Whether there is a better method of optimizing the weight
relative to base per pupil funding that is given to pupils described in
paragraph (e) of subsection 2 of NRS 387.1214 and 387.122;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 199 –
(g) The funding necessary to ensure that the Department is
adequately staffed and has the appropriate resources it needs,
including, without limitation, technological resources;
(h) Methods used by other states to identify at-risk pupils and
whether this State should use similar methods; and
(i) Funding for charter schools in this State, including, without
limitation:
(1) The provision of funds from the Federal Government and
this State; and
(2) The use of such funding for, without limitation, the
provision of special education and related services, transportation
services and facilities.
2. On or before November 15, 2026, the Commission shall
submit a report of its findings from the study performed pursuant to
subsection 1, including, without limitation, any recommendations
for legislation, to the Governor and the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the 84th Session of the Nevada
Legislature.
Sec. 81.5. 1. One or more institutions within the Nevada
System of Higher Education may establish and operate a pilot
program to offer an alternative pathway for assessing the
competency of applicants for a license to teach pupils in this State
through the use of alternative assessment methods.
2. A pilot program established pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Select not more than 100 participants for the pilot program
each academic year;
(b) Select not more than 25 teachers licensed pursuant to chapter
391 of NRS who have taught in a public school in this State for at
least 5 years to serve as mentors for participants in the pilot
program;
(c) Include a curriculum of professional development for
participants in the pilot program that consists of at least 10 sessions
and is aligned with the criteria for designating a teacher as effective
or highly effective under the statewide performance evaluation
system established by the State Board of Education pursuant to
NRS 391.465;
(d) Require, for the duration of the pilot program, a teacher
selected to serve as a mentor pursuant to paragraph (b) to conduct a
monthly meeting with each participant who is assigned as his or her
mentee;
(e) For a participant to receive credit for satisfactorily
completing the pilot program, require the participant to, while he or
she is participating in the pilot program, receive at least two
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 200 –
consecutive evaluations, conducted pursuant to NRS 391.685, in
which the overall performance of the teacher was designated as
effective or highly effective;
(f) For alternative assessment methods, assess the validity and
reliability of the methods and ability of the methods to be scaled to
accommodate a greater number of participants;
(g) Promote assessment practices that are inclusive and
equitable and that support a diversity of learning styles and
experiences;
(h) Align alternative assessment methods with applicable state
standards, requirements for accreditation and the needs of school
districts in this State; and
(i) Collect and analyze data to provide evidence-based
recommendations for the potential implementation of alternative
assessment methods in this State.
3. A person is eligible to participate in a pilot program
established pursuant to this section if he or she is an applicant for a
license to teach issued pursuant to chapter 391 of NRS and holds;
(a) A provisional license issued by the Superintendent of Public
Instruction pursuant to NRS 391.032;
(b) A special license as an emergency substitute teacher issued
by the Department of Education; or
(c) An endorsement to serve as a substitute teacher in early
childhood education through grade 12 issued by the State Board of
Education.
4. The Department of Education shall:
(a) For each participant in the pilot program established
pursuant to this section, extend for 24 months after selection
participate in the pilot program any deadline for removing a
provision on a provisional license issued by the Superintendent of
Public Instruction pursuant to NRS 391.032 that requires
successfully passing a competency test required to receive an initial
license to teach pursuant to NRS 391.021.
(b) Upon successful completion of the pilot program by a
participant who holds a provisional license issued by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to NRS 391.032,
remove any provision on the provisional license issued to the
applicant which requires the applicant to pass a competency test in
the principles and methods of teaching.
5. Each institution that offers a pilot program pursuant to this
section shall:
(a) On or before July 1 of each year of operation of the pilot
program established pursuant to this section:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 201 –
(1) Compile a report describing the progress of the pilot
program, including, without limitation:
(I) Demographic information for participants in the pilot
program;
(II) The success of professional development services
provided by the pilot program;
(III) Preliminary findings of the pilot program.
(2) Submit the report compiled pursuant to subparagraph (1)
to:
(I) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education;
(II) The State Board of Education; and
(III) The Commission on Professional Standards in
Education.
(b) Not later than 6 months after the pilot program established
pursuant to this section ceases operation, submit to the Department
of Education:
(1) A plan for implementing the pilot program in a
permanent format that can accommodate all prospective applicants
that describes the structure and curriculum of the pilot program; and
(2) The metrics of success for the pilot program.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Alternative assessment methods” means valid and reliable
methods used for determining, for an initial license to teach issued
pursuant to NRS 391.019, the applicant’s competency in, knowledge
of and ability to provide instruction in accordance with sound
principles and methods of teaching appropriate to the applicant’s
required level of competence that is equivalent to the “Principles of
Learning and Teaching Test” prepared and administered by the
Educational Testing Service.
(b) “Metrics of success” includes, without limitation:
(1) An evaluation of the growth in competency, professional
engagement and readiness for participants in the pilot program
established pursuant to this section;
(2) An analysis of the impact of the pilot program on the
retention, effectiveness and morale of teachers; and
(3) Benchmarks for satisfactory completion of the pilot
program.
(c) “Participant” means an applicant for a license to teach who is
selected to participate in the pilot program established pursuant to
this section.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 202 –
Sec. 82. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 83. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 391.033,
as amended by section 43 of this act, and NRS 391.040, as amended
by section 45 of this act, an applicant for the renewal of a license
issued by the Superintendent of Public Instruction must submit with
the first renewal of his or her license after July 1, 2029.
(a) A complete set of his or her fingerprints and written
permission authorizing the Superintendent to forward the
fingerprints to the Central Repository for Nevada Records of
Criminal History for its report on the criminal history of the
applicant, and for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
for its report on the criminal history of the applicant; and
(b) Any fees for processing the fingerprints of the applicant for
renewal by the Central Repository for Nevada Records of Criminal
History and the Federal Bureau of Investigation. Any fees required
by this paragraph must not cause the fees for the renewal of a
license to exceed the amount fixed by the Commission on
Professional Standards in Education pursuant to NRS 391.040, as
that section existed before July 1, 2026.
2. Any fingerprints forwarded to the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History pursuant to this section must
be treated in the manner prescribed by section 60 of this act.
Sec. 84. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
Sec. 84.5. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing the
Nevada Revised Statutes, use the authority set forth in NRS 220.120
to substitute appropriately the term:
1. “Focus” for the term “low-performing” as previously used in
reference to a low-performing school district, sponsor of a charter
school or school.
2. “Priority” for the term “underperforming” as previously
used in reference to an underperforming school district or sponsor of
a charter school or persistently underperforming school.
Sec. 85. NRS 387.206, 387.2062, 388G.500, 388G.610,
388G.670, 391.027, 391.486, 391.488, 391.490, 391.492, 391.494
and 391.496 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 86. 1. This section and section 25.3 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 11.5 to 14.1, inclusive, 15.5 to 19, inclusive, 21 to
27, inclusive, 29 to 33, inclusive, 36 to 41, inclusive, 42, 44, 47, 48,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 203 –
53 to 56, inclusive, 59, 59.3, 62 to 82, inclusive, 84 and 85 of this
act become effective on July 1, 2025.
3. Sections 1 to 9.7, inclusive, 11.7, 14.2 to 14.7, inclusive, 20,
20.5, 33.1 to 33.97, inclusive, 41.5, 41.6, 52.5, 56.2, 56.5, 57 to
58.7, inclusive, and 59.5 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
4. Sections 10, 11, 34, 35, 43, 45, 46, 49 to 52, inclusive, 60,
61 and 83 become effective on July 1, 2027.
5. Section 25.5 of this act becomes effective on October 1,
2027.
6. Section 28 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2028.
7. Sections 33.93 and 81.5 of this act expire by limitation on
June 30, 2029.
8. Section 15 of this act becomes effective on July 1, 2030.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)